I rounded the last corner into the westering sun, crunching fallen leaves under my feet. I'd been smiling the entire short walk home from school; it was cold enough to pinken the tip of my nose and my cheeks, it was grey and still and sunny. The blanket of leaves got thicker and more welcoming every day as the trees waned starker and more minimalistic. I found that charming. I liked when the foliage was thick and lush, but I didn't like being hot and that's what it meant when things were green. I much prefered layers: t-shirt, sweatshirt, jacket, scarf, long pants, boots. Cozy clothes were the best clothes, and it was finally time to burst open the deep pits of the closet. Yes, things were distinctly Autumnal these days. It looked and felt just as Octobersome as it was and that was more then enough to make my day. 
My smile broke when I got close enough to see the house, though. There were people picketing the sidewalk in front of my house again. Big signs and chanting and all that. I walked up the sidewalk, tried to ignore them screaming my name in between mean things. It's not my problem, you know? You'd think after six years they'd find something more effective to do, as their following is still only about ten members. 
They used to write on the garage with spraypaint, pentagrams and stuff. And they used to egg my mom's car, and teepee the tree in front of the house. They don't do that anymore because some of them got caught and stuck with big fines and community service hours. My parents also used to get calls warning them to purge the demon from their household. We'd get followed and people would even come to the door. Those people have got restraining orders against them at this point. They mostly stick with the legal stuff now. Picketing the sidewalk in front of the house and publishing ads in local papers, not using my name because that's slander, but making sure it's clear that they're talking about me. 
You know though, it's not the worst fate. Not a lot of people are seniors in high school and already have entire activist groups devoted to their own demise. It's...it's very metal. It's something I will tell my children someday and it will both teach them not to bully, cause that's wrong, and also give them massive respect for their old pa. At this point we've weeded out enough of the dangerous crap that these people pull that I've just grown accustomed to it being a thing I live with.
As I walked up the sidewalk, a new face, one I'd never seen before, burst from the regular circling picketing ranks. She was a squat, middle aged white woman with thinning grey hair, a lime green shirt, ill-fitting blue jeans and white nurse shoes. She sort of scurried towards me with this look on her face. Her mouth was hanging open flaccidly in clownlike caricature of anger and despair. Her eyes were small and squinting under unkempt grey eyebrows. Was her little nose running? What passion! I was amused until she grabbed the strap of my backpack with a squat hand. I jumped back and went "Whoa!" That wasn't very cool at all. I fought my urge to flee the scene. 
"Vampire fag!" she screamed in a warbling high pitch. I hadn't heard that one in a while. Which was better, as it hurt my feelings a lot more than most of their other common insults. Whatever, I thought with some effort, I could be scary if I needed to. I could. I bared my teeth and, for good measure, hissed at the stressful woman. She backed off immediately (a relief), going from sort of kneeling and pulling on my strap to sitting on the grass being a hysterical mess. 
Though my heart was palpitating, I figured I should scare the homophobic slurs out of her. I had the adrenaline rush and moral compass to do it, and that was rare, so I pretended to be terrifying and sidled up to her. "Listen lady," I crooned with more mysteriousness than anxiety, I hoped. I was laying it on thick. "Don't use that word on me, okay? It's not a nice thing to call anybody." I bared my teeth again. She didn't look immediately convinced so I leaned in really close and I whispered intensely, "something bad might happen to you." I raised my eyebrows spookily and laughed, half because it would be intimidating and half because what was happening was hilarious. Also half because I was overwhelmed and wanted to cry. 
She screamed loud and long and tearful like she had just lost a child and I kid you not, crawled on hands and knees back to the ranks, which dispersed pretty quickly after that. I dug for the key in my bag with shaking hands and went into my picturesque little midwestern house. 
My mom was inside at the table, reading a book. Misty ran up to me and stretched her paws up my leg, chirping. 
"Hey, kitty," I said with a tremor in my voice. She had a way of making me feel better when I was uncomfortable. I was thankful the little fluffy greyling was there to greet me. I picked her up by the armpits and kissed her head. She made a contented sound.
"Hey, did they get you?" my mom asked without looking up from her book. 
"Yeah," I said. "One of them called me a fag to my face. I hissed at her though." 
Her attention snapped away from the book as soon as I said the offensive word. "Oh geez, Sam, I'm sorry that happened. People are gross." 
There was a pause and I said, "They left. I'm gonna go finish my homework. Want me to help with dinner?" I really liked my mom. She was good news.
"I'm thinking of just ordering a pizza. What do you want on it?" 
"Blood!" I joked with my tongue out. We laughed. I felt a lot better now that I was inside my safe, comfortable house with my cool cat and my awesome mom. "Just plain cheese sounds good," I corrected. I went upstairs to get started on my homework and check out the intenet.
I went up the stairwell to my bedroom, which took up most of the top floor. There was a bathroom up there, too, that I got to myself. The house was actually not much taller than a one story, so the ceiling of my room was peaked and sloping. It was sort of atticky. 
It was decorated in a Christmas theme, and had been for a few years. I'd set up some lights, a mini tree, and some tinsel in the December of my freshman year, and it had made me feel so warm and cozy that I'd never taken it down. In fact, with my dad's help I'd rigged the light switch to turn on the Christmas lights instead of the bright white bulb on the ceiling fan. I had string lights all the way around the tops of the walls and a little tree on the dresser that lit up as well. I liked to pretend the holidays never ended. It put a nice filter on the world. 
I went to the desk and pressed the space bar to wake up the computer. Before I could get started with math, I had to have some mood music, of course (tonight's choice was Grizzly Bear) and it never hurt to have a distracting webpage handy for when my brain stopped working (the distracion choice tonight was a flash version of Zork, which was quickly becoming my favorite game ever. I didn't like getting stuck in mazes or caverns and I difinitely didn't like being in situations where I was likely to be eaten by a Grue, but to date it was the only video game I could find that didn't feature overwhelming graphics. Probably because it featured no graphics. But that was neither here nor there.)
In between tedious math problems that night I chatted with Reggie, a guy I had met on a forum for a band I liked. He was totally cute, shorter than me with wavy brown hair and freckles on his nose. He understood me, and I liked to think I understood him too. We were kind of into each other but he lived in California. I liked to act jealous of that to flatter him. 
We were talking about our respective homeworks and how not very cool they were. I was working on logarithms and he was working on, I don't know, space astronaut equations. He was in very high level math. I think it was past calculus, if that even existed. He liked to help me out a little, which was very nice. He never made me feel as incompetent as I was. He made me feel like I could do anything, but math was just one of those things I should accept as not being a strong suit. It was a hard thing to accept, coming from a mom who used to be a physicist and a dad who was a doctor. Both of them had Ph.D's and I was taking Algebra 2 for the second time in hopes of pulling a D (for Diploma). I was fantastic in English, art, and History, when I applied myself. But so was Reggie and so were my parents. Reggie was the only person who didn't make me feel inadequate about it. 
Reggie went off to walk his dog and for a bit I was left alone to my very hard but now slightly more sensible devices. Eventually my computer blooped with a message from my friend Aubrey, who I had met at a yoga class about a year prior. We had both found it hilarious that the teacher used his bulldog, Captain, as an example of presence and relaxation. "Captain is an awesome guy," he'd say. "When Captain is there, sprawled out in the living room, he is really doing it. Captain is fully committed to relaxing, and there's no tension in his neck or back." It was the most genuine thing either of us had heard all day, and also the most whimsical. Aubrey was almost always whimsical and genuine, too, and that was why I liked her. I think on the day we met we were already great friends, comfortable enough to really have a conversation. We still did yoga together, and we still went to that teacher with the bulldog and we still sort of reached across our mats when he asked us to "channel Captain" and grabbed hands and gave a little squeeze in lieu of laughing. 
I told Aubrey about the thing that happened in the yard and she thought it was priceless. "someone should make a show about u!" she messaged me. 
"no way, too shy," I sent back.
The computer dinged with her reply but before I had a chance to see it there was a boisterous holler downstairs. It was my dad ambling through the front door and reacting to the pizza, which I hadn't noticed had arrived. "So good!" I heard him yell. What a guy. 
I flipped off the hundreds of multicolored lights and went downstairs to meet the parents for pizza. I grabbed a slice from the box, plopped it on a plate and sat down. The news was on. Top stories, announced by a woman in heavy makeup with stiff looking hair and that news anchor sort of accent, included correlation between obesity and school grades, a cat who had learned to ride a small tricycle, and then...me. Not exactly me, it was the woman at whom I had hissed earlier, interviewed down the street from my house. Apparently she had called the news first, 911 second, with hearkings of Vampire assault. Well, one thing I did have to say for my stable little town was the lack of drama. If the news had to rely on supernatural speculation in order to have enough stories to fill up half an hour, that was fine by me. 
My mom grunted as soon as she heard the little woman's snivelling little voice say "Vampire" and picked up the remote to change the channel, for my benefit I assumed. "Don't, I want to see," I said.
"He leaned in close and I could smell the blood in his vile mouth," whine-squeaked the woman on the TV. "He told me he was gonna kill me and I felt...I felt the weight of his evil heavy in my heart." 
"Oh, come on," I laughed. Weight of what evil? I'd stepped on a worm the other day on the way to school; did it count as evil if it was an accident?
I thought it was funny and I laughed but my parents both gave me that stern look they do sometimes when they are probably way too worried. "Sam, do we need to leave?" asked my dad for the fiftieth time. "We can leave."
I rolled my eyes. Not that I liked where we lived particularly, but I didn't mind it for now. I was out of high school in less than a year, and my dad living here facilitated him having the best job he could hope for. Apparently Oklahoma was positively dying for competent ER doctors and willing to pay top dollar for anybody who fit the bill. Dad worked 25 hours a week, mom didn't work at all, and we lived in a nice little house in a clean little town with plenty of everything we needed. What better life could we expect? Anywhere I went people would probably speculate anyhow. I understood that and every time I thought about being the reason my family left their stable, easy little life, I felt guilty. On top of that, I had Aubrey and a couple friends at school who I'd miss sorely if we were to go. So we didn't need to leave. 
"Dad. It was funny. That woman is crazy." I felt like I was trying so hard to prove that I didn't care that it seemed like I was hurt about it. Especially when my old Mom looked at me with the biggest, most caring brown eyes, her black hair with grey curling in all directions and her pink lips pulled back in a concerned frown. It was too much. I slouched and took another slice of pizza before yanking the remote out of my dad's pale hand and changing the channel to funny home videos. 
--
The next morning, I was at school getting my Algebra 2 book from my locker and dropping off the cardigan I had worn to school. I had stopped to think about whether or not I needed my English book that day, and holy shit, whether I had forgotten to do the homework? No, I-- I felt a tap on my shoulder. 
I turned around. It was someone I'd never spoken to but who had a face I recognized. I think I had English with him. He was stocky and had a damp looking afro. He looked sick most of the time and he seemed a little slow. His eyes didn't track as fast as usual and his mouth hung open sometimes. He dressed right in line with skater trends, with those shoes that I thought were called "kicks," tight pants that sort of rested half down his butt and t-shirts with greusome neon drawings on them. I'd never seen him with a skateboard. He was probably a burned out stoner, I thought, and then I took it back because I didn't know enough about him to get to judge. "Hello," I said.
"Heeey," the kid said slowly. I think his name was Carl? Carlos? I felt bad for not knowing and I tried not to show it on my face. "Ummmm, I heard about you, on the news, last night." He spoke irritatingly slowly and took big pauses between words. I decided that didn't think I liked him very much.
"I guess," I said. Perfectly ingratiating first conversation, I thought. 
"So I was um, wondering if, you wanted, to come over, later," said the boy. What a jump. I saw you on the news, come over! What was that supposed to mean? I thought I understood this kid now. He was one of those cryptozoologist type folks who contacted me sometimes, or maybe he thought that if he had a Vampire friend he'd be more popular among his hardcore friends. 
"I'm not actually a Vampire," I said to the kid, whose name I thought was Carl now. 
"Okaaaay." He managed to sound both daft and skeptical at the same time.
"Really, I'm not. It's a rumor. For real. See you in class." I started walking away, but I could have sworn I saw him give me a slow motion wink. I sighed. 
--
At lunch I sat with Cole and Celia. I wouldn't call them "friends," but they were nice and they let me sit with them, even including me in conversation. Even though they inexplicably preferred to sit in the smelly, harsly it cafeteria rather than in the pretty field that was the center of the school, their company was a step up from sitting alone all the time. Not that I hated being alone all the time, it just got tiring to be at school all day every day and not get to check in with anybody. 
They were eating some weird vaguely hot dog type thing. I wasn't eating. There was nothing appealing about the offerings that day, or any day honestly. I didn't eat meat and I stayed away from the overly processed, and I was also allergic to soy, which, if the meat or processed thing wasn't enough, was pretty universally present in that kind of food. Celia asked me why I hadn't packed a lunch again. 
"I was up late," I answered. That was usually my answer, but it was also usually true. I'd been up talking to Reggie until early. His dark circles had to be as bad as mine by now, though the time zones were in his favor. 
"Dude was that thing on the news about you?" Cole asked, like he'd been holding it in. He wasn't generally interested in the Vampire speculation thing, but he had a tendency to idolize celebrities. Being talked about on the news was sort of big, even for me, a local celebrity in my own right, and Cole was probably feeling a bit starstruck. I just nodded, sinking back into my shoulders a little and looking down. 
Celia looked at me with that soft judgement in her brown eyes that she gave anyone when they did anything irresponsible. She was sort of a prude. "What did you do to get on the news?" She asked quietly and pursed her lips. 
I let cole explain about the woman grabbing my backpack and me scaring her away, as Celia grew inscreasingly more wide-eyed, when appeared another student I recognized but didn't know. She was younger than me, I thought. I'd never had a class with her. She was a short and all around tiny girl, and I'd have to get to know her if I was ever not going to resent her. I'd mostly seen her walking around in short skirts and stockings with suspenders, red lipstick, long brown hair all perfectly messy down her back. She was this perfect mixture of a sort of vintage charm and modern babeliness. I wanted to kiss her but I also kind of wanted her to suffer for being so damn self aware about her cuteness. It was almost sickening. I frequently saw her talking to random boys with her breasts propped out, throwing her pretty head back in laughter at something they had said, though they usually looked dumber than usual and incapable of saying anything worth hearing. I wondered why that was the thing she had decided to do for fun.
Here she was, however, sauntering up to me with her hips swaying as she stepped toe first. She stopped and sort of posed with a hand on a hip and her chin towards the sky. "Hey," she said with a graceful little smile in a voice I'd never heard her use before. Sort of deep and raspy and melodic. Kind of enchanting. I cannot tell a lie, I was quite suddenly infuriatingly attracted to this girl. 
"Uh. Hi," I said as flippantly as I could manage. 
"I saw that news story about you," a half smile graced her painted lips. 
I couldn't help but throw my head back and open my arms out in a question to the sky. "Why?" I frustratedly asked no one in particular. I sighed heavily, having got that out of my system, and turned back to the girl.
"I'm not a Vampire," I said curtly. 
Her reply was a knowing smile, a small laugh to herself, a shrug of the shoulders, and a good humored "Alright then, kid." Kid? Then she flipped her gorgeous hair over her shoulder and sauntered away. I hated to see her leave but I loved to watch her go. 
I turned to Cole and Celia with an open mouth of displeased confusion. Celia had a purely disgusted look on her face, but Cole's expression matched mine. "What the hell?" He laughed in disbelief and gave me a high five that turned into a handshake. "Melody talked to you dude!" 
As soon as the girl, whose name I guessed was Melody (leave it to Cole to know that), left my sight, I stopped wanting her so much and went back to having a problem with her. Something about her profile or the shine of her hair or the curve of her waist was lost when I couldn't see it. It was sort of like remembering bad pain (maybe a lot like it), you remember that it hurt and you remember feeling awful, but the real physical sensation is lost once it's gone. I noticed that the wonder in my face had changed to disgust and I tried to curb it. 
--
I was walking home that night and was within a couple blocks of my house. It was dark; it was past six. I'd stayed for drama club. It wasn't really my thing (I just stage managed), but it was big for Cole and Celia and they'd gotten me into it. Cole had picked up, according to his own estimation, "so many chicks" since he started acting. He said they liked it when he wore eyeliner, and I think secretly so did he. He pretty frequently went on about how it made his eyes pop. It also didn't hurt Cole that he was talented and usually got a pretty big role. Well, big as far as lines and stage time went. Not very big in terms of how many people saw him perform who weren't parents or students bribed with extra credit. 
Celia had far purer intentions for her craft. She wanted to go to college to study stage direction. Like me, she was happiest out of the spotlight, but she loved the stage and had a knack for blocking. She was currently in the act of pitching her newest one-act (a play about time-travelling puritans) to the drama teacher, Ms. Swindleton. It was hard because Swindles was hard in all ways. She was hard to please and hard to convince and hard not to anger. Celia was good at acting like Swindles had anything valid to say, though, so she was in the running to get her play staged. That would look really good on her resume and would be a huge honor anyhow. 
After a vaguely successful drama club, the subject of which being "Why aren't you all wearing the t-shirts we went out of our way to have made?" but the actual events of which being several kids standing on desks and singing a gender swapped version of "La Vie Boheme," then "The Cell Block Tango," then "Popular," the two of them had gone to get sandwiches and I'd made some excuse about homework. They weren't good enough actors to make their regret about me leaving look convincing. 
 I was really deep in contemplation about whether drama club was really my thing, whether it was worth it to hang out with Cole and Celia all the time when it was sort of clear that we were just doing each other favors, when another person stopped me. I didn't recognize him, though. He was massively tall and thick. Thick arms, thick legs, thick torso, all wrapped up in a black turtleneck and black jeans. It actually looked more sensible than ridiculous on him. He had longish, soft looking golden brown hair and a thick beard. His eyes were small and looked black from down where I was. He had big pink lips that covered big teeth, I saw when he smiled and greeted me as I passed him by.
"Hey, you that Vampire!" he roared in a very, very deep voice that matched his stature. I groaned and turned around. I was just about done having my moments interrupted.
"No, I'm not!" I yelled at him as if he were the opposite of what he was, a small child. "Leave me alone! I don't care about cryptozoology!" I looked at him like I was his mother and he had just drawn on the wall with permanent ink. The big guy looked at me like someone of equal girth or maybe a steel robot's fist had just punched him in the chest. Were his eyes actually watering? Oh gosh. Yes, they were. The giant man was starting to cry.
I stood frozen for a second, not sure whether I should comfort the giant crying stranger in the turtleneck in the dark, or get the heck out of there. I didn't know the depths of his crazy at all, and while my natural instinct would be to offer at least a half-assed "it's gonna be okay, dude," I had a weird feeling. Go figure! Of course I had a weird feeling after hurting the feelings of a 6'5" refrigerator! I shook my head and turned to walk away.
"You no go!" roared the guy in hysterics. I decided to ignore him and go anyway. "I hate cryptozoologist! I hate cryptozooligist!" He repeated himself so I knew he meant it. Maybe he was too crazy even for the cryptozoologists. Maybe he was a splinter crypto. That was even worse than a standard one. Rejected by the unicorn finders, sasquatch hunters, and vampire believers. I could run fast. I went for it. 
I ran around the block just in case he followed me home. Not that everyone didn't already know where I lived. After just a couple minutes I got too tired to run (I've never been in tip-tip cardio condition) and hid behind a tree. I didn't see a big scary guy so after a few minutes, when my mouth stopped tasting like blood and my heart beat in rhythm agian, I walked the rest of the way home. There was no sign at all of the guy. A huge relief. As soon as I put my bag down on the front step to dig for the key, though, I heard the grunting of what I barely had time to turn around and visually process as the giant hurdling towards me. 
Before I could yell he scooped me up and put a big hand over my mouth. Leaving my bag behind he carried me like I weighed nothing while running at a seemingly inhuman speed, probably aided by football practice and probably also steriods. I couldn't really see where we were going, as his huge hand covered most of my face. I couldn't really breathe for the same reason. My heart beat fast and and I knew I was being taken somewhere to get offed. My stomach churned. I very nearly vomited and probably would have if I'd been able to inhale. I stopped being able to think past "I'm about to die."
Then finally, we stopped and he put me down. He must have been surprised at the hand covering my nose and eyes and maybe at the fact that I was turning purple, because he quickly adjusted his hand to cover only my mouth and I could see and, thank heaven, breathe again. We were sitting behind the bushes at the park near my house. Not a scary murder lair, so that was nice amongst all the not nice that was happening. I tried to get my breath back and focus my vision. He looked at me sternly and with surprisingly good humor, though his hand was still on my mouth. "Thumbs up if you promise no scream." He spoke to me like a child. 
I begrudgingly gave him his lousy thumbs up and he released my mouth; I panted heavily for a while and got back to normalish breathing.
"Listen, Vampire," he started. 
"I object."
"Listen!" he urged. He took another breath and started again. "Listen. You don't get say mean thing to me. Hurt my feelings when you call me cryptozoologist." The word sounded like it was hard to say. Like when the woman outside my house had called me a fag the other day.
"I'm sorry," I said. Even though he was kind of a douchebag.
"Yeah you sorry. Check privilege." 
I stared at him and tried to pull the corners of my lips out of the smile they were forming into. 'check privilege.' I snorted a little.
"Bad Vampire! You laugh my oppression! You very nasty Vampire!"
"I'm not a Vampire!" I didn't really know what this was about or how calling someone a cryptozoologist was oppressive. But I, unfortunately, was about to find out. 
Big man started taking off his shirt. I cringed back. This couldn't end well. I tried not to struggle, though, because he definitely had the capacity to kill me. What I saw, however, was not a naked man who planned to have his way with me behind the bushes. It was a thick blanketing of fur on his chest and, when he had the turtleneck off all the way, his arms. Looking more closely, the back of his hands were furry too, as were the parts of his face that shouldn't have been covered by hair or beard. He hid all that fur pretty well. 
And I understood. The poor guy had probably spent a lifetime being stalked by violent cryptozoologists. I had a moment of calm clarity about meeting a real live Sasquatch, that was followed by my body catching up to me in an instant. My heart started pounding in my throat and that thing that happens in my jaw and mouth when I'm about to vomit started. I stood up and paced back and forth, screaming as little as possible, shoulders up in my ears despite everything all my yoga teachers had ever taught me, shaking my hands in front of my chest. Sasquatch looked confused.
"I just show dumb Vampire I pretend too. Why so mad?" 
When I exhaled, I couldn't help it, I let out this little high pitched whinny. I was completely terrified. I tried to get my breath under control. Finally, when I could speak, I choked out, "I'm not. A Vampire."
Sasquatch rolled his tiny black eyes and did air quotes around his reply. "Okay." 
"Anyways Vampire. I see you later. I already tell Melody and Carl and Sven you want hang out after school tomorrow. My place. They good friends. You like them." Gosh he was sassy.
I wasn't sure but I was pretty sure the Sven he was talking about was the Sven who was the football player who used to slam me into lockers. Of course, right? I didn't know any other Svens and the one high school in town was small, and my luck was terrible about things lately. "I don't really...I have friends, um," I didn't know his name. "Sasquatch."
"My name Ham."
I sighed. "I'm Sam." 
Ham's face lit up like a hairy, hairy lamp. "We rhyme like poem. I knew we be good friends," He laughed and it was truly innocent.
I smiled a little. I liked this side of Ham. It was almost adorable. I definitely preferred it to the Ham who had strangled me just ten minutes before. I knew I shouldn't feel safe, but I did, and I figured I'd humor him. "Okay Ham. See you tomorrow."
"Okay Sam. I see you tomorrow."
"Okay."
Then we both got up and Ham (the real Sasquatch who kidnapped me but was now my new friend) clumsily shook my hand and we went our separate ways. What was my life.
I got home and found my bag still sitting unscathed on the front porch.
--
I couldn't relax that night at yoga. Even Aubrey noticed that I couldn't soften my shoulders during warrior, I couldn't keep my balance during tree pose, I couldn't stop fidgeting during child's pose. The instructor, Buddy, the one with the dog, kept coming up and adjusting my moves. I just couldn't channel Captain, couldn't get my head away from Ham. Why was there a Sasquatch living in my town? Why was he friends with Carl and Melody and, ugh, Sven? I reminded myself that I still wasn't sure if it was the same Sven who had smacked me around with no reservations every day for two years. More importantly than potentially hanging out with my arch nemesis, however, was the question: why was the town Sasquatch hanging out with those kids? I didn't know about Carl, but Melody sure had friends, as did Sven. Did they know Ham was a Sasquatch? Could they not know? 
I thought about Carl's slow speech, his pallid, greyish face, his cloudy eyes, his sickly, spotty arms, and his awkward movement. Melody's uncannily sexy body, her enchanting, lyrical voice, the charm she sent out over me like, I don't know, tear gas. Napalm. I thought about Sven, who I hadn't seen up close in a while. We went to the same school but I did my best to give him the kind of space a restraining order would warrant. Sven was very tall, with sharp features. He was really spectacular at football (but shaped more like a soccer player) and really spectacularly angry, from what I saw and heard, all of the time. He hadn't used to be like that when we were friends. He had started getting really tall and really homophobic at the same time, in around ninth grade. I didn't think those things were related. 
I thought about all these strange, strange humans who were friends with Ham. I thought about these humans for a good while, while holding my arms out, stepping my feet out as wide as my wrists, turning my left leg out at the hip and pulling my right toes in to face 10 o'clock on the mat. Thought about the humans as I was wrapping my outer upper arms in, pulling my quadriceps off my knees. The humans as I was pulling my tailbone down and softening my butt. Humans as I pulled through a vinyasa and ended up in downward dog. Humans, humans, it echoed in my mind like a mantra with each ujjayi breath. And then, finally, as I tried to quiet my mind in savasana, it hit me. What do a real Sasquatch, a corpselike kid, a kid with uncanny sexual prowess, and a kid who is...tall and homophobic all have in common? 
They weren't humans. Except maybe Sven.
Whatever they were, they were probably not humans. That was what held them together. Of course it was. Gosh, and I thought I was fairly endowed in the common sense department. 
No, it was okay. None of this stuff was real. I spent much of my life reminding myself of that. Now that maybe it was all real, there was some adjusting to do. It wasn't an insult to my common sense that I didn't look at Carl the first time, with his frustratingly slow nature and his slightly fishy smell, and think, "Zombie!" Was Carl a Zombie? Did I know a Zombie? Wow. My heart started pounding and my throat got a little tighter. Just then, Buddy spoke softly. 
"Alright my yogis, slowly come back into the breath. Wiggle your fingers and toes and, when you're ready, roll off onto the right side."
Thank goodness.
After class, Aubrey asked me what the problem was. "What got into you today, dude?" she asked.
I shrugged it off. "I couldn't welcome the spirit of Captain today!" I joked as sincerely as I could.
"Haha, we all have those days I guess. Anyhow, have I told you what Brian said yesterday? About the cats?"
"Nooooo."
"My kitties changed his mind about kitties! He didn't used to like them, did I tell you that?" She had told me that a few times. “He likes kitties now! Because of Thom and Jonny! Isn’t he so sweet!”
He was so sweet, I agreed. I’d never met Brian but he seemed to be on Aubrey's mind pretty exclusively lately. A few days prior she had played hookey with work, yoga, and our movie plans to do I didn’t want to (but did) know what with Brian. 
“Want a salad? It’s 2 dollars off today,” I reminded her.
“Is it Wednesday? Oh good. Of course!” 
--
I did not sleep at all, though that wasn't the rarest of occasions. I felt an urge to tell somebody about all the shit that had happened that night. Aubrey was great but she wasn’t the best listener. I would have gone to Reggie, but I didn’t want him to judge me. That was silly because he knew more about me than Aubrey, Cole or Celia, or even my parents did. As much as I loved them all, it was sort of different with Reggie. He was the one person who had it all laid out on the table. I thought it was just because it was easier for me to talk to people online. Reggie got a lot more insight than I tended to give people when I saw them in real life. Even as honest as I was with him, though, I wasn’t really ready to say something potentially crazy. As silly as it sounds, Reggie definitely didn’t think I was a Vampire (more than I could always say for Cole and Celia, who both still made jokes about it sometimes, and Aubrey, who didn’t even really know to what extent the madness went). I didn’t want to tell Reggie that suddenly, all I had ever said (and sometimes tearfully ranted) about the supernatural being completely ridiculous, was taken back, because I had met a Sasquatch and maybe a Zombie and a Succubus, and my biggest old frenemy was in on it somehow as well. I didn’t feel good about that. So I just told Reggie that I wasn’t being conversational because I was kind of depressed (but not for any real reason so he needn’t worry) and had sort of hurt my shoulder during yoga. I was feeling off, and that much was true. 
In between conversation with Reggie I muddied up my search history real good. Yesterday my last five searches were: 
	make logarthms less hard
	david byrne maiden name
	bow tie easy
	how to cut your own bangs
	sufjan christmas download free 
Now my last searches were:
	succubus qualities
	sirens
	siren beast qualities	
	ZOMBIE WEAKNESSES
	cold ones?
	sasquatch danger
	tall homophobic beast
	tall strong asshole supernatural
	can i be friends with m onsters
	sfjkzjfhzg
	): happy music
Things I learned that night included: 
	If Melody wasn’t just a very sexy lady, she was probably a Siren. Sirens were depicted in popular mythology a few different ways, many of which were human-bird hybrids, because birds sing beautifully (as if someone had just said, “Oh yeah, that seems right, let me make that up!” I wished it was as simple as a made up story or a cautionary tale!), but some versions of which just being beautiful women with seductive bodies as well as voices. Check. And, come to think of it, her dainty frame and delicate face were quite bird-like. 
	If Melody was a Siren, as I was pretty sure she was, she was probably a killer. My frantic searches offered little guidance about why she would murder humans, but I suppose it wouldn’t have made it better if I had known right then. 
	Sirens kill by lulling people to sleep with their voices. I had some earplugs in my dresser that I had taken to wearing to concerts so as not to damage my sensitive ears. I figured I could try them out when I went to Ham’s house. Possible protection against Melody was a go.
	If Carl wasn’t just a used up stoner, he was probably, definitely, a Zombie. Obviously, that would mean that he killed people, too. I was getting pretty stressed out about all the people, beings, jerks, whatever, that I was about to hang out with being murderers. 
	Zombies weren’t weak but they were sort of slow. I didn’t have anything that would kill a zombie were times to get tough for old Carl and I, but I did make sure to set out clothes that were easy to run in. Didn’t want my stupid tight pants to get in the way of my physical well-being. Tomorrow was a day for gym shorts and sneakers. 
	Sasquatches, apart from not being real, were the most comforting of the beasts. They liked to be left alone and tended to scare humans away rather than hurting them. Ham did seem reluctant to murder, I supposed. 
	I took note of the fact that Sasquatches were the only mythical beasts that had any sort of “credible sightings,” out of the three of them. Sirens were a Greek myth that nobody believed and Zombies were an allegory for the apocalypse. Only Sasquatches seemed to be potentially real, to have any credible sightings or any sizeable group of folks who believed in them. Apart from me. I made sure to keep this in mind as I sunk deeper into a state of “my life just got irrevocably changed” style self pity. Ham was definitely a Sasquatch, but I still didn’t have any proof other than, honestly, paranoia about the other two. And I didn’t even know what I thought Sven was supposed to be. Tall and homophobic, sure, he was probably the same sort of mysterious beast my dad was. What was I thinking?
As the digital clock in the bottom of my screen got higher and then lower and then higher again, I went through phases of self-doubt and phases of it being all too real. I kept deciding I had better just leave it till the morning, put it out of my mind, and then I kept reading more and more, until my alarm clock across the room beeped. I took a shower and went to school.
--
School was hard, of course. I was exhausted and I looked it and good old Cole had plenty to say about how I could fix my life, and good old Celia had plenty of stern looks to give me about how I was not treating my one body very well. It was all true. I didn’t talk much because there was nothing I felt at liberty to say. 
At least I had finished my logarithms. I sent Reggie a thank you text for the help he’d given me. 
At lunch I was sitting, not eating, not talking, not doing much of anything except staring at the table with a frustrated look on my face and absentmindedly twirling a strand of hair between my fingers, when approached Melody.
I was scared when I first saw her but when I looked into her eyes I felt all my fear turn into beautiful, complex, self sacrificing love.
“Hey Sam,” she spoke and her voice was sustinance. 
What a gorgeous, gorgeous girl. Her pert cheekbones, her deep brown eyes that pulled me like a wholly welcomed riptide. Take me, swallow me, drown me. Feed me to the ocean that is Melody, I will take any fate she so wishes. I lust to lose myself to her. Among the swirling whirlpool that were her ocean eyes and her lulling voice, I tried to wake up the part of my brain that knew she was a demon from the sizzling depths of hell. It batted its eyes open and smiled back at me and said, “no Sam, she’s wonderful, can’t you see her? Gosh she’s gorgeous.” 
“Hey there,” I tried to sound like I didn’t care but even I, through my unending love, could hear that I had failed miserably. 
“So I hear you’re hanging out with us tonight,” she smirked. 
“Yeah, true.” My voice was stunted, as if I was talking through a layer of mucus. I was unworthy. 
“I figured you’d want the address.” She laughed and it was angels singing Glory to God and the ringing wedding bells of a couple who had made the right choice in saying “forever.” Then she handed me a scrap of lined paper with, written in the sultriest, curliest handwriting I’d ever seen, a street number. It read:
“19036 South Patterson Street
Off 19th and Gimlin
we are all looking forward to seeing you.”
I read over it quickly, but wasted no time in looking back into Melody’s eyes. They were so perfect. I had my head resting on my hand, with my elbow resting on the table, and I sighed. I must have looked exactly as dumb and dumbstruck as all the guys I had gotten used to judging. I knew now. She had something very, very special about her. I loved her, and that was fact.
“Alright then, bye Sammy.” I loved it when she called me that. “Bye Cole,” she finished in a slightly sultrier tone than the one she used on me. I tried not to be jealous. She turned around gracefully, flipping her hair over her shoulder, throwing at me the scent of strawberries. My mouth watered. I watched her meet Carl near the door, and the two of them left the cafeteria together.
As soon as she was gone, Cole shook his head like a wet dog and squinted his eyes in disbelief. “Did she just call you...Sammy?” He asked. 
"Really, guys?" came from Celia's disbelieving mouth.
I was back, and I was too busy being pretty sure she had been tenderizing my brainmeat for slaughter to answer. 
--
I felt around in my pocket, taking the little box with the earplugs out. I opened it and put them in, and I was ready. I took a final deep breath in and out my nose, ujjayi style, and I knocked on the door of the little house on Patterson street. Within just a few seconds, I heard a loud cry of, “Coming!” followed by heavy footsteps leading to the door, and a very deep, Hamlike voice spoke. “Tell me password!” it boomed.
“It’s uh. It’s Sam.”
“Oh okay, you no need password Sam,” spoke Ham’s disembodied, booming voice. I thought this was his attempt at quietness.
The door swung open and there stood a very naked Ham. Luckily, the bits I wasn’t terribly interested in seeing were covered in fur. Very silky golden brown fur. I had to ask Ham what kind of shampoo he used on that stuff, I was jealous. Funny, that. I liked Ham the most even though he was the only one of the four who had actually hurt me. I had nearly lost consciousness when he had, you know, picked me up without my consent and carried me to the park to get naked. You can’t just go around trusting a Sasquatch who acts like that. But I felt like, from my limited knowledge of Ham, he was simply doing what he thought was best. 
“Come in, Sammy. I show you ‘round Ham hole.” Ham hole! I actually loved it. 
“Here hallway. We use to get to rest of house.” We walked (well, I walked, and Ham stomped) down a fairly ageworn but clean hallway. “Here living room. I had TV but Sven get mad, break it with fist! He say sorry but still very naughty. Now no Nintendo for anyone.” He laughed and it rattled the windows. The living room had an entertainment center that was, as Ham described, missing a TV. It still had a Nintendo 64 and a bunch of games and VHS tapes, though. What was this, 1997?
“Okay here kitchen. Whatever in fridge belong to everyone. If have thing you really not want share you write name but no promise we no get jealous make fun of you.” I laughed with Ham this time. I was mouselike in comparison to his booming, gut-based guffaw. He was doing a pretty awesome job of making me feel welcome and calming the palpitations of my murder-expectant heart. 
“Now take right please. We go down other hallway.” Ham sighed with exasperation. “Why all these hallway! Waste Ham life walk down hallway all day.” 
“Okay take left. This bathroom. This where do secret business. When finish please wash hand, Sam. No forget like Carl, please with cherry. Ham just ask one thing.” I liked Ham a whole bunch right now, so I nodded my head and smiled wholesomely. He clambered on, the top of his voluminous hair brushing the ceiling and his huge frame filling the entire hallway.
“Now we go to Ham room. This where Ham sleep. Not special.” I looked into the doorway, over Ham’s gargantuan, hairy hand that was still holding the doorknob open. There wasn’t really a bed, it was much more like a large nest. One corner of the room was covered with all colored blankets, sleeping bags, pillows, the works. There was a pile of books by the side of the nest and plenty of Christmas tree lights thumbtacked to the wall. 
“Ham, you read?” I asked, genuinely surprised. 
“Heck yeah Ham read! I running for mayor! Got to learn socioeconomic policy. My platform more trashcans! Right now, only have blue, green, and black. That very limited color pallet. Thinking of red trashcan for fire trash. Also think crime need stop, so definitely be working on that. Ham slogan, ‘Clean Up Broken Arrow!’” As he boisterously shouted his slogan, he winked and pointed in a very practiced manner. I knew where my vote was going this year.
Ham started to close the door and opened his big pink lips around big, haphazardly placed square teeth to say something else, when there was a rap on the door. “Coming!” he boomed and thumped to the front room. I followed slowly, smiling to myself, when I heard Ham’s chest-vibrating voice through the halls and walls. “Say password! Ok Sven you invited this time but next time maybe not so lucky.” So Sven had arrived.
I went out to see if it was the Sven of my thoughts, and, lo and behold, it was the very same. This was the closest I had been to him in a long while. He was almost Ham’s height but about half his size. He was quite svelt, with longish, shiny white-blonde hair (painfully Norwegian) and blue eyes as icy as the look on his face when he saw me. Was it bad that I thought puberty had done him great justice? In the past year and a half or so he had grown out of being a lanky, big eared kid and really turned into a man. I hated thinking that. But wow, actually wow. Even with that stupid holy looking grimace smeared across his face I was pretty into it. Now just to extract the parts that were rude, slimy, and full of malice (almost all of them), and take back all the times he, as a testosterone overloaded grown-up to be, had spat in my face or knocked me down. Yeah. Minus all that stuff he would be totally great to kiss. Sometimes I hated my brain. 
“Hey Sven,” I said. He rolled his eyes and shook his head minutely, brushing past me and flopping down on the couch with legs crossed on the coffee table. 
I didn’t have a lot of time to feel awkward, rejected, or upset any more than getting red in the ears, because then came a dainty knock on the door. I knew who this was. “Coming!” boomed Ham, who was already at the door. “What password!” 
I heard a husky female voice through the door but I didn’t hear what it said, and Ham opened the door to let in Melody, followed blankly by Carl. 
“Hey, Sammy,” said Melody in the same lulling voice she had used today in the cafeteria, but with far fewer ramifications. I didn’t like her again. She was hard to like, I supposed, after pretty much drugging me up with her sex hormones two days in a row. She was a wonderfully attractive girl, physically, but I wasn’t really over the fact that I’d fallen in and out of love with her several times already due to her using the same ploy she apparently used before she murdered people. I assumed that was it, now. Some sort of gross glandular excretion was at play here. I was glad, at least, that she had the power to turn off her sick talent. 
“Oh hi, Melody. Not softening me up for slaughter today? It’s nice to see you when I’m not tripping balls,” I would have said if I had had any balls to trip, whatever that means. Instead I smiled at her and I did my best to make it look like I knew what she had done and I was pleased about it. “Hello. Hey Carl.”
“Hi,” moaned Carl. If Melody turning off the freaky love mist had comforted me, looking at undead Carl undid all that. Carl was a zombie, and it was so perfectly new pair of glasses style clear to me now that it made my stomach lurch. I tried to hide the terror on my face. 
There was another knock at the door, which surprised me. I had foolishly assumed that I only had Ham, Carl, Melody, and Sven to worry about. “Coming!” hollered Ham, still standing right in the doorway. “What password?”
I, again, didn’t hear the password, but the voice behind the door was eerily familiar. “Good job!” said Ham, opening the door to...no. 
Buddy, my yoga teacher. With a bulldog under his arm. Oh my god, I had to text Aubrey.“Buddy is here and I THINK I JSUT MET CAPTAIN????” I was about to hit send when I realized Aubrey would want to know where “here” was, whether she’d be able to come next time, who else was there, why wasn’t she invited, etc. I figured this inside joke would have to just stay inside. 
I stared with my mouth open as Ham ushered Buddy, a short, muscular man with premature balding, in through the door. “Hello Sam!” he said in his calm, controlled voice. I was tapping out. What did a Sasquatch, a Siren, a Zombie, a jerk, and a yoga instructor with a dog have in common? Fuck if I knew. 
“Wow, Buddy, I didn’t expect to see you here?” The statement turned into a question as I got more confused. 
“Nobody does,” he smoothly uttered, and then he winked at me. What the hell was that supposed to mean? 
Over the next five minutes or so, six more people showed up as I got progressively more sure that I wasn't carzy and that I was currently hanging out with a bunch of mythical creatures. One was someone I thought I had seen before but wasn’t sure where, who was very pallid and drained over copper skin and had a longing expression pasted on his face. He seemed to flicker in my peripheral vision whenever I looked away but I could never catch it when it happened. He introduced himself to me as Brian and told me he was happy to meet me, that he had heard a lot. Oh boy.
Then came a lady who was impossibly pretty. She was dark skinned and had long braided black hair. There was a blush across her round cheeks and a mothering smile on her full lips. Her curvy body was shrouded in a dress the color of fresh spring leaves, that came down above her knees and displayed lovely smooth dark legs. I wanted to sit down and blink at her for the forseeable future. She looked so nice and so pretty. The entire room silenced their chattiness and watched her enter with sparkling eyes. I was surprised there weren’t collective ooh’s and aah’s. She introduced herself to me as Melia and said she couldn’t stay long, but was so very glad to meet me. I felt warm when I looked at her.
After Melia was a lady I’d seen before asking for money on the street. She was short and hunched over with an uneven tan and stringy grey hair. She literally had a hook nose with a wart on it. If I had believed in witches before, I would have been able to spot (or smell) her from a mile away. She crowed her hello and some spit landed on my face. It burned. 
Another was a small man with coppery curly hair and a mischevious grin. He wasn’t wearing green or toting a pot of gold but I knew just what the heck he was supposed to be. “Finnigan, my friend,” he said in an Irish accent. How did he get away with that?
There was also a funny guy with loose green sweats, a pink shirt, and sunglasses shaped like cats on. He had a little goatee that came to a point, a broad nose, curly hair that had some feathers and beads in it, and a friendly expression. There was something strange about the way he walked.
Finally, came a knock accompanied by an angry screech. “The worst tenant!” was the only thing I could make out among high pitched syllables. 
“Coming!” yelled Ham. “What password!” he gleefully said. I got the feeling he loved to host.
“It’s Stepan! You let me in!” 
Ham’s massive hairy smile contorted to a nervous toothy grimace. “I return soon,” he whispered, though it was still forceful enough to create a gust in the room.
As soon as Ham opened the tiny door with his giant arm, Stepan, a very round man with a terrible purplish face and a carpety tan business suit pushed his way in the door. “One of your friends parked in the red!” He screeched and my ears popped the way they do when I’m on an airplane.
“I can’t have my tenants bringing ragamuffins into their homes!” his tone was impossibly high. 
Carl sidled up to me, as well as a Zombie could sidle, and whispered slowly and rankly into my ear. “Stepan is, a Troll. Guarding is, his nature.” I laughed. I would have high fived him were I not repulsed by his rotty hand.
“Who is laughing!” Stepan nasally screeched with a look of murder on a face that could already kill. Were I brave, I would have raised my hand, but instead I let Stepan seethe. 
“I hate tenants!” he screamed. I supposed so. All I head heard of trolls was that they took their toll and then they were left alone with their property. It must have been tough for Stepan to have to deal with people all the time. If I were a gross troll I’d want time to think as well. I already wanted time to think.
After stomping his fat little feet and pointing at Ham with a threat to raise the rent (to which Ham replied, “No mister, you no raise rent, that illegal. No front like I not know laws. I gonna be mayor, ok? Ham 2012!”), Stepan begrudgingly squelched out of the house, and Ham closed and bolted the thing. “Me really hate that guy.”
The drama calmed, and Melody spoke in a businesslike tone. “Alright folks, we’ve reached quorum. I’m calling this meeting into action.” Since when was this a meeting? I thought we were just hanging out.
There was a collective groan and everyone plopped down on the various disheveled couches and loveseats in the room. I took a chair that seated one because I wasn’t sure I trusted anybody not to try to kill me, since Melia had left.
“We all know why we’re here,” she began. I almost raised my hand to object. “We have a new member! Our first vampire.” 
I groaned and muttered, “I object.”
Melody went on. “So let’s all introduce ourselves to Samhain!” I cringed at the utterance of my full name, as it was ridiculous, but at least she pronounced it correctly. Of course a Siren would know to say Sa-win and not Sam-hayn like every god damned substitute teacher I'd ever had. I mean, it didnt change that I was pissed. But at least she said it right.
“Let’s just go around and say our full name and our current form,” she smiled as comfortingly as I thought she could manage. “I’ll start. I’m Melody Stephanopolous and I’m a Siren.” I knew it! I knew it. 
Melody pointed to Carl. “Carl Hayes. I’m, a Zombie.” I pulled my lips back in an attempt at a smile, though what came out was a pre-evolutionary smile, a fearful paleolithic fang-flash. I waved a little.
“I’m Goody Sarah Corey and I’m a Witch,” spat the woman in the witchiest voice I’d ever heard, complete with a twiddling of the fingers and a nasty little moan.
“Finnigan O’Toole, the Leprechaun of the group,” came the good-natured next introduction.
“I Ham. I Sasquatch. Hi Sammy."
“Buddy! Currently a person, but tick me off and that’s a whole nother story,” said my now terrifying favorite yoga instructor.
“Dennis Hodgkins, a faun,” said the guy in the sweats. I was pretty proud that I had nailed that one.
“I’m Brian Rodriguez and I’m...I’m just a regular person,” said the forlorn guy who I thought I had seen flicker.
To that, the entire room replied tiredly. “You’re a ghost,” most of them said, with Ham trailing off at the end shouting, “Ghooooooost,” Finnigan saying “No, no, no, no, no Brian,” and Melody prefacing with “Sweetheart.” 
“I’m Brian Rodriguez and I...I’ve just heard that I’m a ghost.” A few scattered thank you’s went around at that.
Finally, it was Sven. The man of the hour. I had no idea what he was supposed to be, and still was sort of holding out hope that he was their human ambassador, or something. But who would let such a douche hang with them if he didn’t even have magic to show for it? I realized that on a bad day I might fit that "magicless douchebag" bill better than Sven, but now that I’d seen their secrets, could they even let me leave? My personal safety started feeling a lot less permanent. 
“I’m Sven Sorensen and I’m, ugh.” He paused right at the good part. “Elf.” 
Just as the laughter started to inadvertently bubble up my chest, Sven glared at me and said “Don’t you fucking dare.”
Alright, he knew me. I’d obviously changed...a lot less since ninth grade.
Graceful, graceful Melody kept the show rolling. “So now that we’ve all intorduced ourselves to you, why don’t you introduce yourself to us, Samhain!” 
“I don’t really go by that,” I said quickly.
Melody apologized and went on. “Alright, Sam. Tell us about you.”
“Um. I’m seventeen--”
“How long you been seventeen?” asked Ham.
“Like, eleven months.” I continued. “I’m in high school, gonna graduate next June. I’m pretty into music.” 
I saw some nodding of heads around the room, but Melody curbed the conversation like a true pro. “What do you eat?” she asked. 
I acted like I didn’t know what she was talking about and answered, “fries.”
“You can be honest with us,” she let me know calmly. “You’ve seen who we really are. You’re safe.”
“I’m not a vampire.” I said, surprised at how steadfast I was, even surrounded by people who could very easily kill me. But did they know that? Well. I wanted them to know that. I’d lived the last six years of my life here getting called a vampire, and the last four of them getting called a gay vampire. I was pretty used to looking adversity in its beady little eyes and correcting its shit. Sasquatches and god damned Sirens and Zombies and Witches and Elves and my yoga teacher had no right to tell me who the hell I was. “I’m not a vampire!” I repeated to make sure they all heard.
“Ham say yes you are!” said the Sasquatch joyfully, getting up off the couch and stepping to the entertainment center, where he pulled down a screen I hadn’t seen hanging there before.
“Hit lights!” he called. Someone did. “Melody, my powerpoint button? Slide show ready go?” She nodded her head and flipped a switch on a projector located on the kitchen counter. She handed him a clicker. “I be right back!” shouted Ham, running out of the room. We waited. No one spoke, not out of awkwardness but out of anticipation. About a minute later, Ham burst back into the room in a smashing navy blue suit over a light blue button down and a maroon tie. No shoes, and the suit fit too small (as these things do), but Ham totally looked like a mayor.
He looked at the screen and grunted in disapproval. “It have to warm up,” Ham reminded us. I sat dumbfounded. I knew a Sasquatch who was running for mayor and could work powerpoint.
The giant smiled as his first slide finally blurred into view. It was really precious, there was WordArt and ClipArt and animations over a simple purple to gold gradient. I wanted to hug Ham. 
Until I saw the title unfold from the left side. 
“Sam Is Vampire,” it said. The subscript said, “Here Definitely Why.” A picture of my face dissolved into view. Did he get that off Facebook? He smiled hugely from inside that dapper suit.
The second slide said, “Reason 1: No Go Out In Sunlight.” How did he know that? He touched a giant finger to the screen, illuminating half his body in powerpoint jargon, and said, “Me Interview Friend About It.” Oh, that was how.
“I object!” I said. Melody ushered me to share my thoughts. “My pupils don’t dilate right and my skin burns like crazy.” 
She laughed. “Yes, like a Vampire.” I shook my head but let Ham go on.
“Reason 2: No Eat People Food.” 
“I can’t eat a lot of things...I have a special diet.”
“Yes, like a Vampire,” reminded Melody.
“Reason 3: Pointy Teeth So Scary!” Ham gnashed his terrible teeth with this one to show how serious he was.
“They just came in that way! I went to the orthodontist but it would have been a lot of work that wasn’t necessary, I...oh, fine. Right. Like a Vampire. I went to the orthodontist! Vampires don’t go to Orthodontists!”
“You know, I had a vampire friend once, who-” began Dennis the faun, who I shushed, even though I liked him. 
Then came “Reason 4: Sam Look Just Like Vampire.” I didn’t know how this was valid evidence at all, and it was redundant, but it was true, of course. 
A picture of me dissolved onscreen. I didn't know why that had to happen when I was very clearly sitting right the fuck in front of these people. It featured me, standing by a tree. My skin was pale as could be (thanks to my Kurdish-Polish background, tendency to retreat to the internet, and photosensitivity) and my eyes were dark. Like they were. So was my hair, it's black and straight and I was keeping it at about my shoulders because I was edgy and it was easy to hide behind. I had dark circles under my eyes because that happens when you're pale and can never sleep. In this picture I was smiling and my lame crooked mouth was exposed. My front teeth overlapped a little and my canines stuck out a little. It wasn't really that noticable. 
I sighed. I had kind of wanted these people to be my friends. I was pretty sick of them right now.
Ham went on. “Reason 5: Name Samhain! (say like Sow In)” curled into view. He nodded his big furry head and said, “Samhain definitely name for Vampire.”
I hated when this one was used as an excuse. “My parents were hippies and I was born on Halloween! It seemed like a good idea at the time.” 
Melody interjected again. “Your birthday is on Halloween? I didn’t even know that! Is that your birth birthday, or was that the day you were bitten?”
I sighed. There was no convincing them. “My birth birthday.” 
Everyone oooohed. I tried to smile graciously. I supposed I was a Vampire.
--
I couldn't sleep again. Luckily, Reggie was there to talk to me. We didn't talk about the fact that I had just made a lot of supernatural friends, thank goodness. We talked about normal stuff. School, college apps, parents being intrusive. His parents were a lot worse than mine and liked to try to break into his computer and read his history. We spent a while messaging warnings to his parents back and forth in all caps. "IF YOURE READING THIS...TURN BACK NOW! OR ELSE!" 
We talked about his friends and mine. He had this friend named Michelle who had named all the dance moves from this video game, and he told me about some of them. The most popular by far, he asserted, was one called "Ooh, My Pelvis Is A Choo-Choo Train." Apparently people Reggie didn't even recognize had started to do this move. It sounded hilarious. 
I told him about Celia's new play about the time travelling Puritans. She and I both thought that time period was interesting, and I had helped proofread her play and make sure it was mostly appropriate to the time period. I had had a lot of fun doing that. Fact checking her witch hunt this and Goody that. I suddenly realized, but didn't tell Reggie, that I had just met a witch named Goody Sarah Something. Maybe, if things went well, I could ask Goody Sarah Something how old she was and maybe, if that title wasn't more than just tradition, ask her a few questions about things that were still up in the air about Celia's play. Such as, what color were the buckles on their shoes? During the witch hunts, did famine ensue because everybody was too busy freaking out to do their jobs? Can a baby be a witch? Would the reaction to a same-sex makeout sesh be more like a modern fundie, or like mind blowing confusion? These things mattered, because science. 
I told Reggie about the questions I had, just leaving out the part about, you know, potentially getting to ask a real witch. He thought they were great questions to raise.
Then, he told me he was getting his car soon, which I had been hearing about for a few months. And that he wanted to drive across the country to New York, which I'd heard him entertain once or twice. And then that he wanted to stop off in my dinky little Oklahoma town and say hello for a day. Which I had never heard. 
"that woukd be really fun," I sent. 
"fall break is coming up," he replied.
"in like 2 weeks!
thats so soon"
"i could do it though. it would work."
"ok yeah. i gotta ask my mom. youll probly have to sleep in the spare room."
"if not i could probly sleep in my car. its pretty big!"
It was pretty big. It was a hand me down minivan. He had sent me a picture of it called, "mom_van.jpg"
"ok well. i hope u get to come! ur awesome. ive gotta sleep." It was 4:28 am and I was finally ready to go to bed, a whole two hours and two minutes before my alarm was set to go off. Joy!
I can't remember what dreams I had, but I woke up feeling dread. 
--
The next Thursday at lunch I was, for yet another consecutive day, too exhausted to interact with Cole and Celia. They both seemed to be getting progressively more upset about it. Celia, always worried, was asking me if I was alright, if I was sick, if I was hungover or high (heaven forbid!). Cole was less mothering and more judgemental. I was kind of over it. Without a word, while Cole was midsentence about me needing to get control of my life, I lifted my lifeless corpe out of the seat by pressing up off the table with my hands, leaned over, hissed, "everything, is fine," and walked away. 
I left the cafeteria and went out to sit alone on the grass somewhere. There was a pretty sizeable open grassy area filled with people milling about, sitting, running. I would have liked to sit in the shade there during lunches, but Cole loved those exhauting flourescents in the cafeteria. Whatever. 
I sat down at the base of a big tree near the edge of the area and dug in my backpack for my mp3 player and my math book. It was a Joni Mitchell kind of afternoon. I pressed the play button and started working on a math problem I didn't understand. 
After about five minutes, there was a light tap on my shoulder. I looked up. It was Sven. 
I plucked a bud out of my earhole and glared up at him. The last thing I needed today was a god damned Elf deciding to break his two year beating me up hiatus. I was having a confusing, difficult day already, thanks to sleep deprivation and having recently made a whole bunch of dangerous magical friends. I might just hit the fucker. "What," I said curtly.
"Whoa kid. I just want to talk." 
Kid? Kid! The nerve. "I'm busy."
"No, listen, please?" I sighed. I was a sucker for the magic word.
"Okay fine. What."
Sven sat down next to me and gazed with furrowed brow at the ground. "So. Ham told me I should apologize. And I said no at first but then I thought about it." Whoa, wait up. Sven Sorensen, the violent football brute, thinking? Alright, I'd take it. "If we're gonna be hanging out I guess we shouldn't hate teach other."
I was pissed. It wasn't like I was filled with fiery hatred anymore. I'd had two years to calm down. But I was resentful and I wasn't really in the mood to be friends with Sven. I didn't think I'd ever be. 
We were once great friends. I'd known him from the time I moved to Broken Arrow in seventh grade. He was the first friend I'd made and the best one I'd had for a couple years. We had built lego houses together, pretended to be characters from our favorite books together, and even gone as peanut butter and jelly for Halloween the first year we were friends. It had all been so very picturesque. 
Then in ninth grade, a bad thing had happened. I was at home after school one day, having a very quaint perfect midwestern first secret same sex kiss with a cute boy from school, and Sven, who was invited over any time and didn't always have the common decency to knock, walked into my bedroom. He had been getting very tall and could have passed for 18 if he had wanted to, and had been getting pretty pissy and violent with me over the past few months. Puberty was a terrible fate, my undeveloped self had been thinking, and as I unlocked my lips from this cute boy (which had felt nice but had not really rocked my world in a sexual way yet, a la "undeveloped self,") Sven towered at least a foot and a half above me. 
He had gotten very upset and shouted, using that word I didn't like, for the first time in a series of hundreds to come. Then he'd bolted, leaving me as fast as he'd swung open that door to tell me something that he'd never quite spit out. He left me alone in my room, leaving behind a cute boy who now disgusted me, a slouching posture, and a disappointed expression. At the time I had thought he was just confused but that he'd come around.
He didn't come around immediately, though, and so I tried to make new friends. That's when I met Cole and Celia. One Wednesday afternoon I'd come to Swinerd's classroom to drop off the script for a scene I'd just finished working in her drama class. Drama club was in session, and Swinerd asked me to stay because she, "saw something in me." I didn't think she really saw anything in me, but it was part of her aesthetic image to be verily mysterious, to see a spark in people. She hadn't always been a drama teacher, we all knew. She had once been an aspiring actress, a "starlet," as she described herself. And it was apparent in the way that she helped us deliver lines, perfect our accents, and in that terrible, awful demo reel she showed whenever she got a chance. That fateful demo reel had sparked the invention of a new verb, "to swiner," usually used in the past tense, such as, "I totally swiner'd that math test, bro." It meant, of course, to fail the heck out of a thing. 
Swinerd's intimidating swinerness aside, I met Cole that day. He'd been inviting and kind and had facilitated me not feeling awkward and singlular there. That was a pretty hard thing to do, for me, but Cole had a knack. Of course, I'd later learn that he also had a pretty good knack for making me want to die in a hole, so uh. Every rose has its thorn. 
Now, Cole and Celia were best friends and I was a frequent third wheel and it was two years since I'd met them. Cole was the mascot, Celia was the vice president, and I was the treasurer of the drama club, not that there was much cold hard cash filtering through my fingers, so I wasn't really required to show up all the time. I did anyway, though, because it was where the people I knew were. 
But were the people I knew concentrated at the Ham hole now? I wasn't entirely sure, as I was still juggling my fear with my endearment toward the entire group. 
Anyhow, after about three months, my silence broke with Sven in the form of him approaching me at my locker after school one day. I thought he was there to be sorry, that he'd taken some time to think about what he'd done and that we were gonna be cool again, but that wasn't the case at all. He was a little taller, his hair was a little longer, his voice a little lower and his grimace a little deeper. I said "hi," he said "shut up," and he threw me against a locker with a strength that bruised my shoulder purple and then black and then green and then yellow, and shook my head so hard that looking back, I think I suffered an undiagnosed concussion. These injuries were easy for me to shamefully hide from my parents, but not all of them were. Sometimes he punched me in places that were obvious, and once he pushed me down outside, scraping my face on the sidewalk. 
Those had not been easy times for me. The fact that my queerness was common knowledge now, thanks to Sven, was the hardest. I'd gone from being the weird kid who everbody thought was a Vampire to being the definitely gay definitely Vampire. As often as I denied both of these false claims, I was creamed by Sven, and not in the way I maybe would have liked. Oh god.
In addition to being an outcasted gay Vampire, I was down one best friend and up one violent jock. I was starting to struggle in school for the first time ever (thanks to geometry) and my dad took a lot of convincing that I wasn't a bad person now that I was gay, forget me trying to get him to believe that I wasn't gay. My mom and sometimes Cole and Celia were the things that held me together during that time, but as much help as they offered and as consistently supportive they were in my quest to be okay, I barely remained zipped up and intact for a while.
So of course I resented Sven. He had, after all, been a pretty big catalyst in the catawampusness of my life. He'd outed me, started rumors, beat me up almost on the daily, and left me without a best friend. As much as I didn't mind Cole and Celia, Sven had been very, very different. Actually, I was sure that was part of why he was channeling his homophobic rage at me. It's all well and good to have a touchy feely guy best friend, unless he's a wretched boy kisser and you're trying to be popular. I sort of blamed myself for his preceived masculinity deficit. 
The violence had lasted for two years, with me too weak of heart to fight back once, until the last day of sophomore year. It was about to be summer so Sven was going to beat me up hard enough to satisfy him for the rest of the summer. He'd been alluding to it for the past month or so, between whatever sorts of creative rubbish he'd dreamed up to satisfy his bloodlust for that particular day. I knew to expect the worst that day and I'd almost even decided to try and bring a weapon. That would be bad, though, I had finally convinced myself. Anything short of murdering the jerk would send him back with even harder blows. Little me against giant old Sven could never work out anyhow. I resigned myself to take it and I did my best to keep the anxiety invisible from outside.
The day came that was to be the day of my demise. Sven glared at me in the hall and I wasn't even strong enough to glare black. If that sort of thing happened to me now I'd smack an Elf half to hell, but when I was a sophomore I was all about keeping a low profile. I didn't even choose flight over fight all the time, often I just stood, sat, or lay there and took it. 
As promised, the violence that day was especially brutal. He beat me up with his fists. They were harder fists than I thought a boy his size (growing every day) should have, but I didn't have a lot for comparison. Unfortunately for Sven, he sort of forgot the part about not marring my face with knuckle prints. 
While miraculously no one ever saw him in the act of pummeling me, this one left no question as to what had befallen me. I didn't trip on a curb, I didn't hit my head on a tree (I had everyone convinced at this point that I was constantly daydreaming and forgetting how to walk), I had a fist mark on my cheekbone. And my dad, after having kept quiet for what everyone agrees is too long, interrogated the culprit out of me and had Sven suspended from footbal in the school district for the entirety of his junior year. I think that tought him his lesson, though trashcans on campus did begin mysteriously going up in flame after that. 
So we can just say that we didn't end on good terms. I mean, I ended on good terms; I had my physical health and bodily safety back. It was definitely preferable not to get beat up twice or three times a week by a tall Norwegian kid with a fist of steel. Sven, not being able to channel his rage into football or queer bashing for a year, seemed to channel it into getting impossibly tall and pointy and really, really seething with rage. I mean, with him sitting beside me now, I could almost see it boiling off him like summer heat shimmers. 
Yeah. After all that utter, terrible, ruinous crap, I was sitting next to the very Sven of my waking nightmares. And I wasn't really happy with him. I was more into Joni Mitchell right about then. Joni was the only one who really got me, anyway.
"Maybe it's too late for us not to hate each other," I muttered to the awful, tall blonde guy who was towering beside me on the grass against the old tree. 
"Come on, just hear me out!" He spoke like I was acting unreasonable and I directed a disappointed gaze toward his face. "Please."
I exhaled through my teeth and did my best to let it go. "Okay. Fine. What."
"Okay, thank you! Okay. First off! I'm a god damn Elf." I mimicked surprise. "I'm like a fucking gay fruit roll up of every single gay superpower there is. I can shoot glitter. From my fingertips." He disdainfully demonstrated this, and it was impressive but I still had to try not to laugh. "Second, Sam, I went to your house that last day we were friends and it was the day I found out I was a god damn gay-ass Elf. I went home and my mom was like, 'Yeah Sven, you're a gay fucking Elf,' and what the fuck was I supposed to do then? Go to my room and be like 'Yeah!'? No, I went to my best friend's house and you were all up on that James fucker! Licking his face and shit. And here's a little fact about James, he's an asshole and you can do better, and I've wanted to say that for a long time, and now I did." 
I realized I'd been holding my breath and bracing myself back away from his increasingly exaperated frothing over. I let it go and I said, "Okay." 
"What am I supposed to do? Just be a fucking Elf and be okay with that? No way, I'm a man and I've gotta do man shit. I'm a man-ass man. Okay?"
"Okay," I repeated. I was surprised that I'd hit the nail right on the head, except about the Elf thing, of course. 
"Also, check this shit out." He lifted a lock of pale hair off his hear and exposed, true to what all folklore and legend might suggest, an ear that came to a very fey point. "Why couldn't you get the gay superpowers?" He lamented rudely.
"Hey I object, that's not fair. I didn't choose this. And I'm not gay."
"Who fucking cares about fair?" he yelled at the sky. "I win football with sonic blasts, that sounds like it should be in gay porn! Fair isn't real, you asshole."
"Wait. You cheat at football?" I was really happy about that. Sven, the football God, was a cheater. No one would ever catch him, but I knew, and that was beautiful.
"I don't have to cheat, fucker. I just want a full ride to a good school. The better I do the better chance I've got of getting out of this shithole. Don't you dare judge me for that."
I sighed and slouched. It made sense. "Okay."
"Okay?"
"Yeah. Okay."
I thought about Sven, realizing he was an Elf at the same time I realized I wanted to kiss boys, and I thought about how hard that had been for me, even though most of that difficulty had totally been his fault. At least my headfish all swam in the same direction. Sven was all over the place. What I had initially thought to be excess testosterone had, in fact, been budding supernatural powers coupled with um. Testosterone. Okay. It wasn't easy to look at Sven and think, "sure, that guy's totally not an asshole!" but I guessed, illogically, even though I realized there'd been no apology, I hated Sven a little less.
I didn't not hate Sven, but I hated him less. 
And that was progress.
--
That night, for the meeting of the mythical folk, I'd written down some questions I had bumping around my head. Because it, of course, was easier to write a list of questions I had for ghosts and witches than ones I had for Mark Twain. You know, it was always harder to think up those questions that could give me a good grade in English class.
Apart from Melia leaving after just a few minutes agian (I wrote down, "why does Melia leave so early? at the bottom of my questions page in my ugly scrawl), and Brian the Ghost not being there at all (rumors abounded that he was on a hot date with a girl he really liked. Go Brian!), the members were the same, right down to Captain, complacently carried around under Buddy's lean arm. The setup of the meeting tonight, however, was more like a seminar than the socratic circle of last week. Goody Sarah Corey had prepared for us a very nice presentation on Human Corpse Cleanup Tips and Tricks. Thankfully, she spared us the powerpoint and went straight to the facts. 
"Humans are...quite prone to accidents," she crowed in her scratchy little voice, pursing her lips and glaring intently around the room while doing her best and most ghoulish spirit fingers. You know, I liked Goody Corey, once I got past the old warts and smell. "Past" in this case isn't a measure of emotional acceptance, it's actually a literal number in feet and inches. I was at the farthest edge of the room and was perfectly comfortable here to listen to her squeak and cackle her way through a fairly aptly presented speech. "You must get rid of all traces of the murders you've inevitably committed whilst being a monster among mortals."
"In the past few decades, scientists have gotten very, very good at finding traces of death's juices upon your person, clothing, and belongings. You may be surprised to know that they can illumine these traces many months or even years after the passing of your dear friend, relative, neighbor, or meal." The tiny hunched woman was waddling back and forth across her small stage and using her arms to accentuate her sentences. 
She went on like this for some time, finally finishing by reminding us that she had all of the potions, oils, scents and incantations mentioned tonight in the shed she rented from a Jewish accountant on the outskirts of town, and that she would be happy to sell us some were we to be caught in a difficult situation. 
When she finished, there were many back pats for scary little Goody Corey and a lot more air back pats. According to Ham she was taking a public speaking course at the local community college, and that had been a practice run before her midterm presentation. Ham had suggested she take the class after completing it himself, I learned. "Me grow up in forest, parents teach me, 'when see human, rustle leaves, growl, chase, light thing on fire.' That hard social conditioning to let go. Take some speech classes when in college and me do better. Still have some social anxiety though." He explained this to me and I appreciated the sentiment, although I didn't understand how a Sasquatch with social anxiety could have weekly meetings of boisterous folks at his house or muster up the courage to run for political office. I asked him that and he answered simply. "Urge to do good more strong than urge to hide now."
I held my tongue as everyone else who had questions or comments went ahead. Dennis had a public service announcement, that the local mall's stock of sweatpants with bell bottoms was running dangerously low and everyone he talked to seemed to think they were selling off their final stock. If anyone needed a pair or two they should act sooner rather than later. This was sweatpants with bell bottoms mageddon.
I waited as Finnigan told us all that he would be taking commissions (he was, apparently, a prominent local still-life painter) in exchange for gold. "Everybody's affected by this recession," he reminded us. "Even if I didn't have betta fish to feed, there's always somethin' you need and can't afford." He stepped back to his place next to Ham (who was thunderously clapping) on the couch. 
It was my turn to ask questions, now that everyone was done. I raised my hand and Ham pointed to me and went, "Ooooh, Sam man taking stage! Ooooh!" Everyone clapped, even Sven.
"So I just had a few questions," I started quiety, slouching more than I meant to. "Like uh, Buddy, what are you?" 
Buddy laughed calmly and kindly and said, "Haha, let's hope you never find out." 
That was terrifying and unhelpful. I moved on.
"Why do you kill people, Melody?" I asked, my hands and voice starting to shake involuntarily. 
"I get hungry just like you, Vampire," she smized at me and I felt a wave of lust hit me all at once. I involuntarily flared my nostrils, closed my eyes, and rocked back on my heels. 
"Oh," I whispered and she gave my back my brain. As quickly as I'd fallen in love again, I got angry. "Melody, you have to stop doing that."
"Why, it's so fun," she said, smiling sideways before blowing me a kiss and giggling sweetly.
I was going to ask her to sing but I didn't trust her to let me live through it. I wasn't interested in being a meal, that day.
I left the rest of my questions unasked after that, because I was shaking and didn't really want everyone to be looking at me anymore. 
Instead of playing Nintendo, as, Ham reiterated, we would be doing had Sven not broke with fist, everyone simply milled around and talked. I learned that Finnigan had betta fish in lieu of Will O The Wisps, which, aside from being hard to explain if someone were to enter his home uninvited, were a pure boggart to train out of their nasty habits. He told me about a time he'd been lured by the inviting light and narrowly escaped using a combination of song, dance, and wit. His description of the phenomenon reminded me of something I'd read about angler fish and I wondered if there was a huge hidden beast behind the phantom bog lights as well. 
Carl told me that he wanted to be a physicist. I told him that he could do anything he wanted, but I thought a slightly different version of that. Namely, heaven help whichever college takes him and can't give him back. 
I realized I was hungry and didn't know how I felt about eating at Ham's house. I was fully planning on it, until I opened the fridge to see what I could see and was interrupted by Ham's big mitten closing the door for me and saying, "We no have blood if that what you look for!" I decided I should go home to eat. 
--
It was only about nine when I got home, but my parents were sitting at the kitchen table waiting for me. Misty maowed longingly and I picked her up. "Hey sweet kitty girl," I cooed before looking up at the two bewildered, angry people in chairs, one of them tear streaked. 
"Sorry," I said.
"It's okay," said my mom. "It's really okay that you were out, we just," she inhaled and it was broken like she was holding back tears.
My dad finished. "We don't know where you've been going. Between you being at school, hiding in your room, and going out at night, we haven't really seen you in weeks. We've just been talking about it."
My mom cut back in. "What's going on with you Sam? You look so sick and exhausted. Why don't your friends come over anymore?"
I tried to hide the discomfort on my face but I felt like I was failing. I realized I was hiding behind my hair and I tucked it behind an ear. I swiched and shifted my weight from foot to foot. I tried to find words to explain myself but I really didn't know what to say. I wanted them to know that I was okay (just more sleepless than usual), but I really, really didn't think it was a good (or safe) idea to tell them any details about all the supernatural havoc that was my life at that point. Or the fact that Cole and Celia, my only friends at school, probably hated me and I didn't care, that I hadn't even seen Aubrey because I'd been too unsure of Buddy's murder potential to go yoga in a week (shoulders down and back in savasana is the most vulnerable I'd ever be), that Sven and I might potentially maybe definitely be talking again, or, I finished the list of friend drama in my head, that my internet boyfriend was coming to visit and would probably hate me because I was such a scattered mess these days. Shit. I'd forgotten about Reggie. We hadn't talked in almost a week, because my sleepless exhaustion had reached a point where I wasn't really capable of mustering the energy it took to interact. I laid in bed, fully dressed, on top of the covers all night staring at the cieling and thinking about all the ways my life was in immediate danger. By now, though, if all was still going according to plan, Reggie had gotten his tan minivan. He had already gotten the OK for a cross-country roadtrip with his sister Paulette. He was coming in 2 weeks. "Hey mom and dad," I ran the situation over in my head. "I've been talking online to this guy from California. He wants to come visit. Cool?" No, laughable. 
I stood in front of my parents. They were watching every move I made and analyzing every bit of my disheveled physique. I swayed to one side slightly, looking at the floor, feeling awkward about it, looking at my parents, feeling scrutinized. Picketers I could handle, and being on the news was hilarious, but I could not deal with being watched like this. Nobody was speaking and I could feel panic rising up inside me, starting in my diaphragm and constricting everything on the way up. My mouth was dry, and I didn't know if my body was urging me to go to my room to cry or to the bathroom to vomit. My parents just looked at me. I was too tired for this. I turned to go upstairs and think about the state of my affairs. Mom called, "Oh Sam, come back. Don't go." 
Things were changing. I had to.
--
I went upstairs to see if Reggie was online. He wasn't, so I sent him a text. "can you go online? i wanna figure out you visiting," it said. He replied within a minute saying he was at dinner with a friend and would be online to talk to me within an hour. 
While I waited (not like I was waiting), I worked on homework and talked to Sven. I would have just worked on my homework, but Sven had sent me an add request and a message and I felt amiable-ish enough towards him to reply. 
Sven said, "Hey, can we be friends on here?" 
I said, "Yeah."
He said, "That's good." He was working as hard as a Sven could work on extending that olive branch.
"Thanks for listening to me today," he sent.
"I'm good at that," I sent back.
"I realized I didn't say
ugh.
sorry"
"For what?" I asked. I figured if he would own up, then I'd be okay.
"you know for what u jerk"
"idk, you've done so much terrible shit since i've known you"
"all of it
i'm sorry for everything"
"go on"
"sorry for beating you up a lot
and hating you 
and telling everyone you were gay
which you are
but sorry"
"i'm not gay"
"who cares. do you forgive me"
"okay."
"thats a relief"
"i bet all that was hard to say
took a lot of thinking"
"you bet your gay ass"
"thank you for everything except the last part"
"lol your welcome"
I stopped replying after that, not because I didn't want to talk to Sven, but because I didn't have anything else to say. I was shocked and happy he'd want to further his apology. I thought, maybe, with this turn of events and the space I'd been able to get, maybe we could try to be friends again. I'd keep in mind that he was a total douchebag who was capable of creating lots of physical pain. But I'd let him be a part of my life because I wasn't like Sven. I was a cool-ass guy. 
I worked on my horrible, horrible math problems and listened to music for a while. Then, just about 45 minutes after he texted me, Reggie came online.
"Hey bub!" he sent.
"What's up friend?"
"Nothin. Just ate like SO MUch food. endless sushi man i tell you what"
"haha jealous. i havent eaten yet...all day oops"
"okay i'm not even gonna talk to you until you send me a picture of you eating a sandwich!  haha"
"haha fine i'll get something to eat"
"...
that's me not talking to you till you're eating a damn sandwich ;)"
I propelled myself out of my desk in the rolling chair and pushed to stand up. I stretched my arms over my head and yawned as I walked out the door. Misty said "brrp?" from the bed and I went back and scooped her up to go downstairs for food.
I hoped my parents were somewhere else, but as I qietly reached the bottom of the shady stairs, cat underarm, I could hear them talking from around the corner.
"Honestly, I think he needs therapy. He looks so sick and sad all the time, and he never eats or sleeps," my mom said in her caramelly soft lull of a voice.
"He's just growing up, Mina. I'm sure he's okay," said my dad. 
"Kids who are okay don't spend that much time alone." My mom's voice broke at the end. Misty squirmed out of my grasp and sauntered into the kitchen. "Hey Misty girl," said my mom.
"I did at that age. He's having a hard time but he'll be fine." Dad talked like what he was saying was the final word. I don't think he meant to, but he did. 
"He's having a hard time and we have great insurance, so maybe we should get him a thera--oh Hello, Sammy!" I'd had enough and shown myself.
"Your old dad and I were just talking about you."
"Okay."
"How are you sweetie?" She looked tired too. She was the one who had given me the genes to wear my exhaustion on my sleeve all the time. Even so, though, and even with her age, she was a gorgeous lady. I don't know how she spat out a snaggletoothed monster like me when she had a face like that. It was heart shaped and her features were perky. A long nose that turned softly up at the bottom, full sloping lips, big eyes, almost black. Her hair was black too, but not straight like mine, it was voluminous, long, with big curls and little grey streaks all throughout.  Her cheeks were naturally a little pink and her lips were naturally a little red. Her body was plump and curvy. I used to sit in her lap and pull little locks of her hair and say "pretty mommy." I still thought that, even though I kind of wanted her to leave me alone.
"Yeah, I'm fine." I smiled and I felt its insincerity.
"Sam, we were thinking," my dad began with furrowed brow. He was the genetic explanation for my straight hair and long body type, and half the reason I was so pale (the other half being a mixture of my mom and my life choices). His parents were Polish immigrants and he looked it. Tall, sharp, blonde, and severe. A little like Sven but a few inches shorter, a bit thinner, with a more sensible complexion, and, of course, 100% less of a douchebag. Maybe 99% less. "We were thinking you might like to go see a therapist. We want to do what's best for you, and if that is talking to someone who isn't us about what's going on, we support that and will help you as much as we can." My mom looked at him a little bit skeptically. I'd be skeptical too if my good idea had just gotten stolen.
"Okay," I said. I figured it might actually be a good idea to unload some of this on somebody who was getting paid not to be shitty to me. I'd have to change a few details I suppose. 
"Alright sweets. I'm proud of you," said my mom, beckoning me with her hands for a hug. I gave her one and she smelled like my childhood.
"I'm gonna find some food," I said. "I haven't eaten."
My mom sighed and tearfully said, "Okay." It was menopause time for her and she hardly ever stopped crying. 
On the way to the fridge, Misty asked for me to pick her up again. "I'm gonna have to start taking you everywhere with me," I whispered to the pretty long haired grey kitty, throwing open the door to the fridge and looking at the sparse, sterile drawers. A leek, some carrots, unfinished mashed potatoes, cranberry juice. The cabinets were pretty routinely not well stocked as well, there was some rice and were some boxes of things I'd have to cook if I was interested in eating them. I was not interested in eating them. The freezer had a frozen spinach Paneer thing, though, so I threw it in the microwave and went back to the table with Misty. 
"I think she needs a leash," I lamented. She deserved to go outside. 
"Would it make you feel better if Misty had a leash?" ased my dad oddly.
"Well, yeah." That's what I had just said. 
We were quiet for a moment. The microwave went off and I put Misty down with a mrrp, grabbed my food and a fork, scooped her back up and went upstairs. 
"heeey sorry," I sent Reggie.
"that was a while
what did you do, roast a duck?"
"no i just talked to my parents 
they want me to see a therapist i guess"
"hey i see a therapist. its been totally helpful"
"yeah i'm thinking about trying it. could sort out my life a little.
anyhow what's your plan for visiting?"
"oh yanno. its kind of up in the air right now. we'd be leaving LA probably friday afternoon and trying to get to new york by tuesday. just so we could have some days there before we came home you know"
"yeah totally"
"well if we come stay with you on like saturday night, we could hang out till sunday afternoon and then pauline and i can head out from there. do you have plans that weekend?"
"none except seeing you!"
"alright awesome. i'll plan on that then. cutie."
I liked him. "awesome. i've got to do so much homework now though so i'll talk to you later."
"alright... cant wait to really catch up
xoxo"
"xo"
--
I decided the next night to try to tackle a yoga class. It was mostly because Buddy'd said something in passing at the meeting the previous night about how he missed his favorite yogi, and my heart had jumped into my chest and I promised him I'd be there. There was something uncanny and horrible about Buddy these days. His smooth, calm tone now seemed calculated and necessary. I was sure he was right when he said I didn't want to know what he was. But also, the unknown classically set me into a panicked tizzy. Many a sleepless hour lately was consumed with an image of a gloopy alien with slimy, grey teeth and a manical screech ripping out of the skin Buddy used as casing. It wasn't always an alien, though. Sometimes I tried to calm my mind by convincing myself that Buddy was a merman, that maybe he grew a tail when he got wet and maybe he was embarrassed about it like Sven was about being an Elf, or maybe he didn't want to tempt us rowdy teens into moistening him. That was my go-to lately. I only knew one of every beast and I figured there was some natural or imposed order to that. I didn't yet know a merman. 
More often, though, Buddy's unknown true form could not satisfy me as being a mermaid, and I lived in fear of what he might be. Boggart? Orc? Could Orcs shapeshift? How was I supposed to know, I was a shy seventeen year old music nerd. I didn't know any of this crap.
Harder than I worked to keep myself half-believing that Buddy was a merman, I worked to keep my mind from even letting itself stray to the idea of "Werewolf."
It would make sense, right? I'd never fully entertained this idea but the thoughts in my head were fully formed about it. Werewolves were a staple of mythical zoology. I had to know at least one. They were supposed to change only on the full moon, which I guessed would make sense, as Buddy seemed like he was usually a human. The thing that I feared though, was that it wasn't limited to the full moon. Maybe it was a rage-based thing and that was why everything he said was so premeditated, why he spent so much time practicing presence, relaxation, breathing. Yoga was the ultimate mechanism to count to ten and calm down. As you lengthen up, let something go, and as you extend over, soften into acceptance. Buddy frequently would give little inspiring speeches while we were in difficult strength poses or sitting very still. He would say that before he had found yoga, his life was a mess. But now he knew that there was simply no reason to hate, no reason at all to harbor anger or resentment. Typical Werewolf, I thought, before realizing that I did a lot of "typical Vampire" things and look where it had gotten me. Then Buddy would remind us to wrap our outer upper arms in or tell us to think about his relaxed little bulldog. And what was his thing with his dog! Maybe Werewolves forged stronger bonds with dogs than regular people, or something. 
Buddy wasn't really somebody I wanted to piss off, and not knowing what he was ("merman, merman," I said to myself) made me terrified of what he could be. I'd stayed away from yoga because I knew I was going to slouch up into my shoulders and he was going to come up and touch them with his scary hands and pull them down, exposing my neck. I hadn't really been into that idea. But also, having been specifically invited by Buddy to yoga meant I couldn't stay home this time without blowing my cover. Of course, Buddy couldn't know that I was scared. That felt dangerous. I didn't want to hurt his feelings; I didn't want to make him mad and therefore catalyze his transformation into a scaly Lizard monster. 
And, I admitted, I didn't hate the guy. He was my favorite yoga teacher. There were two others whose classes I frequented. One was a tiny litle woman named Kristie who did too much cardio. I prefered the slow stuff, maybe a vinyasa blend, but nothing that could be compared even remotely to Zumba. Kristie was great at Zumba-ing up her classes and therefore removing the relaxation and class from them. She pranced around in thin yoga pants and tiny expensive athletic tops, not giving anybody enough time to even get comfortable in a pose before she pulled us out and into another. Her classes were my least favorite but sometimes I went to them if I was in the mood to really kick my own ass.
The other option for instruction other than Buddy was old Steve. He was ancient and snarky and into long stretches. He was fine at making my body feel good, but I usually left feeling like someone had been making fun of me. 
Buddy was the best teacher and not a terrible guy. I'd never found fault with him before I knew he was an unknown mysterious murderbeast, and I shouldn't find fault with him now. After all, my favorite person these days was not a person at all but a Sasquatch. And if a Sasquatch could have a liberal political agenda, Buddy the monster could teach the heck out of some yoga.
And that he did that evening in class. Other than the fact that I had to try harder than usual not to laugh at his Captain references (and I did start giggling at one point), I really had a good class. Aubrey was there as well, which was nice. Before class started she quickly told me she was glad to see me after having been so busy the last few weeks, and then started talking about the date she'd had last night.
"You know, he's kind of weird, but I like him. He's pretty cute, you know, and super sweet. He's kind of weird though, like he swore he had made a reservation at the restaurant we went to last night but they totally couldn't find him on the list and we had to wait for like, 45 minutes. And he went to the bathroom for like, the entire first half of a True Blood episode and he wouldn't answer me, so I went to check and when I came back he was sitting on the couch. Super weird right? But I like him. He's so sweet."
"Whoa, I know that guy," I said.
"You do? Oh my God, you know Brian?" she chirped. 
"Always looks kind of sad?" I asked.
"Yeah, it's super weird, right? But he's totally cute."
I decided not to tell her the truth about the ghost she was dating. "He's a good guy, Aubrey."
"How do you know him?" She pushed. 
"He's friends with somebody I know." I knew that'd be enough for her.
"Oh wow, that is so awesome. So did I tell you about the cats?" 
"Noooooo."
--
I started sitting with Melody, Carl, and Sven. I didn't know that they sat together, probably because I had gotten used to trapping myself in the cafeteria at every lunch, but they did. Outside in the comfortable shade of a big, reddening tree on the edge of the campus. Not the same tree I'd had that conversation with Sven under, but one just as comfortable. I liked being there because I liked them. They may not have been the friends I'd dream up, but I got them and they mostly got me too. Old Carl may have been clammy and smelly, but he was kind and genuine and self-sacrificingly helpful. Melody may have had me on edge in fear that she'd exhaustingly ruin my emotions again, but she was in control and had unrivalled sanity. The things Melody said were smart all the time and she always made sense. I liked having her around to calm my fears, I'd noticed. She kept me in reality when all else made me want to expect the worst, and usually craziest. Sven was Sven, but he was...Well, I didn't know anything that I liked about him. He was trying. He was pretty. 
None of them ate at lunch except Sven, who ate a lot. He always ate his school lunch and sometimes asked Melody or Carl or now, me, for ours as well. Of course, Carl's food of choice was brains. Melody, too, didn't eat school lunches, as her thing was eating the other parts of humans. But, they assured me, they could both live on raw meat and enjoyed plenty of prepared human food, though that was purely for taste, and they preferred it that way, as it was murder free. At least human urder free, Melody had laughed. Then she'd nodded her head in my direction and I smiled like I totally got what it was like not to be able to eat human food. I'd smiled toothily like I definitely felt that hustle. 
Sven ate and ate and ate. Honestly, his embarrassment about being an Elf just made it more convincing that he was a regular old hateful football player. Shoveling food into his mouth with that nasty grimace still pasted on. If you could forget about the fact that he was hanging out with a stoner (Zombie) and queer (Vampire), he was definitely hanging out with the hottest girl in school (fucking literal man-slaughtering fucking Siren). He didn't hang out with the other football players, but who would? Our school boasted both the most violent and fridge-like football team in the state, and the one with the least wins. Sven had been a saving grace in sophomore year, and again this year, but even he, even Sven with his superpowers, with his sonic blasts, yes even old Sven who'd already been scouted and offered a place at Oklahoma State for next year, couldn't lead his team to consistent victory. He had other friends and rightly so, who wouldn't?
The second day I sat with the monsters, the following Monday, Melody and Carl and I were planning on going homecoming shopping after school. The dance was the next weekend and Melody was just so excited to pick out a dress. Carl felt pressured into cheuffeuring and he had langudily begged me to come along. "Melody is, so hard, to shop with," he'd whispered as if he had experience with this. 
"Sure, I'd love to," I committed, just as I realized it was Wednesday and I'd have to ditch Cole and Celia for drama club that day. I was very quickly severing all that held me to them and it scared me a surprising amount to think about, so instead I thought about homecoming. Would that be a fun thing to do? I'd never gone, never even had the urge to go to a school dance before. This cognitive redirection didn't work very well, though, and I thought about Cole and Celia again. I didn't care about us growing apart now because I was sitting with my real friends, who actually liked me and were legitimately cool. But I couldn't help but feel like I was being a jerk to them.
As if cued onstage by the script that had to be leading my ridiculous life, Cole appeared. Well, not appeared, that was Brian the Ghost's job. Cole walked up to where I was sitting. I went to meet him, holding up my sweater covered arm to block the sun from my face. 
"Why aren't you hanging out with us?" He asked, more loudly than he should have, thanks to his background in musical theatre. I shushed him. "No, no what's happening to you, Sam?" He hollered.
"Nothing!" I felt suddenly more tired now that he was here, doing his subconscious best to stretch me so thin under the harsh unnatural lights that were his judgemental tendencies.
"Suddenly you're hanging out with other people and I didn't even get the memo! And why are you eating outside?" 
"Because it's nice out and my friends are here." I spoke more patronizingly than I meant to, but that was obvious, I felt.
"You don't even like being outside, last I checked." He crossed his arms and frowned at me.
What was this about? "Do too, when the sun's not in my face," I told him.
"Why have we been eating in the cafeteria for two years, then?" He sounded really upset, even though we both knew it had been his idea to eat in the cafeteria for the last two years. Had it been?
Call me stupid, but I really needed help figuring out what this had to do with anything. I didn't even think Cole actually liked me. I voiced this confusion. "What?"
"Why have we been in the cafeteria for two years? Me and Celia used to sit outside and then you came along, all pale and sun scared! We started sitting inside for you!"
Ohhhhh. That was it. Well, I sure felt like a jerk.
"I'm sorry. I thought that was your thing," I mumbled.
"No, that was not my thing," he said sarcastically and with disproportionate anger to the actual crime committed here.
"I think you're making a big deal-" he cut me off before I could finish.
"Maybe I am but I'm mad, Sam! You haven't talked to me in weeks and now you're not even sitting with us! And since when are you friends with these people?" He gestured to the monsters, who were all three standing back and letting the drama unfold. At this gesture, though, Sven sort of lurched at Cole, who took a startled step back. I made a mental note to thank Sven later.
"Well, when you're ready to make sense, Celia and I will be outside somewhere." Cole finished this and turned around to leave. Before he left, though, he finished with a staccato sentence. "Don't bother coming to drama club." He was out of my sight in a matter of seconds.
I stood paralyzed for a minute, and then I took a deep breath and sat back down. I was still for a minute, Melody and Carl moving in close and asking if I was alright, and then,
I started crying.
As soon as it started, it became as much about embarrassment as it was about anything else. Sure, people I kind of liked now hated me, I was running on an accumulative 9 hours of sleep for the past two weeks, and my life was out of control, poor me. But I was crying in front of people and that was the real bad news. 
I only actually cried for a moment but it felt like much longer. I slow motion wiped tears from my face and sniffled as Melody, Carl, and, oh God, Sven (Who, for all his might and hard work had never seen me cry) sat and watched me with wide eyes.
There was a kind thumping on my back from Carl. I wanted to just run away and let that be the end of it, of everything. But I stayed. There's this thing that happens with people when you, selfishly, do embarrassing things like cry in front of them. It's called, "there's nothing you can do that won't make you look like an ass." You can run away and have people grudgingly think they need to follow you. You can tell people to go away and mean it, and have people think you're emotionally volatile and a jerk. They'll come and check on you because they think that's what you're secretly asking. Either way you seem like an unstable asshole. Don't cry in front of people, is what I'm saying.
Anyhow, old Carl gave me a pat on the back and I sniffled and said, "Thanks."
"You know, I sometimes get, stressed out, too," said old Carl. 
--
That day after school, after I'd had plenty of afternoon to deal with myself (and also a nap in study hall) Carl and Melody and I went homecoming shopping.
Never having been to a dance before, I wasn't sure how this worked or even really what people wore, but I figured I'd learn. And learn I did, when Melody took over an hour to pick which of three dresses she wanted. "This one's red, and I do love red," she said charmingly. "But this one's got ruffles! And that one's sparkly." Her voice was still charmingly like crimson but it had a decidedly different texture now that she liked me. Something like happiness and humor. 
"Why don't you get, a sparkly, red dress, with ruffles?" asked daft old Carl in his best attempt at quippiness. 
"No, Carl, that would be tawdry," said Melody in a jokingly motherly way. 
"Oh, fine, fine," moaned the Zombie flippantly. 
Melody eventually picked the ruffly one, which was a sort of puce, though puce didn't do it justice, as it was a perfectly nice color that complimented Melody's olive complexion quite well. After she had quite settled into her choice, we went to the men's section of the department store to "get [me] inspired," as ever beautiful, social, up to date Melody suggested. This section of the trip was entirely to give me ideas about what I might want to wear to homecoming (which I wasn't even sure I was going to attend). Carl didn't need to shop; he already had something at home he could wear. Where was home for Carl? I'd asked him, wondering if Zombies lived in caves or dumpsters or the city landfill or perhaps in self-dug holes. He'd given me the same look I tended to give people when they asked me when I "decided to be gay," and told me he still lived with his mom. "I wasn't, born, a Zombie, Sam," he'd sighed.
The racks Melody steered us to were full of stupid looking button downs in all manner of muted colors, tired looking slacks, ugly shoes. Living in smalltown Oklahoma really knocked out a lot of high fashion options. This stuff looked like the kind of business casual attire people wore to car rental jobs. I wasn't into it. "I'll just buy something online," I found myself saying within the first minute of standing still on the pathway, too uninterested to even page through the racks. "I've got something at home. I'm not even going to the dance." Melody nodded her head and Carl grunted a laugh, and we all turned around quickly and went back to Carl's van at a Zombie's pace. 
As Carl was the only one of the three of us who had a license, he was charged with shepherding us. I trusted him as a driver, only because I don't think he ever topped 20 miles per hour. It could have been his disheveled old van, which didn't have a shiny paint job, just patchy primer in dark grey and then in globs of tan and forest green and blue over still-visible graffiti. I thought, though, it was probably just that he was a slow sort of guy. 
He asked us what we were up to that night, and Melody said there was nothing, so I said there was nothing too. I was, in all honesty, planning on going home and asking my parents about the whole Reggie situation that night, as it was inching closer each and every day, and I was still sort of holding out hope that he and Pauline would be able to stay with us for a night. I thought about it and got anxious, though, so I figured my body was telling me to hang out with Carl and Melody for a while. 
"Wanna go see Ham?" sang Melody. Carl nodded and turned on his right turn blinker, roughly 500 feet before the next turn. 
We took three right turns then, because Carl didn't turn left. Which was interesting, because the Ham hole was to the right of where we originally were. We were going the wrong way, now. I didn't say anything. 
In about five minutes we pulled into the parking lot of a coffee shop. Ah, so we were stopping for ice blended beverages before we went to Ham hole. I didn't generally drink coffee; I could and did stay awake perfectly fine without it. But they had lemonade so I was complacent. 
We walked into the samie corporate branch. It smelled the same as every other location and it featured the same logo I'd gotten used to after years of existing in the world. Behind the counter, baristas wore the same green aprons I'd seen a hundred times before on a hundred different people. The three of us walked to the back of the long line and continued chit-chatting. Well, Melody and I chit-chatted but Carl had trouble keeping up. I was going to have to learn to match Carl's pace the same way I'd learned not to use sarcasm around Aubrey, who tended not to laugh but just to get confused. 
Then, I heard a voice I knew. "Big Soy Vanilla Latte?" it called. "This one for Jean? Jean Blue Jean? Big Latte?" I gasped and laughed as literal tears of joy started to fill my eyes. Ham was such a winner. "Nobody gonna claim this latte?" 
I stepped out of line so I could see Ham. He was gargantuan behind the tiny counter and his apron was a doll's apron over the same turtleneck he'd worn to his "kidnapping Sam" party. He wore a dinky hat on his head and a fake smile on his toothy face. "Okay, I gonna count to three and if Jean not claim latte I give to first person who know name of local congressperson." 
Jean didn't claim her latte and, alas, nobody knew the name of their local congressperson. I did, her name was Carol Foster, but I didn't really want Jean's big latte and I didn't really want to call attention to myself. Ham was very dissapointed so he downsized to ask the name of the mayor. I knew the answer to that, too, it was Mayor Schmoverlord. He was strange and nobody liked him. Somebody got that one and Jean's latte was redistributed. 
Carl and Melody were close to the front of the line now, talking about homecoming again. "I'm gonna dance like this," Melody said, dropping back slowly enough for Carl to catch her. "We're gonna twist and shout like no other," she laughed. 
Carl moaned. "I don't, twist, and I try not to, shout," he said. "That's Ham's job." Then he laughed and it sounded like an upset donkey. I was so happy to see them lollygagging. It reminded me of Cole and Celia except that they were genuinely nicer people despite being driven to murder. 
It was our turn. "Hey, welcome, what do you want?" muttered a girl with dead eyes. Melody ordered an espresso con panna (lots of homework that night, she sighed), Carl a blended caramel thing, and I just got a lemonade. I paid for the three of us since Melody had just purchased a dress and Carl needed his cash for gas money. We sat down to wait for our drinks. 
It seemed Ham hadn't seen us before, because when he saw the three cups in a row with our names on them, I saw his head snap up and watched him scan the room for us with squinted eyes. He finally saw us and waved heartily, the smile on his lips turning genuine instantly. 
"Friends! I on break soon, you wait?" He hollered. All of us gave him a thumbs up at the same time. It was magical.
--
Ham's break was about ten minutes later, and he suggested we take a short walk to the park across the street. Throwing his hat and apron down on the ground, he told us, "I really not like working there."
"Why do you, then?" I asked. 
"Lost old job as assistant to lawyer. Recession say, 'assist own damn self!' and now Ham have to pay bills somehow. Good thing, have affordable mortgage and lots of pretty good suit for when get to be Mayor."
I smiled. "I like how you look in that apron though. It's very fetching."
"Lots of thank yous, Sammy. Not customer fault they not know good coffee if it bite on butt. Ham know good coffee. Ham try to make good coffee at work one time but instead made machine spray boiling water on face. Had pourover at home, but lost it in Great Porcelain Breakening of 2012 thank yous to best friend Sven." Ham sighed and added. "Sven just need support network." 
I thought that, too.
The four of us sat around for another fifteen minutes and Ham let us know he had to get back to work. We went back to Carl's beat up old van and he painstakingly drove me home.
--
When I got into the house, I threw my bag by the door and shuffled my shoes off as Misty came up to me, purring. I picked her up and kissed her on the head, carrying her into the kitchen, which was empty. I was famished, I had realized that as soon as the lemonade hit my empty stomach at the coffee shop. 
I went to the fridge to, happily, find it fuller than the last time I'd looked in there. There was a bunch of stuff I liked. Mac and cheese, even! I opened up the tub and pulled out a piece of pasta with my fingers. Oh yes. Could use microwaving though. I popped it in for a minute.
As soon as there was noise, my dad came out of his bedroom. "I got you something," he said. 
"Really?" I smiled, greedily opeing the microwave door with 14 seconds left on the clock and laying into the food with my fork. Dad handed me a package. Taped to the front was a little business card that said "Family Guidance Counseling," an address, and then on a dotted line, "Samhain Clark, 5:30pm Thursday, October 24." Inside the package was something called a "follow me leash for cats." 
"Thanks, Dad." I wished that appointment wasn't exactly during the weekly meeting with my friends, but I figured I could miss one week and not have my Vampire rights revoked. I sighed. No Vampire rights to revoke. There was no damn way they wouldn't find out at some point or other. 
"You're welcome, son."
--
"Have you gotten your Homecoming ticket yet?" asked Melody for the second time that day as I finished putting sunscreen on my face for good meaasure. 
"No, I don't even know what day it's on," I said. 
"Saturday! Saturday. I have told you a hundred times, it's Saturday," she said. 
"I don't even have a date," I sighed. If Reggie lived here, he could be my date, but I didn't want to go alone. I couldn't wait till he visited on Saturday.
Oh shit.
"I have to make a call," I said as I walked a few feet away and pulled out my phone. I dialed Reggie's number. 
"Hey, I'm between classes," he said quickly, his voice bouncing in a step-like syncopation.
"I just wanted to know if you'd. Um. Will you go to homecoming with me?" I spat out before the nervous quake in my voice kicked in.
"Oh. When is it?"
"Saturday."
"Yeah, I'll pack something nice."
"Awesome. Have a good day."
"You too, bye."
I went back to where my friends were sitting. They were talking, but I saw all three of them raise eyebrows and look skeptically when I returned, and they were quiet.
"I'm going to homecoming. I have a date." 
Melody and Carl started clapping, her hands making quick, light noises and Carl's thumping sluggishly. "Who is it?" she asked in a gossip-ready fashion.
"Oh, just a friend of mine. You don't know him."
"We will," said Carl with...what was that, a smirk? A pallid grey smirk. 
Sven didn't say anything. He just looked at me with a little more than his usual rage. 
--
Tonight was the night I had to ask my parents about Reggie. I'd put it off for way too long, and now homecoming was in three days and they didn't even know I was going. My poor mom didn't even know I was going to the dance and I owed it to her. I decided I'd stop home before the meeting, which seemed to usually get going at around 5:30. 
I dropped my backpack on the front step and dug around for my key. Before I found it, however, my mom opened the door. "Hey Sammy," she said. "I heard you out there." She had a warm smile on her face. I straightened out and opened the door wide enough to let me in, but before I could close it back up, Misty darted out through the narrowing opening and hid under the bushes.
"Kitty girl, come here bad smelly cat," I said, reaching under the bushes and brushing just her tail before she moved out of the way of my hand and started licking the trunk of one of the bushes. "Come here Misty baby," I cooed. 
I eventally led her out one side of the bushes, where my mom was waiting to pick her up under the arms, hold her up, say, "You bad little thing!" and kiss her on the head. We went inside. 
"So mom, I wanted to ask you something," I said quietly and nervously. 
"Of course!" She sounded excited. I hadn't really "asked her something" in a while, I realized.
"So," I started. "Homecoming is on Saturday." She nodded slowly, with wide dark eyes. "I want to go." 
A huge smile graced her full lips. "That sounds great, Sam. Are you going with Cole and Celia?" 
I took a deep breath and meeped, "No. I was hoping I could go with my friend Reggie." 
"That sounds alright. Have I met Reggie?"
"Nope. I haven't either. He lives in California."
My mom, having very little knowledge of the internet past e-mails of funny dog pictures and news reports about cute internet boys like Reggie actually being 50 years old and into child porn, instantly hardened. Her expression inadvertently showed her distaste the same way mine did, with her lips pulling down and her eyebrows furrowing a little. "I don't know about that, Sam."
"Why not?" I asked quietly.
"You don't know who he could be," she said. But I did know who he was.
"I've talked to him on the phone. I've heard his voice. I've video chatted with him before. I literally know exactly who he is."
"They can fabricate that. Look, honey, I'm just worried about you. The internet is really dangerous." There was no way to convince someone who didn't know about the internet that it was mostly safe. The truth was, I'd talked to scary people before, I'd been in situations where I knew someone had malicious intentions or wasn't who they said they were. Everyone who spent hours a day on social networking sites had. There were signs. Those people tried to get you to talk sexy with them the day you met them, they were secretive about their identities, they wanted to hang out but didn't want to talk on the phone first, they said things about themselves that didn't make sense. Their stories didn't add up to a convincing person. Once you were talking via webcam with someone there wasn't much ambiguity left. I'd known Reggie for almost a year and I could say with all logic behind me and no wishful thinking, that he was exactly who I thought he was. 
I got an idea. "Come here, Mom. Come upstairs with me." 
She nodded her head again, looking skeptical but getting up. I picked up Misty, she made a contented noise like she tended to do.
We got to my room and I had my mom sit in the desk chair while I knelt next to it and hit the space bar on my computer a bunch of times. 
The login screen came into view and I clattered my password on the keyboard, which I'd scooted over to my side of the desk. The speakers made a welcoming little noise and I was in. I double clicked the chat icon, my mom sitting silently in wait. Reggie was online, as he tended to be this time of afternoon. "hey reggie will you say hi to my mom?" I asked. 
"oh sure...hi ms. clark!" 
My mom groaned a little and said, "Why does he know your last name?"
"We're friends on Facebook," I said. Duh. 
I typed to Reggie. "can you vidceo us? she thinks you're a hairy old man."
"i'm offended!" 
"I never said that!"
A ringing sound came out of the speakers and an icon appeared on screen. I clicked the accept button and Reggie's face showed up on the screen, larger than life on my big monitor, though I guess I couldn't prove that.
"Hey, Ms. Clark!" he said. His voice was slightly distorted and his face was sort of blurry, but it was obvious that he was a teenage boy and not a scary old man. 
"Hello," said my mom. "Can he see me?" she whispered. "Can you hear me?" 
"Yes I can, loud and clear," said Reggie enthusiastically, smiling and showing off white teeth and dimples.
My mom was trying to hide her smile. "So you want to take my son to his homecoming?"
"I do, ma'am." He was so good at this talking to parents thing. I was terrible at it. I usually hid awkwardly and quietly from my friends' parents. Reggie's extroversion was saving my life right now. How high school did that sound? My internet boyfriend was buttering up my mom so he could take me to the dance. Life = saved. That my existence revolved around homecoming and cute boys was a funny thing to think, especially since my impermanence had been hitting me pretty hard lately in the form of undead and superstrong new best friends. 
"Okay then, Reggie. You can do that. You've got to come over and let me take pictures first. Don't want Sam's first dance to go undocumented." she smiled as Reggie's face turned into surprise.
"You've never been to a dance before?" he asked, loud enough to distort the sound quite a bit.
"I'm shy! I don't have any friends!" I lightheartedly defended.
"Haha, alright," said Reggie jokingly. 
"Okay, I'll leave you boys to it," said my mom, getting up out of the chair and pulling it out for me.
"Actually I've gotta go somewhere," I said. 
"Ah, where?" Asked Reggie.
"New friends all hang out on Thursdays! Bye Reg. See you soon!" 
"Bye!" he said. He blew a kiss and his face disappeared from the screen.
"Who are your new friends?" asked my mom. Right, I hadn't even mentioned Ham and the gang to my parents yet. I supposed while I was telling her about Reggie, I might as well tell her (a few things) about my new eclectic group of friends.
"Uh. I've been hanging out with these kids from school and some of their friends."
"I should have known about this before right now," she said evenly.
"It's been hard to talk to you. I've been worried about Reggie, and too tired, and Cole and Celia have been being weird and I didn't even know if I really liked these new people," I sort of word-vomited. 
My mom inhaled deeply, exhaled deeply, and said, "Okay. Well, what are they like?" 
"Um, they're really genuine. Sort of. There's Melody, she goes to my school, she's a S...such a cool girl." I smiled to myself. "She's really into girly stuff. Carl is kind of quiet but he's very nice. We have English together. Umm," who to mention next. "They have this friend Ham who is older and works at a coffee shop. He's got a house and I've gone over there a few times. He's running for mayor." I added the last part to try and paint a picture of Ham that wasn't "delinquent barista." He was literally running for mayor. 
"Wow, your friend is running for Mayor! Do you think he'll have a chance against rotten old Schmoverlord?" In general, Schmoverlord's approval ratings were very low. He'd been elected as mayor for many consecutive terms, but nobody I knew had ever voted for the bastard. He was against pretty much everything that was good, and seemed dreadfully disorganized. He frequently made local news by reading his speech cards out of order or saying things like "who cares about education when there are minor traffic violations to persecute?" He had openly spoken out againt gay rights, babies, animal safety, airports, the arts, caffeine, the president of the United States, candles, linoleum, and baked goods to name a few. Nobody really understood what his deal was. 
"Yeah, I really think Ham's awesome. He has some great ideas about trash cans." I sat down on the bed. "There's also uh. Sven."
"The Sven?" asked my mom. I was really sending her on an emotional roller coaster ride this evening. 
"Yep. He's still a jerk but he said he was sorry. I'm giving him another chance." A very tentative chance.
"I could never give someone like that another chance. You and Mother Theresa should hang out!" She chuckled. I did, too. Little did my old mom know that I would be past the point of even being surprised if Mother Theresa's reanimated corpse showed up at Ham's house tonight. I struggled against my urge to rap on the wood of my desk. "Tell me more, Sam!" said my interested mom with a level of forgiveness I really appreciated. 
"Well, there's this guy Brian. I think he and Aubrey are dating, actually," I said. She nodded. "There's this little old lady who goes to community college, her name is G...Sarah. And a painter named Finnigan. And this guy Dennis who is really into sweatpants." 
"Sounds like you've met an eclectic bunch," she smiled. "I'm happy about that. Between you and me, I think you were always too unique for Cole and Celia." Then she said, "It's okay to keep things to yourself, Sam. It's just hard to deal with, for me. I'm your mom and I love you. I want to know how you are." 
"I'm usually okay," I said. "I don't know."
"Well. You go to your friend's house. I'm glad that you're gonna try therapy next week."
"Thank you." I smiled and scooped Misty up again to go downstairs. 
I saw her leash sitting on the stove, still in the package, and decided the rowdy little thing could come with me to the Ham hole that night.
"Hey mom, I'm taking Misty with me. She wants to go," I called into the living room.
"Well if she wants to go I suppose I can't say no," she laughed.
I clipped the delicate leash onto her collar and wrapped the end around my wrist. I started heading towards the door, and Misty was complacent, but as soon as the leash pulled, she rammed hard backwards against it, making a displeased noise from her silly little mouth. "Okay I'll carry you, Princess."
I picked her up and started walking the half mile or so to Ham's house. 
--
Throughout most of the walk to the Ham hole, Misty flipflopped between telling me with "mrrp"s and "broooow"s what was going on and huddling close and shivering. She was an inside cat, but she loved sneaking outside and licking the bushes, so I felt like she was well-equipped to cuddle in my arms and go somewhere new. By the time we got there, she had calmed down and was pretty quietly sitting in my arms and observing. 
I knocked on Ham's door. "Coming!" I heard. "What password?"
"Ham 2012."
"Mwaow?"
"Good job Sammy! You come in!" Ham opened the door. When he saw Misty in my arms, he was immediately reduced into a puddle of Sasquatch goo. "Oooooh who this!" he hollered, his face looking more blissed out than I'd ever seen it. 
"This is Misty," I said. 
"Hey kitty!" he whispered.
"Mraw," she said.
"She really likes you," I smiled. That was sort of a surprise. Misty was finnicky at best with people she didn't know, but she looked at Ham and seemed unsurprised. 
"How you know?" asked Ham gleefully.
"She told me," I joked.
"Ohhhhh," Ham said, seeming to understand something that was lost on me. "Okay Sam, okay Misty, come into house please. You catch cold out there."
Mostly everyone was already milling around inside. Only Brian, Melia, and Goody Corey were missing. Sven was sitting on the biggest couch with his bare feet on the coffee table. Melody and Carl were in the kitchen cooking something that smelled tasty and like I couldn't probably eat it. Why were they cooking? Didn't they prefer raw meat? I suddenly pieced together yesterday's coffee run and decided that people food probably just tasted better. Maybe the whole "raw human meat" thing was a means to an end rather than a necessary part of being who they were. I hoped so. I decided to investigate further. 
I went to where the two of them were standing and Misty greeted them. "Hey Sam, hey cat," said Carl like he'd seen it all before.
Melody laughed chirpingly. "Who is that?" she asked. 
"Misty," I answered. "I have a question about your diets."
"Sure," said Carl.
"Why are you cooking? Aren't you...more interested in raw meat? People?" I gestured to Melody. "Brains?" I suggested to Carl. 
Carl gave me that look again like I'd said something ignorant and repulsive. "That's what, some of us, do, to survive," said Carl in a patronizing manner. "But we, are lucky, to not need, to live, like that." 
"I can't imagine what it would be like to actually need to live off that stuff, Sam," said Melody, tossing her perfect ponytailed head. "I get the urge, and I can't say I don't  kill," she winked, "but as long as I get enough protein and hypnotize enough men I'm usually good. Maybe once a month I can't stop myself." 
"I just get, so hungry," said Carl. "I do my best, but everybody messes up."
Well, that conversation had gotten overwhelming fast. I took Misty across the room to where Buddy and Captain were sitting. Buddy looked like he was sniffing the air, and then his head snapped to Misty and I. He growled. Captain remained curled up (I didn't want to think "stupidly") on Buddy's lap, tongue sticking out a little, a black spot over one eye, while Buddy continued to snarl. I walked away. 
It was then that Finnigan approached Misty and I and said, in his ever genuine tone, "Ah, Vampires with familiars are rare." 
Familiars? Oops. Bringing Misty had been the worst plan. I wasn't just a Vampire now, I was a Vampire with a familiar. I struggled to decide whether it was smarter to come clean or just let this be the way things were. I mean, I wasn't going to bring her back, after Buddy's little snarling problem. I really, really did not want to push that guy's buttons. If Cole had been here I'd have whispered "swiner'd."
--
It was Saturday afternoon and Reggie was fifteen minutes away from my house. 
I was in the bathroom adjusting and readjusting my clothes, tucking my hair behind my ears and pulling it back over them, pulling my shirt to get it to look right. I had never been this hung up on looking perfect before, ever. I'd also never been to a dance before and I'd never had a first impression this big to make. Not that it was really a first impression, I reminded myself. He'd seen my face contorted on Facebook in, I assumed, all 263 of my photos. I'd certainly seen all of his photos. 
Not in a creepy way.
I had put on at least four different combinations of outfits. I didn't own a huge variety of clothing. I mostly just wore band shirts and jeans. Nevertheless, I tried on all three of the pants I liked to see which one made me look the least awkward. I eventually picked the ones that would have been the most expensive had I not gotten them on black Friday. The shirt I wore was grey and about Radiohead. 
I had cleaned my room, picking up all the granola bar wrappers fron under the bed and dirty holey old socks from inside the closet. I wasn't generally a big mess generator but I did tend to leave things that I was done with laying around rather than throwing them away. I was starting to think it wasn't just the old wrappers and sandwich receipts, but maybe it was Aubrey as well. Maybe it had been Cole and Celia for a while. 
By now I'd been in the bathroom for more than fifteen minutes. Looking at myself, making faces, ruffling my hair with my hands, brushing it back out, putting goop in it, deciding I was trying too hard and washing it out, tucking and untucking my shirt (why would I tuck it in anyway? I never did that), and brushing my teeth twice. Finally I decided that it simply wasn't going to get better than this. I gave myself a final mirror wink and went to leave, just as my phone buzzed. 
"i think i'm on your street," said the text from Reggie.
I hustled down the stairs, passing my mom on the way and calling, "Reggie's here!" with more enthusiasm than I generally tried to have about things. I went out the front door and saw the tan minivan of many previous two dimensional internet pictures coming towards my house. The sun's glare obscured the driver, but it didn't stop the frantic uproar that had started brewing in my stomach. 
If I could have brought my body to move, I would have flagged him down or waved or something, but instead I just stood there with wide eyes, paralyzed with anticipation, as Reggie's face eased into visibility through the clean window and he aptly parallel parked on the street. Pauline opened her door and stepped out. I'd previously said hello to her a few times. She was very nice. She looked a lot like Reggie (very good looking), but of course, more ladylike and a bit older. She was a sophomore in college this year, but she still lived in her parents' house. She went to college at UCLA, which, in my limited knowledge of Los Angeles' geography, I understood to be not terribly far from Santa Monica, where Reggie's family lived.
"Hey Sam," she said while Reggie's door opened.
"Hi," I said, my voice cracking into a near whisper.
Reggie stepped out of the mom van and closed the door behind him. He looked good, even after having driven all day. His smile was the kind of smile I'd expect the sun to have if it had a face. He was sort of what I pictured the sun being like as a human, actually. He was Apollo-like. I thought that and realized I was completely infatuated and ridiculous. But he was so sunny, he had a tan and the kind of muscles that came from doing stuff, not the kind that happened when you "worked out." He surfed, like I assumed everyone did who lived a mile from the beach. His hair was brown but had warm gold highlights. His face was freckled and his cheeks had a kind blush. He was cute in person.
I sighed and he beamed and walked towards me with his arms open for a hug. He was warm and comforting and he smelled like good deodorant. I squeezed a little harder than I meant to. His chin hooked around my shoulder, he hugged me tight and said, "I am so happy to finally meet you." What a dreamboat.
"You too," I choked up through the frustrated butterflies throwing themselves against the lining of my insides. He let go. Pauline and I shared a much less enthusiastic hug and I led them inside.
"Hey mom, here's Reggie and Pauline," I said, finding a shred of confidence again.
"Hello," said my mom in a tone that suggested that she, too, thought Reggie was cuter in person. He gave her a winning grin. She got up to give he and Pauline little hugs. "It's very nice to meet you," she said genuinely. 
"You too, Ms. Clark," said Reggie respectfully, still showing off his white teeth. My mom's face was growing warmer by the second. 
"Well, it's early," Reggie said, keeping things rolling. "Do you think the three of us could go to the mall or something for a bit?" asked Reggie, half to me and half to my mom. 
"Oh of course," she answered lovingly. "Be back by 6:30 so I can get some pictures of you all before the dance." I nodded and started leaving, leading the siblings out behind me. 
We all got in the car, which had carpety seating and smelled like air fresheners and plastic. Reggie plugged his music player into the wire coming out of the tape jack. "Pick something?" he asked me as we began the seven minute drive to the mall. 
I rifled through his artists list, which, as I knew, was inspiringly good. I picked Radiohead to match my shirt and we longingly moaned along to Kid A while I gave him directions and we took the short journey to the mall. We arrived, Reggie parked, and we all went in. 
I can't say our conversation didn't start off kind of stunted and strange. It was a different setting, being in the same room with him. I was so used to having a screen between us that it was odd to actually get to look him in the eyes, to hug him, and maybe later, if he was thinking what I was thinking, to kiss him. I wanted to so badly.

We went to a few shops but mostly just found ourselves walking through the big open hallways of the mall, joking and laughing and having a merry old time. We tried our best to keep Pauline involved in the conversation, but it was hard, because once he and I got comfortable, we had so much to say to each other. She was just kind of there most of the time. I sort of felt bad, but I was usually the third wheel (or second or fifth or really any number, my awkwardness was the constant) in situations, and I figured I'd have to learn how to get over that myself before I made it my job to help old Pauline. 
We had a really nice hour or so at the mall, just perusing shop windows. We'd poke fun at what the mannequins were wearing and try and imitate the models. To this day there exist several photos of me very aptly interpreting the stance of some lovely emaciated high fashion females. Reggie too, though he committed less to the facial expressions than I did and therefore was not, America's next top model. 
We tried on a few silly getups as well, me in a ladies' sweater with a shimmery cat embroidered to the front, he in a lime green fleece peacoat, jeggings, and nude pumps, pauline in 3XL silk pajamas. We got kicked out of the store with that last one, as Pauline hilariously paraded back and forth across the dressing room, the lacy lavender bottoms falling down around her ankles twice. We had a great time. 

Finally, though, it was time to go home and prepare for the dance. Reggie and Pauline had brought nice things, and I had one nice outfit. Over black jeans I wore my one button down (also black), and, due to reasons including but not limited to "fuck it," a red sequined bow tie I'd found in my closet leftover from the last time I'd gone to a Rocky Horror screening. I also donned the red Doc Marten's that I loved too much to wear without a reason. That wasn't really because I doubted their integrity, I didn't, and I honestly was excited for the way they'd look when I broke them in enough to show some wear. But if I wore them once every month or two, when there was a reason for people to look at me, I never, ever got less than four compliments. Sometimes people would just say they liked my shoes, but more often people would say they liked my shoes and I looked great, and sometimes they'd skip the shoes all together and just tell me I was hot. I figured if I always wore the shoes, people would stop noticing that I was hot. Today, however, was the kind of day that warranted these lucky shoes of mine. Today I was hanging out with Reggie. 
I let Reggie and Patricia take the bathroom and my bedroom while I changed in my parents' room. I finished changing first, probably because my getup was the least extravagant. I walked out of the downstairs bedroom and showed off to my parents, sitting on the couch in front of the news. "You look great," smiled my dad. My mom agreed, voicing her approval with oohs and aahs. She got up off the couch to give me a loving hug. She was big on those.
"My handsome baby. I couldn't be more proud," she said, arms wrapped around me. I tried not to groan. She might as well be pinching my cheeks! There was a cute boy in the house! Where were her manners!
Reggie emerged from the stairwell, looking just about as dapper as I'd ever seen a person look. He was wearing a navy blue button down with brown suspenders and a red tie. His tight-ish pants were a bit darker than his suspenders, as was a jacket he had over his shoulder. He had done a little to tame his hair, defining the part he had on the right side (same as mine) and combing it down. His shoes were old fashioned penny loafer types. He was representing this old timey charm that I completely dug. I dug it so much that I almost wanted it to go away; Reggie was nearly too attractive. I thought about literally hitting the floor and screaming, "I'm tapping out!" Maybe I could run around in a few circles slapping people's faces as well. Was it the imp of the perverse or was it the first time someone so attractive had ever liked me back? I decided it was both, and instead of tapping out and assaulting my mom and dad, I waited for them to finish complimenting handsome Reggie on his handsome outfit, and then I called to him. "Reggie?"
"Mmm-hmm?" He asked, doing that thing that he kept fucking doing which was looking at me with that great face he had. 
"Will you come here for a second?" the butterflies started hurling themselves against my vital organs again.
Reggie came to me. I led him to the kitchen, where I asked, "Do you want to kiss me?" I fought an immediate urge to throw up after shoving those words out my mouth. What if he didn't want to kiss me? I had just ruined everything, past present and future, in six words.
Fortunately, the answer turned out to be yes. Only he didn't say yes. He just opened his eyes kind of wide with surprise and then he smiled, before coming close to me, wrapping his arms around my hips, leaning in and pushing his lips against mine. I sort of just stood there until I realized I was just standing there and started participating. I mashed my lips against his, matching his aggressiveness. I can't say I was the most experienced kisser out there, I'd only kissed three people in all my seventeen years on this planet, but I certainly wasn't the worst kisser out there. I wasn't the worst kisser whose lips I'd ever tasted, even. Reggie was.
That James kid, who had been my first "boyfriend" (though we mostly just hung out in my bedroom after school and pretended like nothing was going on between us), had been a pretty alright kisser. I think we'd both been each other's firsts. I counted him as my first, at least, and I was pretty sure he was a mouth virgin as well. So mostly the kisses we shared were delicate and unintrusive. I didn't mind kissing James at all. Of course, we never had a chance to get comofortable with each other, as our affair was cut short due to Sven's violent outburst, which had changed my mind about James and boys and being alive in general. 
Then had come my kisses with a girl named Shiela who I'd dated for a while. We met at a little concert for an indie band that was passing through. Nobody cool lived in Broken Arrow, so meeting a cute girl who liked me and the Tallest Man On Earth at the same time was a pretty big deal. She was tall and had very small teeth. She was a pretty good kisser, except that she expected me to lead her all the time. I had to initiate all the kissing, I had to hold her hand first, I had to make every single move. When we kissed, she gave the minimum amount of response that she had to. We eventually broke up because of this. I was too anxious to even take care of my own business a lot of the time, let alone read a girl's mind. 
And also, there was the kiss with Sven. Technically it had been my first kiss but I didn't tend to think of it that way, since I firmly believed it to have just been a freak accident. It had just happened once, when he and I'd had an all night horror movie marathon on a Friday night in eighth grade (I thought about this and got chills, as every Zombie trope and Blair Witch fear monger had turned out to be quietly, understatedly true). We'd gone from sitting on my bed next to each other watching the films on my computer screen, to innocently holding hands and squeezing in fear, to spooning, to really making out. Sven hadn't wanted to talk about it afterwards. It didn't change anything about our friendship really, except for the creation of some physical boundaries that hadn't existed before. I just figured I'd let it be, even though he'd end up being the most passionate and least sloppy of all the people I'd kissed. I just figured whatever girl decided to put up with his wrath would have that as a nice perk. I didn't mind.
Now, though, Reggie was doing something completely different from anything I'd ever experienced. He was not delicate, nor was he apt. He was aggressively, almost angrily shoving his tongue in my mouth, licking my teeth every once in a while, slobbering all over the place, and I didn't like it at all. I let it go on with minimal interruption, though, since I had literally asked for it. 
Finally, it was over, and Reggie stepped back to look at me. He smiled sunnily again and I remembered that I totally liked him and totally did not want to barf all over his face. I forced a smile that I knew was unconvincing. Reggie didn't seem to notice. He sort of smirked knowingly, like we'd just shared an intimate moment or something, and walked out to the living room. 
Pauline had just gotten to the stairwell, looking great in a sheeny muted green thing that poofed out at the waist and had a big bow in the back. She was wearing light makeup, I could tell, and had tamed her curly mane into big smooth swoops rather than a gorgeous but wild mess. She'd also taken off her black rectangular glasses. Basically, she looked less like a girl who was pretty but had shit to do, and more like she belonged in an ad for Seventeen magazine. 
My parents clapped for her and told her she looked great. My mom picked up her silly little camera from the table beside the couch and gracefully stood up from the chair. "Alright you three, go in front of the door so I can take some pictures!" 
I tried to smile like I meant it, but ended up looking kind of uncomfortable in all my photos. I tended to look uncomfortable in photos, anyhow. Even in candids there was some part of me that didn't translate correctly. Either that or I was always generally awkward looking, kind of like a stoned otter, and nobody had ever told me. 
Reggie and Pauline both looked beautiful and pristine in their photos, like they tended to do in real life as well. Pauline made my mom retake the photos a few times, though, as she thought she looked terrible in the first few. The pictures that made her happy were the ones where Reggie and I looked the worst, but c'est la vie. 
Finally, it was time to head to the dance. I had been itching to show Reggie off to Melody and Carl before he kissed me, but now I was only a little excited. Half of my feelings for Reggie had turned into worry that he would kiss me again. I didn't like that but it was the case. 
We got in the tan van again and began the ridiculously short two block drive to the school. I'd suggested we walk, but Reggie didn't think that was classy enough, he'd insisted he drive. In under two minutes we had parked by the gym. They were selling tickets at the front to anybody who was with somebody who had a school ID, so Reggie and Pauline paid their ten dollar a piece dues and we all went inside, unmuting the awful top 40 jam that even a catatonic baby could understand in full. Gosh it was loud in there, I thought as I forced my body to swim through the vibrating sound waves into the sweat smelling mess of humans.
The cacaphonous gym was decorated according to the theme, "Halloween Horror," being as it was just over a week before the big day, and the school district lacked funding and therefore had to consolidate a lot of its festivities. There were stupid butcher paper murals taped to the wall with drippy red tempra paint handprints. Stupid zombie posters as well. Stupid tinsel spiders hanging from the ceiling. The snacks laid out on the table were mostly stupid as well; the punch was red and labeled "Blood Punch" in someone's stupid attempt at Halloween style handwriting, the cheese and crackers were laid out in the shape of a stupid lopsided skull, the orange carrots were to be dipped in ranch dressing that someone had terrifyingly dyed black with food coloring. The black ranch dressing was the scariest thing about this dance, forget my friend the Zombie. 
I looked around and saw a flash of Melody's red dress in the opposite corner of the small, crowded gymnasium. I led Reggie and Pauline over there. "Hey Mel," I called over headachy music once I'd weaved through all the dead eyed looking folks and flagged her down. "This is Reggie and Pauline!" Reggie grabbed my hand and interlaced his fingers through mine. Okay, I supposed.
"Hello!" called Melody over the din. "It's nice to meet you, I've heard a lot!" With her hand cupped around her mouth as she yelled, her voice was sultrier than I had gotten used to and I could see in Reggie's eyes that he had fallen victim. I stepped on Melody's foot to get her to stop it. How rude. Reggie didn't even like girls, how was he going to explain to himself that he had just fallen in love with one? I tried to get Melody's attention so I could subtly glare at her, but she ignored me on purpose. I could tell that she had let Reggie go, though. He was looking to her and back to me and his eyebrows were furrowed in confusion.
I shook my head and moved on. "Here's Carl," I said, gesturing to the clammy looking boy with the bad teeth and the ill-fitting grey suit. I assumed it was his dad's. 
"Hello, Reggie. Hi, Pauline." I didn't know how he had heard her name over the din, but I was pleased.
Sven appeared as well, in all black, looking tall and morose. "Meet my friends," I said. 
Reggie whispered (as much as one can whisper when there's ear damaging volumes of music afoot), "Aren't you going to tell them I'm your boyfriend?" in my ear. I tried not to shudder; his beath was damp and cool, not to mention that he wasn't my boyfriend and I didn't even think I wanted that from him right now. Long distance would be a crap way for me to love somebody even if he wasn't an offensively bad kisser. I felt shallow for a minute, why did I think he had problems as a person just because he had problems as a kisser? Was that unfounded? It so was. I was a terrible person and I didn't deserve a boyfriend as cute as Reggie. Nevertheless, instead of confessing my sins to him, I looked at him compassionately, like I understood his pain, and I shook my head a small bit, hopefully giving off a vibe that said something along the lines of, "I can't, not now."
"This is Sven," I said while gesturing to Sven, whose upset expression I hoped wasn't too intimidating for the two who hadn't met him. "This is Reggie and Pauline. They're visiting from California." 
"We're dating," interrupted Reggie. Alright, wow. What was that about? Hadn't I made it clear that I didn't really want that to happen? I debated whether I should rip my entwined fingers from his, lifting his arm up high and throwing it back down, maybe stomping one foot, turning my nose up, and marching right out of the gym. Instead I pulled my lips back in what had to be the fakest smile that had ever, ever been pasted on my face. 
Sven looked like something really bad had just happened. Melody patted him on the lower back, having to stretch upward a little just to touch it with her tiny hand, and looked at him sternly. Carl stood looking dumbstruck and confused like he tended to do. Pauline looked overwhelmed, too, and Reggie just looked proud. I fought my body's natural urge to flee the scene and find a bathroom stall to hyperventilate in. I tried not to scream at everyone.
The first to break the horrible silence had to be Melody, with her no nonsense, businesslike manner. I liked her for that, if not for the fact that she was a mythical muder demon. "So, how about this dance," she laughed without a hint of doubt or anxiety. Dear, sweet Melody.
Carl laughed slowly along with her. Then I started laughing, partly because it seemed like the thing that all the cool kids were doing and mostly because it would probably keep me from crying.
Then, Ham appeared in the doorway to the gym, dressed in a nice grey mayor suit, with a beanie on his head and enormous shiny dress shoes on his feet. As he stomped towards the rest of us, the students made way for him, many of them looking up with huge eyes and frowny faces. He got to our little huddle in the corner and boomed (though it was still not nearly as loud as the stupid music that was playing), "Sam! People I not know yet! Sorry I not see you come in. Was eating snack then doing secret business." He smiled down at us with huge teeth, stained black from the horrible ranch dressing he'd apparently not found repulsive enough to leave alone. "Not really like this dance so far. Really loud and me not really like big groups. Also think all these Zombie pictures pretty appropriative. Obviously of alive humans dressed like Zombies. They go home, wipe off makeup, go back to privileged life. This very damaging trend." When he finished, Carl nodded in agreement. They were right, Carl's life was different than the mainstream idea of Zombism. He was more like any other human than I'd ever have been able to guess before I knew him, and I agreed, it was due to a negative portrayal in pop culture. I was glad to have friends who weren't afraid to punch oppression in the face. 
Reggie looked up at Ham with a horrified expression. I supposed everyone was horrified of Ham when they first met him. I certainly had been, but my first impression of Ham had also been kidnapping and strangulation. Reggie was just plain judging the guy, it seemed. The two of them stood like scale models of each other, with similar color pallets and not so different builds. Ham was smiling though, ever the optimist, while Reggie's wide, scared eyes didn't soften. Ham introduced himself. "Hello, I Ham, friend with Sam," he said in his low, chipper tone. 
"Hi, I'm Reggie," whispered Reggie, though since it was inaudible it was just Reggie's mouth flaccidly flopping around the words. Ham took his hand and shook it. Leave it to the next mayor of Broken Arrow to be unphased by judgemental folks. 
Reggie pulled me aside again and whispered in my ear. "Why are you friends with that guy? He looks like he's 30 and homeless." Whoa, Nelly! I'd told Reggie a lot of great things about Ham and had even warned him about the guy's size and stature. There was no reason for him to be coming to my school, putting his gross tongue all over my face, and judging my friends. I wouldn't be shitting all over everything he cared about if I were visiting him in Santa Monica. I'd probably be too busy gaining a new experience in my life! I'd be trying to appreciate every minute of my vacation. Reggie's curmudgeonly attitude was disappointing and uncalled for.
The rest of the dance seemed to pass by in this exact, painstaiking, anxious, horrible manner. Reggie was way too clingy, made many narrowly avoided passes at me, and continued to offend my friends. Sven seethed, Carl appeared dumbfounded, Melody diligently kept everyone from killing each other, and Pauline and I stood around quietly and awkwardly. Neither of us really wanted to be there after just a few minutes of sizing up the situation, and neither of us could really leave. If Reggie hadn't insisted on toting me around on his arm all evening, I would have bailed with Paulene and gotten a sandwich. 
The good news about Pauline, though, was that she wasn't quite as lonesome as I felt, glued to Reggie, who smelled nice in physical terms but had a reeksome personality. Paulene and Melody seemed to hit it off quite a bit towards the end of the dance. I found them talking about school at one point. Melody was planning on getting a degree in business (I hadn't known that about her before) and Paulene was currently busting up geneds like a pro. Melody wanted to know about required maths and sciences, as she wasn't terribly great at those things (also something I hadn't really known). Pauline only had foreboding things to say, unfortunately. Lots about how the maths were so overfull at her school, and the teachers so overwhelmed with things to grade, that it was hard to get help and many struggled. Melody looked upset. I wanted to be a part of that conversation, too, but was entirely too intimidated and felt too small to even know where to begin. 
Eventually, I wasn't the only one who was done with the loud vibrating bass in 4/4 time and the scent of sweaty pubescents and black ranch dressing. Within an hour everybody else wanted to bail as well, everyone except for Sven. Sven had been making a point about not talking to anyone, but not quite commitedly enough to leave our little huddle of misfits. When we left, he did come along with us, though, like a cat, he made it seem like it was his idea and not ours. 
Instead of going to our respective houses, I was relieved to find that there was an afterparty plan abrew at the Ham hole. After Reggie saying several gross things about my friends (he'd had the almost imponderable ignorance to ask if Carl was "actually retarded" and had called Melody "slutty," which was a horible example of blaming her for the attraction he felt for her. Like, it totally was her fault in this case, but Reggie didn't know that, and he was acting like a real jerk.) I was no longer entirely interested in hanging out with him alone. I needed some time to de-stress, and that time couldn't happen in an overcrowded, too loud gymnasium (Note to self: never go to a school dance again). I was excited about going to the Ham hole not because it was calm, quiet, or safe (it was none of those things), but because I liked it there. 
Things did not go according to that untressful plan I had, however, because as soon as we had parked our two cars (very carefully not in the red for fear of old Stepan) and gone inside, Sven started acting really messed up. He stormed in the door, still wearing all black, eyes literally glowing pale blue, and beelined to the kitchen, where he karate chopped the table so hard you could hear it crack inside. Then he kicked a hole in the side of Ham's couch. Carl tried to stop him from causing more damage but thought better of it after getting close enough to narrowly miss a huge pale fist getting swung at his rotten face. Nobody else intervened as Sven went down the hallway and punched the bathroom mirror, leaving it crazed. Ham sat on the couch calmly. I was surprised that even the big old homeowner wasn't trying to stop the madness from happening. I figured he'd be the first one to intervene, not just to save his property but to placate the terrified huddle of teenagers sitting on his couch. 
Come to think of it though, it was just Reggie who looked terrified. Typical Reggie. It seemed like everybody else was just waiting for Sven to be done. Carl wasn't new to this sort of outburst, I already expected Sven to be a horror, Melody and Pauline were sort of ignoring the rumpus and talking about music (from what I could hear over the sound of my own confusion and horror, they liked stuff I unabashedly found bad), and Ham was literally filing his fingernails. He was actually just sitting there, with a nail file, buffering, with the most flippant expression I'd ever seen him have. I sat there next to Reggie, who was sweatily squeezing my hand, and gazed agape at the hairy giant. 
"What Sven gonna tell parents he need money for this time?" Asked Ham. Then he turned to us and, shaking his head, muttered, "Why I let in house?"
Sven, who'd been previously quiet and determined throughout this whole ordeal, started screaming. He wasn't saying anything, he was just screaming, his voice piercing through the barrier of what my brain could deal with and leaving me anxious and dizzy. It wasn't a power, I realized a second later when my brain calibrated around the noxious noise. Sven was just being a dick. That was just his answer to Ham's question. The scream dopplered higher for a minute as Sven walked into the kitchen, but then he quieted back down. He calmly opened the cupboard, grabbed a plate, and held it up. His expression was one of pure evil and he glared at Ham, threatening to drop it.
"That a pretty expensive plate," said Ham after glancing up from his nails for less than a second to see what Sven was causing a scene about now.
Sven's face went from evil rage to a sad, lonely grimace. He dropped the plate, and as it shattered, Ham animated. As fast as my eyes could process (and probably several times faster than poor old Carl's could), Ham was up, in the kitchen, and pinning Sven to the ground. Sven was on his back, his head lifting off the ground a little, and Ham was straddled over his midsection with his enormous hands on Sven's shoulders. If I didn't know he could take it, I'd have been scared for the little guy. "What the fuck!" screamed Sven.
"Sven break Ham favorite plate. Now Ham sitting on Sven."
Sven groaned. "Get off me!" Was that...did Sven's voice just crack? 
"Say sorry and I think about it." Ham crossed his arms over his chest, freeing a lot of movement for Sven, who tried to slap Ham's face. Quite ridiculously, Sven couldn't reach, and he just floundered around waving his arms a few inches in front of Ham's face for a minute before giving up. Ham even leaned forward to taunt him. It was funny and I laughed. Sven's gaze zeroed in on me, a spectator in the hilarious smackdown (could I call it hilarious? Was that okay?) that was going on in front of me. He growled and then he turned back to Ham and screamed. 
"No! Get the fuck off me!"
"Okay, get out my house." Ham was resigned to this and he seemed to trust Sven to find his own way to the door. He stood up off the Elf and helped him up. Then he gestured to the door and said, "You invited back when you think about actions affecting Ham life, Melody life, Carl life, Sam life, Pauline life." He left out Reggie, either on accident or because I wasn't the only one who was sick of the beautiful sun kissed asshole. Why did I have such bad taste?
Sven did leave, but on his way out, he dumped piles and piles of glitter on the floor. I didn't know why this was offensive, other than it being hard to clean out of Ham's fairly nice beige carpet, but it seemed easy for Sven. Maybe it was like peeing on something because you were upset. Celia had a cat who did that; when her litter box went unchanged for too long she'd get mad and find a jacket to pee all over. Oh, Sven. Oh, underevolved, tall, violent, horrible, handsome, catlike, glitter creating old Sven. Ham said, "Sven not really a douchebag. Just try so hard."
"What the fuck?" said Reggie from by my side once the door had slammed shut behind Sven, leaving the insanity to clear from the room. "What...what the fuck?" 
"Uh that came, um, out of his pockets," comforted Melody unconvincingly. Carl nodded in stern agreement. 
The other non-magical person in the room, Pauline didn't look overwhelmed, really, just tired and confused. I agreed with her. I wished Reggie did too, but what did I expect from him at this point? 
"That very clearly came out of his sleeves," corrected Reggie, ever the one upper. 
"Oh yes, it did, sorry," agreed humble Melody.
"Why is that guy such a douche? What's his deal? Why are you guys hanging out with him?" 
Oh, so that was Reggie's whole problem. Not the fact that he had just witnessed an Elf throw glitter all over the floor as a way to upset a Sasquatch, haha, oh no, it was just that someone was being a big douchebag. Took one to know one! I simmered with Svenlike rage at my beautiful oblivious "boyfriend." Ugh. 
"Didn't he like, used to beat you up, Sam?" He asked. My body tightened at the mention of that, a silent "damn it all."
"I wasn't really interested in telling my friends that, Reg," I said coolly and patronizingly. I'd had enough, the butterflies had all faded. I realized they had been throwing themselves at my insides not to warn me of impending cuteness, but to end their own lives. And they had succeeded. As I pulled Reggie's sweaty hand from mine, glaring at his dumb, smug little face, not one internal insect was aflutter. 
Melody, Carl, and Ham all looked at me pityingly. Carl said, "Poor Sammy." 
On any other day, at any other time, I would have been comforted by the sentence that Carl had just uttered. I liked it when people mommied me. I liked, sometimes, to be able to surrender completely to something, to be a powerless child, to give control of my life to someone else. 
But now was not the time for Poor Sammy.
"No, I'm fine," I asserted, my head feeling determined by my voice faltering. "I need to go to the bathroom and then Reggie and Pauline and I are going home."
--
Reggie and Pauline had planned to stay until mid afternoon on Sunday, but that was a plan that had been formed based on the assumption that Reggie and I would like each other. They left before ten after sleeping in the guest room. 
And I had a Sunday to myself. 
After all that madness had happened, it was a very, very needed break. Just me, Misty, some snacks, some great music, and the internet. The weather was nice, it was breezy and cool outside the way it got deep in the fall. The sky wasn't dark, it was just grey, almost periwinkle, almost white in some places. I pulled the black curtains back from the window and opened it to let in the cool breeze. I put on a sweater and made some tea, and even put my music on through speakers rather than headphones, opening my ears to the world and the comfort it could provide. I was gonna do some yoga in my room today. What a nice day it would be.
Of course I ended up just sitting at my computer for two hours before I even started motivating to do the yoga. It was almost as theraputic for me, though. It was easier to talk when it was through typing, there were none of the stresses of face to face communication. The way my face was supposed to look or my voice was supposed to sound, where my gaze was supposed to be directed, my body language, whether I'd say too much or too little, none of that even affected what I said on the internet. I could take as long as I wanted before replying to someone and could even backspace words I'd thought I wanted to say before I hit the enter button and committed. It was the place I went to escape from the constant ridiculousness of being a human being among human beings (and sometimes mythical beasts). 
I found myself scrolling down my facebook feed for quite some time, thinking mean things to myself about lots of the people I'd chosen to add as "friends." One girl, Timpany, was pregnant and wanted to name her baby LaGweneveere. I didn't have a problem with the pregnancy part but I really felt bad for LaGweneveere's future. There was a guy named Axle who I'd met at summer camp a few summers before. He had been working out for several hours a day to train for a muscle man competition, and he was looking ripped as heck in a bad way. Finally, and the last straw, was a couple from my school named Katie and Aaron who were always posting about being the sickliest sweetest love bugs, as if people couldn't already tell from the way they walked down the halls holding hands and smiling at each other. I almost commented on a picture of the attractive couple kissing with something like "no one cares," but I caught myself before I hit enter. A lot of people cared. I was just bitter about kissing cute people at the moment. I bet Katie didn't kiss like a bossy golden retriever. 
That was when I turned off the computer. The rule was as soon as my faith in humanity went down enough to measure, it was time to take a break. I laid out my brown yoga mat on the carpet of my bedroom, put on my "doin yoga" playlist, and tried to relax.
Unfortunately, as soon as I had nothing immediate at the front of my brain, everything started falling apart. My relationship with Cole and Celia had stagnated and broken, and I'd left it alone for too long. No hope for that, I thought. Aubrey was like those granola bar wrappers on my floor. She needed to go; we never even talked. She just talked at me. I hadn't even told her that I knew Buddy outside yoga now, that he was terrifying, that I was totally friends with Captain, that he really was the most relaxed dog I'd ever seen, probably due to being really stupid. I hadn't even told her that I'd seen our Zumba-obsessed teacher Kristie walking down the street the other day with some guy, and that she'd looked really upset. These were the kinds of things Aubrey would bring up and obsess over for days, but not the kinds of things that mattered to her out of anybody else's mouth. Reggie had been great in theory but that hadn't panned out at all, and that was surely, thankfully final. I'd rebuked all my old, solid, routine friends in favor of new, scary, unpredictable ones, and that was terrible of me. I'd done a good job of letting these feelings stay safely buried under all the utter nonsense I'd been sifting through the past few weeks, but now I was laying on my bed, listening to Elliot Smith, maybe moaning along a little bit, maybe crying a little bit. What a wiener I was! What a terrible, monstrous weiner. 
I spent a while like this, wallowing in self hatred and guilt over the people I'd been letting down. I'd found Cole and Celia when Sven had started making my life the worst, and they had been consistently okay to me. They'd given me a table to sit at during lunch, an extracurricular to involve myself in, a regular schedule, and somebody to say I knew at school. And what did it look like now? Back to Sven without a second thought, is what it looked like. A few weeks of sitting silently and acting bored, and then dead silence from me. What a jerk. They let me down a lot, but were always there when it mattered. Leave it to me to let them down as soon as anything got weird. They did a lot for me, whether or not they actually cared. 
I got it out of my system as soon as I realized that all my old friends were jerks and my new friends treated me like I mattered. I decided to follow advice I'd read on the back of a self-help book my mom had left on the table by the couch, and take care of myself first for once. What made me feel good was hanging out with people who liked me. What taking care of myself meant here was letting go of the guilt I had about ditching people that made me unhappy. Well, I deserved to be happy too, didn't I? I tried to convince myself that I was doing the right thing. It was hard, but it actually helped. 
After changing the music from Elliott to a much nicer, much louder dose of David Bowie's Hunky Dory, I went online to fart around for a bit. I watched a couple videos of cute cats doing stuff, like one does. Eventually I got linked to a guy with a mentally disabled cat who meowed a lot and fell over when you put stuff on him. It was cute. After about ten seconds though, on the video about kissing the cat (its name was Dude) as it meowed and growled, Misty came trotting in, her head cocked and her face one of confusion and willingness to help, her tail shaped like a perky question mark. "It's okay baby, it's just on the screen," I told her. Then we watched some more meowing cat videos together. She meowed along sometimes. My day was going so much better with Misty here to hang out and be a pal. She wasn't an asshole or a monster! She was perfect.
Then Reggie sent me a text. A little green box that said "Yo." pinged into view in the center of my propped open phone's screen. So this was gonna happen.
"Hey."
"I had fun hanging out with you! Maybe I can stop by on the way back too. Pauline likes you! <3"
Oh wow. Reggie literally had gotten no semblance of a hint, had he? And what part of hanging out was fun? Was it fun when he called my friends slutty and retarded? What about when he accused the future mayor of Broken Arrow of homelessness? Hadn't he stormed out of my house at ten this morning because he "really had to get going?" Was there a chance that was true? What was going on here?
"Okay" was all I said. My phone pinged some more but I was over it, I'd left my phone on the desk and started changing out of my moose themed pajamas to get ready for a walk. Maybe to Ham hole, but maybe just to get some air and live my life a little. 
As I passed through the kitchen, my mom smiled. "I really, really liked Reggie," she said. 
I sighed. "Mom. I'm sorry. Reggie and I are probably not going to work out. He was a jerk to all my new friends."
"Maybe that says something about your new friends," she said in passing. I don't think she meant to say anything offensive but it hit me and I thought about it a lot after that. Dumping Cole and Celia, the most consistently existent folks I'd ever hung out with, dumping Reggie, the cutest boy who had ever liked me, and plotting the dumping of Aubrey, the most on top of it workout buddy I could hope for. I felt like it was right for me to be hanging out with my new ragtag team of misfits, mom's own self-help book had told me so, but there was so much fallout. 
I walked down the block, thanking myself for wearing a thick sweater. It was getting really chilly, as it did this close to the winter. My eighteenth birthday was a week away, I realized. And that meant Halloween was a week away. No plans for my birthday and no costume ideas. I'd been kind of blindly floating through my life for the past year or so, I realized. As soon as it had hit me that high school, human contact, plans, hopes, goals, and aspirations were a waste of my life, I'd lost track of some things. 
I found myself heading in the direction of the Ham hole, and figured that would be a nice course of action to take. If Ham was home I'd like to talk to him about the stuff that was plaguing me. I sort of felt like Ham was a big brother to me. A truly enormous brother.
When I got there, I knocked on the door and nobody answered. That was fine! Ham was probably at work or at the grocery store or doing something important to prepare for the election. I was cold and it looked like rain so I turned around and went home. 
--
"So, Halloween is going to be a fantastic time," said Melody at lunch on Monday during a break in conversation. She smiled with good humor and threw her cascading curls over her right shoulder. "I know it's sort of sacreligious to ask, but what are you guys all going as?" She mischeviously looked around at Carl, Sven and I. 
"Zombie," said Carl simply and without ado.
"Fuck Halloween," said crappy old Sven. Did he even know what fun was like to have?
"I don't even know yet," I conceded when everyone looked at me. 
"It's so close though!" twinkled Melody, her rich brown eyes twinkling. I knew just then what was happening, I was going to be a "project" for her. I was proven right when she said, "You're coming to mine after school, this is not a question." 
I knew that no matter how much debating I did, the answer would remain the same, so I nodded. 
"Great! I have stuff at home and of course the mall is right there. Oh, I certainly am excited," she mused. I couldn't help but be excited myself for once. It wasn't that I had a problem with Halloween, I just hadn't had the best experience with it growing up. It was my birthday, which was supposed to be fun and festive and about me, but it was always overshadowed by everyone acting terrifyingly. It's obvious that I didn't deal well with Zombies and Mummies and Witches spooking on me every time I went outside on my own birthday. The associations were strong from the start. I'd gotten an even worse taste in my mouth when the Vampire thing started in around fourth grade. It was just another reason for people to want to stay away. I tried celebrating on my half birthday, March 31st, which, with the guidance of my parents, I was excited to share with René Descartes and Christopher Walken. Unfortunately, it was common knowledge that I was a Halloween baby, so no one let it stick for all my might. And besides, as pointed out one particularly goonish girl with braces and stringy pigtails, the building of the Titanic had commenced on March 31st, and we all knew how that had ended up. 
I'd had a problem with this because it made no sense, but I, of course, was small, and nobody really cared whether I had a problem with things people said. The Titanic joke stuck much better than the birthday thing, as can be expected. A whole new kind of tag had been built around me, in fact. There was an "iceberg" who tried to smack me so hard that I fell down and everybody else was just supposed to run away. That's when I had first learned to climb trees and stopped trying to make friends. 
It's amazing how much goony little girls with pigtails and braces can change the way somebody feels about themselves forever, I thought, wanting to climb a tree right then but knowing I'd still be me and it'd still be hard.
--
I was overwhelmed with the austerity of Melody's house that afternoon. It was like no house I had before seen in Broken Arrow. It was big, located off a tiny dirt side street a few blocks from the school. It was well hidden among a fairly populated area; I'd truly passed the little dirt road that led to it on numerous occasions and just thought it was an alley or something. I'd not thought anything of it before. Understandably, I was quite surprised when the two of us, walking sometimes in edges of yards and sometimes in the street for lack of sidewalk (or need for one), took a right down that little dirt road I'd seen but never registered. The house was the only one on the street, so maybe it was merely a driveway. But it was long, about an entire block's length. I felt like we were passing through a portal into another world as the wooding got thicker, the grey sunshine filtered through browning, falling leaves and turning warmer, the thick covering of leaves on the ground completely covering the little dirt path for stretches. Through the spaces in the trees one could see simply more trees, could hear birds talking and squirrels meeping and even a woodpecker to the left side. I couldn't see any other houses, and that surprised me. Did Melody's family own an entire city block? Two? There was a place where second street didn't go through all the way. 
We arrived at the house, which was better defined as something between a mansion and a castle. Lacking the stone masonry in favor of beautiful victorian style deep red siding with white trim, it had a turret on each side complete with coned roofs. There was a huge porch in front of the place and a clearing that was a yard. It must have been three stories, big enough to home generations. Instead of matching the anachronism of the enormous home with horse drawn carriages, there sat several mighty expensive cars. What nonsense was this? 
"Melody, do you live here?" I asked with the widest eyes I'd ever had. 
"Yes I do!" She replied with proud intonation. 
I looked around again, sizing up the extravagant home. I hadn't even gone inside yet and I was pretty much done. But when we went inside, I was even further done. Melody opened the right of the heavy double doors and led me into a huge room. I pulled off the sun protecting sweatshirt hood and tried to take in the majesty. The first thing I noticed was that there were two lifelike lion sculptures lounging near the door in a fairly haphazard location. I smiled at them, the artistry was beautiful, but then one of them moved its head and looked at me. I knew I should have expected that, but I didn't. I jumped back, startled, hissing slightly to repress a yelp. I didn't know much about lions but I knew that they were scary like bears, and bears didn't like to be startled. Or was it wolves? Maybe it was both. And speaking of wolves, one was wandering towards me from one side. I hopped back another few feet, my shoulders like earrings, and hissed through my nose again. No scream.
"They're tame," Melody assured me as soon as she pinpointed why I was acting so strangely. I was sort of comforted by this, they did seem to be sort of dead behind the eyes and quite languid in their movement, and I let myself take in the rest of the room. It was a huge hall about as big as the cafeteria of my school, with wooden floors and muted teal walls. The entire place was decorated with old, maybe ancient pieces. Wooden chests sat covered in shimmering jewels along the hallway, statues of beautiful women portruded from the walls, like figureheads, maybe they were figureheads, gorgeous paintings of people I didn't recognize filled the perimeter. Most of the art and fineries seemed at least slightly worn, none of it was in brand new condition, but who could expect that? It was still completely breathtaking. 
As the wolf who had sidled towards me passed with terrifying closeness but no interest whatsoever, I followed it with my eyes. I'd entered in the center of the house, and was smack in the middle of the huge room, but to the right of me about ten feet where the wolf was heading began a carpeting in the same quiet blue green of the walls. There was a huge spiral staircase with a shiny polished railing and--
I screamed. Halfway up the staircase rested a slimy, terrible monster. I knew this wasn't a sculpture, partly because that had gotten me nowhere with the lions and mostly because it was slithering eerily down the steps. It had many heads, each with four eyes and many more teeth than a head should rightly have. Its legs were tentacles and its belt were doberman's heads. My scream had run dry and instead I was standing with a terrible knot in my throat and spots forming in my vision. 
"This is why I never bring my friends over!" hollered Melody in a high pitch with a stomping of the foot. 
"Sorry," spoke several of the heads in eerie unison. "I just wanted to see what the ruckus was." The heads laughed and I started shaking. 
"Mom, you're so embarrassing!" said Melody. "Look what you did to my friend!" I stood agape, feeling swoonish and wrong.
"I do suppose I'm sorry," said a few heads as the creature started slithering down the curved staircase. I instinctively backed away. 
"Oh now, don't be scared," laughed a few of the heads scarily. "I don't bite," said all of them. I tried to scream but it was just a breath and my voice was gone, exactly like a nightmare. I was sleeping, I was sleeping. I mustered the bodily control to pinch my forearm with a shaking and nearly numb hand. Nothing happened except a sensation that was completely overshadowed by the adrenaline telling my body to run, run fast and far. But I stood planted because I couldn't move. 
The creature reached me and held out a hand. A hand that was comforting under all of the horror. It was a hand not unlike Melody's, dainty, pale, with long fingers, attached to a human arm. It seemed almost as though, buried under the grotesque fashion that were the horrors of the thing, there was buried a woman. 
I reached out my hand and shook it, and much of the fear dissipated. I was still scared, but it was because I was seeing something new, not because I feared for my life. The creature's heads were not so terribly grotesque; they sported eyes lined with makeup, perky red lips that looked like melody's as well, and pretty curly dark hair. The dog's heads were kind, the tentacles clean, at least. I released her grasp and the fear stayed gone. I wondered if it was a power or if I was just getting used to these sorts of shenanigans.
"So, what's your little friend's name?" asked the creature, who I now wasn't sure if I should call a creature.
I was glad she asked Melody for the answer and not me, because as much as I was sort of okay with her existence, my voice was still gone. "He's Sam. We're trying to figure out Halloween."
"Hello there Sam. I'm Scylla." She touched a kind hand to her bare chest and all her eyes fluttered in a wave from one side to the other. 
"Hi," I whispered with no vigor whatsoever. 
"This is my mom. She's great when you get to know her." Melody stepped on one of the tentacles as if to tell her mother to stop seeming ungreat. I wanted to say something about how her personality seemed perfectly pleasant, it was just the heads that threw me off, but I didn't want to insult the sensibilites of any one of the many perfectly styled appendiges. They seemed to be doing well with what they had. "Is Mama in the jacuzzi?" She asked. 
"You know Mama. I'm sure she'd love to meet your friend though, Zeus knows you don't bring enough of them over."
"I wonder why," Melody breathed. "Okay Sammy, let's go see Mama." She led me out throught the big room, down a hallway to the left, and out a back door to a giant pool, complete with a fountain shaped like a beautiful sculped man shooting water from holes in his gut. Ew. To the left side, closest the door, was a jacuzzi sporting the most ridiculous hullabaloo I'd ever seen or heard from a jacuzzi. It wasn't just bubbles or water jets, it was a literal whirlpool in there. Was it broken?
"Mama!" called Melody. The whirlpool subsided and up from the gaping center of the hole floated an eye about as big as a golf disc. It batted.
"Hello, my dear one," said a deep voice in time to water slooshing around the stiller jacuzzi. "Who have you brought?"
I was past terror now, I was simply in awe of the...I didn't know what or who. In awe of the whirlpool? The water that had grown an eye and spoken to my friend. The water that was apparently Melody's "Mama." I had no idea, but either way, I had enough guts now to say, "I'm Sam." 
"Call me Carrie." Did the water smile? Could water smile? Anything was possible, I thought, picturing the one Melody had called Mom, with her many greusome yet well managed heads.
Melody spoke again, sensing the thickening air of awkwardness. "Alright Mama, well Sam and I are gonna head up to my room and figure out what he's gonna be for Halloween. Have fun in there." 
The eye batted again, the water bubbled a placated hum and the whirlpool began again as the giant eye disappeared to the depths again. 
Melody spoke with just a bit of nervouness. "Sorry about my moms. They're weird, I know. They can't help it. It's an undersocialized sea monster thing." 
I couldn't help it, I laughed. Undersocialized sea monster thing. Melody had two moms and they were literal sea monsters. Made sense, seeing as Melody was also a sea monster. I wondered why landlocked Oklahoma had been the place to settle, and I voiced this.
"Oh, you know. The days of dashing sailors against rocks are pretty well over. There's no fun in it anymore. Everything travels by air now, and Zeus has got that pretty well guarded. Did you know that Poseidon is a sloppy drunk? You can really get away with anything in the sea as long as you can stay off government radars. Though, that's getting much harder." 
I was still laughing. I wasn't jaded enough yet to mythical nonsense to just let this one slide. "So you know Zeus?" 
Now Melody was howling with laughter as well, though it seemed like it was at me and not with me. "No way! For one, the guy's a royal jerk, and for another, do you think he's got time for me when there are folks like Eris causing mayhem everywhere? She tried to convince Poseidon to make that Sandy hurricane into a tsunami that went all the way to Missouri. she almost had him, too, everything sounds like a fun idea to Poseidon. Zeus is always having to take care of things like that. I'm just a high schooler, I hardly even kill people. I'm nobody's worry." She seemed proud of being nobody's worry. I'd lost her at "hardly even kill people." I just tried to make my smile look convincing. 
"Anyhow, let's say hi to Glaucus. He's in the pool." What a name, I thought as Melody and I walked around to the edge of the pool. She leaned over the edge and tapped the water. A form shimmered from the opposite side of the water to us, and the head of a man popped out. He had long grey hair and a beard. He leaned over the dge of the pool, propping himself up with his elbows.
"Hey Mel!" He called with a happy smile. "Is this your friend Sam?" He threw me a wink. I threw one back, though it was stunted and probably just looked like a nervous tic. "I've heard a lot about you, Sammy!" He was boisterous and kind, like a cool dad. But he wasn't Melody's dad, right? I was confused about the lineage here so I whispered my confusion in her ear. 
She replied, telling me that Glaucus was technically her dad but nobody liked to talk about it. It was a source of family drama and she'd tell me more later. 
Out of the corner of my eye appeared a beautiful woman flanked by the docile wolf I'd seen before. She was carrying a silver tray holding what looked like several fish filets. She looked a bit like a grown up Melody. Her hair was up in a thick pinytail, it was thick and lush and with big, shiny curls all the way. Her eyes were the kind of rich brown that softens and warms you from the inside. She had glowing skin and luscious pink lips. She wore a white apron with lace trim and a few doughy smudges over a red and wuite striped dress that poofed out a bit at the waist. Her shes were classy black heels, I wondered why she wore them inside. I can't say I didn't feel a bit of a charm, like what Melody gave, but I knew it wasn't the woman's doing. It was me, just from looking at her. If not for the wolf, I'd have hugged her tight and smelled her hair and kissed her all over the face. What a creep. 
She left the tray at the side of the pool where Glaucus was still propped up, smiling like he knew a joke that no one else did. She kissed the man on the lips. Then she looked at me and said, "Hello, child." She spoke with a voice not unlike the husky one I'd first heard Melody use, though I now knew Melody's scratchy voice was just for effect, and this sounded more natural. Like Melody had modeled her voice after this woman, who might have been her aunt. "I'm Circe. And you must be Sam."
"Yes," I sighed without much energy but with much adoration. "Hi." I was such an easily infatuated schmuck, I knew, but I supposed I just really had a thing for Greek ladies. She was taken, I reminded myself, as Glaucus devoured one of the filets with his bare hands, chuckling and singing to himself.
Circe made eye contact with Mel and it looked like glowing pride. 
"Well, Sam, treat Melody well. If I find you smoking from pots, smelling cracks, or planking, I will not be pleased." 
I cackled at that cute remark. I thought I knew what she was trying to say, but the juxtaposition of her misinformed phrasing and her dead serious look sent me over the edge. 
Unfortunately, I think the woman took my laughter for making fun. "Were you planning on planking with my niece today, Sam?" said Circe with the kindling of a fire behind her eyes. "I'll be watching." She glared with motherly scorn. Then she turned to Melody and said, "You. Be careful what taste you develop in men." She spat the word "men" out like it burnt her tongue. "I've been around the block more than once and as you know, my taste has been less than perfect. I can see good in this one but if you're planning on creating any syzzurp tonight I will punish you to the full extent of my capabilities." She scratched the wolf's head with eerie timing. I did my very freaking best not to cough out a laugh at that one. Syzzurp! What a ridiculous idea. If I'd had courage I would have assured her that there would be no smoking from pots, no sniffing out of cracks, no planking, and absolutely, positively no syzzurp. Instead I smiled awkwardly and waited for someone to say something, clear the anger that had gloomed up the conversation.
After a breath, ever brave Melody snarled back at Circe with a lot of confidence and a little bit of teen rebellion. "This isn't about Sam," Melody snarled. "I'm not gonna make any syzzurp, okay, duh. And I'm also not gonna kill Sam, and I'm not gonna turn my best friend into a monster over a fish man! Your fucked up relationships are not my problem." Whoa! Apply cold water to the burn! I didn't even know what they were talking about but Circe looked pretty well offended.
"You are lucky I'm past my bewitching days, Missy. You'd be a newt in a split second, forget that pretty face of yours." Circe leaned in close and glared at my beautiful friend. Her skin seemed to grow thinner, I thought that for a few seconds I could see with more clarity the network of purple veins that lived under her skin. This was the first time I'd ever seen Melody look scared. 
"Alright," Melody said with a bit of a tremor to her voice. "Well Sam is a good man and I believe he will not...lead me to such extents as you have been led. Ma'am." Was I witnessing family drama or was this normal? I hoped this wasn't what Melody's home life was always like. 
I looked around, at the whirlpool that was one of Melody's moms, at the beautiful woman with the wolf by her side, at the man in the water with...was that a tail? Okay. I looked at the merman in the pool who was singing to himself a song about a fish filet. And then to my very good friend the Siren. I wasn't terriby upset about the way my life was going. 
Melody and I ended up in the walk in closet of her enormous bedroom, looking through costumes and giggling as she explained the details of her home life. "This is why I don't have meetings here! I would love to host, I love my house, but with my mom and Circe walking around things can get so crazy. At least Mama and Glaucus stay in the pool." She handed me some mismatched articles of clothing. "So Glaucus and Circe and Mom used to hate each other right? But now they're all kind of best friends. Glaucus thought my mom was super hot, which you can't see now but she totally was, from all the pictures. She was like Circe but hotter. Anyhow, she and Glaucus got it on a couple times and my mom got pregnant but then she dumped him because she and Mama fell in love. And he was like, really mad about it. He was so sad, he was just crying and crying and his tears started causing tsunamis and stuff, not to mention it was really pathetic. But one day he stopped feeling sorry for himself and started talking action. He went to Circe, who like, used to be a witch but isn't anymore because she goes to anger management. Circe was gonna make a potion for Mom to try and make her pregnant ass fall back in love with Glaucus, but Circe started crushing on him too, so it was totally super awkward, and instead of making a potion for my hot mom to fall in love with Glaucus, she poisoned my mom and turned her into a sea monster. So she and Mama hung out in this channel and ate people for a while, and Circe and Glaucus learned to love each other despite all their shitty flaws. It's totally twisted. They're huge freaks." 
I was laughing along with this entire story, trying on silly articles of Melody's over my clothes. I liked this story. It was awesome. When Melody turned around I was wearing a motorcyle helmet, a red corduroy trenchcoat, and polka dot galoshes. "How do I look?"
"Haha, smashing! But nobody's gonna know what you are. I don't even know what you are, I can't even see your beautiful face. Let's go for some more direction, shall we?" I nodded my head from inside the helmet in agreement. Direction was good.
Eventually, after trying on many uncuccessful combinations of ideas, we went in a fantastic direction. I ended up in a long yellow shirt with a blue t-shirt tucked into it and a red headband tied into a bow at the top. "We'll make it more perfect of course, we'll add some embellishments and find some shoes at the thrift store, and I'll have to do your hair and makeup on the night. But this is gonna be perfect." 
I thought so too.
--
I was in the waiting room of the therapist's office. It was 5:28 and I was not amused. This was right about the time that Melody would be forming all the madness into order at the Ham hole, and I was antsily waiting to get called into a room by somebody I didn't know to talk about my worries. I didn't even know what I would be allowed to say. Could I talk about my monster friends under doctor patient confidentiality? I decided I'd just act like all the drama in my life was not attributed in large part to the fact that most of my best friends were not supposed to exist. 
"Samhain Clark?" came the voice of the little woman who had been rude and confusing at the front desk. Of course she struggled to pronounce my first name and of course she ended up aying it wrong. Typical rude receptionist. 
"That's me." I raised a hand a small way. 
"Go down that hall. Dr. Parker will meet you." She pointed while pursing her lips as if I was offensive. Great welcoming committee at this little joint, here.
I got up and walked down the hall, quite anxious indeed. What if I acted anxious to the therapist? Then they'd think I was anxious. That made me anxious. 
Dr. Parker was waiting for me. He was a tall fellow with dapper grey hair and thick black glasses. "Hello, you must be Samhain!" He pronounced it right. I felt a tiny bit of relief. I almost thanked him.
"I just go by Sam. Hi." 
He shook my hand and beckoned me into an office. It was pretty sterile in there, even with a couple of comfy looking chairs and a lot of art and inspiring quotes and stuffed animals. The carpet was grey and hard and the walls were white. The ceiling was tiled. I felt cold. 
"So, Sam, why are we here today?" Asked Dr. Parker in a comforting, slightly patronizing voice. 
"I don't know."
"Is there something, going on in your life? Maybe something is making things hard for you?"
It felt weird to be asked those things. I didn't really want to talk about it, now that I was here in this cold place. I forced some words out anyway. "Lots of things, I guess. I'm messing things up with people. I can't sleep. Everything is crazy."
"How are you messing things up with people?"
I didn't know what to say, so I said something wrong. "This is stupid. I want to go hang out with my friends."
"You can go, but I'd like you to stay. You seem reluctant to talk about the things that are bothering you, and I'd like to get past that." I didn't really know Dr. Parker, but I didn't like him much so far.
"I'd rather just go. I don't think this is working."
"I think you should take a minute to decide whether you've given this the chance it deserves."
All this was well and fine for Dr. Parker, who was the one trying to keep me here against my will, but I was starting to feel trapped. The opposite of how I should be feeling here. 
"I need to go." I said with as much force as I coud muster, which, at the moment, wasn't a huge amount.
"Be my guest, then," said Dr. Parker with regret. 
I swooped out of the room without another word, speedwalked out of the office, and ran to the Ham hole. 
--
"Coming! What password!" 
"Ham 2012."
"You late Sammy!" 
"Sorry Hammy." I said. The exceptional anxiety I'd had in Dr. Parker's office was pretty much gone; I'd burned it off running to the Ham hole, and knowing I was going to get to hang out with the people I'd chosen to be my friends made me feel quite a lot better. "Thank you Ham!" I said with surprising vigor as he let me in. 
I liked the feeling that I got upon walking into the living room with the couch that still had a hole shaped like Sven's foot in it. I liked the fact that I walked in and everybody was looking at me, and it wasn't because I was that weird gay Vampire kid, it was because they were my friends. I realized I'd never, ever felt this good in a group before. Usually I was all alone in a corner any time there was an event, sometimes panicking, usually uncomfortable and wanting to leave. This was totally difrerent for me. 
A few people waved, everyone smiled except for Sven, and Melia by default, as she was not there. 
Melody, who was at the front of the group, called, "Alright Sam, sit down. We're talking about Halloween." 
I sat between Carl and Dennis as Melody spoke. 
"So, Ham got an invitation to a big party. It had all our names on it. It didn't have a return address and it wasn't signed, but the only people who know about our whole thing are trustworthy. As many of you know, we have friends over in Broken Arrow, some in Enid, and some in Rogers, Arkansas. I'm assuming they just wanted to stay on the down low, but because of the potential for creepiness that comes with an anonymous message and the amount of secrecy that we've gotta keep, Ham and I decided it would be best to take a vote. The invitation is for a party at a house in the woods a few hours out of town."
Ham cut in here. "I not scared of anything! I think great idea. Big party deep in woods? There probably be dancing all night. Probably be peeing in bushes. Probably be very much fun." At the mention of dancing all night, Dennis had begin a slow clap, and at the mention of peeing in bushes, Goody Corey oohed with delight. 
I smiled. I liked things like adventures, forests, and the ability to escape that the wilderness provided, and I'd sort of been hoping for big plans on Halloween night. I was going to vote yes for sure. 
It turned out that literally every other person in the room also voted yes, even crappy old Sven. So it was settled, next Friday, Halloween, would be spent in the forest, dancing all night and peeing in bushes. Carl whispered in my ear, as well, that shenanigans such as this often involved consumption of substances that, as a fresh 18 year old, would still be illegal on Halloween night, but that since we'd be so far away from the rest of the world, if I wanted to have some fun with some drugs or alcohol I'd probably be free to. Carl seemed like he was excited for this prospect. I wasn't sure why. Maybe he liked speed. 
After deciding to go to the big party on Halloween, the planned schedule of meeting events was over and it was time for the open forum. Carl, who was sitting next to Sven on the other side, whispered in his ear and shoved him a little bit, like he was trying to get him to go onstage and say something. Sven seemed reluctant but did end up getting up and going to the front of the room. 
He stood in front of everyone, looking more uncomfortable than I had felt in Dr. Parker's office, and huffed and puffed for a few seconds. Finally he found his words. "I wanted to say um. Fuck. Ham I'm sorry I broke your shit." Then he went and sat back down, glaring at me the whole way.
"It okay Sven. We definitely still friends. But Ham not have a lot of money so please be careful next time." Ham blew a kiss at the Elf, who was not a lot shorter than Ham when I thought about it. Sven made a face at Ham. 
There was nobody else who had a thing to say, so we all just milled around for a few hours. I talked to Finnigan about his betta fish, which were doing quite well. We talked some more about the origins of the two of them, the Will-o-the-Wisp. 
"Some say the origin is a man called Will the Smith," began Finnigan on the mythological beginnings of Will-o-the-Wisps. I laughed, though, interrupting him. "What's this?" he asked in reference to my rudeness.
"Just. Will the Smith." I was still laughing. 
"Yes, Will the Smith, the wicked blacksmith who sold his soul to the devil and is bound to wander earth for all eternity with a single coal to keep him warm." Finnigan was not sure why this was not helping me stop laughing. "This isn't funny, it's very sad. He left a wife, Jade, a Smith, and a young daughter, Willow, the Smith's daughter, to fend for themselves. Some say the name "Will-o-the-Wisp" evolved from amalgamation of Willow the Smith and the more obvious, will, the desire, of the wisp, that would be the wisps of light that pull you in. You're at the mercy of the wisp, but you're also doomed to feel the pain of Willow, the Smith's daughter, Jade, a Smith, and Will, the Smith,  forever." 
I cackled for a full minute before I could explain myself. "Will the Smith. Not to be confused with the American entertainer, Will Smith. No, this is a very different man. Will the Smith. The wicked blacksmith." I spoke in stunted sentences between giggles. I don't think Finnigan ever got why it was funny. 
Later, I talked to Brian. I wanted to know the scoop on he and Aubrey. "So I hear you've been going on dates," I pushed after we'd said hello and he'd asked why he was here, he was just a regular guy. I'd reminded him that he was a ghost and he'd seemed pretty surprised, like he did.
"Oh, yes. I'm dating a pretty girl named Aubrey." I sort of didn't like talking to Brian, his intonation was eerie and his face always looked like a mix between seeing something awful and wanting something terribly. 
"What's she like?" I asked, only feeling a little bad for being a liar, and hoping Buddy wasn't within earshot to call my bluff.
"She talks a lot, but I like it. I'm quiet, you know. I observe. She's got a friend named Sam, too. He seems a lot like you."
"He's me." I admitted it, there was no reason for me to lie (so why was I doing it?) and I didn't wanna make things messy.
"Oh, that makes sense," said Brian, flickering. I walked away uncomfortably.
Then Buddy, Captain under his arm like usual, had come up to me again. "I've so missed you during yoga," he smiled. 
I'd been holding back so much fear for so long about old Buddy that when he confronted me again, I nearly cried. Instead, however, I fessed up. "Buddy, I am scared of you," I said with an amount of resignment I'd seemingly called out of nowhere. "I have no idea what you are and I am classically very fearful of the unknown." 
And after that I knew I'd said too much. My hands shook and I held my breath until Buddy consoled me.
"Trust me, Sam, it's not as bad as it seems. I just don't need to talk about it. It's not the most important part of who I am and I don't feel the need to define it to everyone I meet." I realized that that was sensible. But I also was terrified. If my throat hadn't run out of lubrication I might have told him that I respected that but also couldn't relax during his classes anymore, but as it was I couldn't. Eventually I gulped loudly and told him I'd been so busy but wasn't giving up my practice. Then I walked away dazedly.
After that there wasn't much conversation to make, nor was I terribly comfortable talking to anyone I didn't already trust with my heart and soul. Dennis and Finnigan were holding glasses and leaing against a wall talking, Goody Corey had thrown on a ratty old once purple coat and left to feed her cats, Brian had just simply vanished, Ham and Melody and Carl were all sitting in a cluster on the couch, and Sven was sitting and....oh. Glaring at me. I hadn't even noticed. How long had he been sitting like that? 
I decided that I needed to have the guts to talk to Sven right then. He wasn't beating me up anymore but he was certianly not feeling great about my existence. I was pretty sure I'd done something. He hadn't stopped glaring since he met Reggie. I didn't think those things were related. 
I stood for a few minutes, getting some strength and breathing, thinking about what I was going to say when I got over there. Sven's glare didn't break. I went for it.
"Hi, Sven," I said quietly, standing in front of the chair he was sitting in. I realized I was slouching and adjusted my posture to seem more confident. 
"What?" Sven's thin lips curled over his shiny white teeth and he was no longer glaring at me, but glaring slightly off to the left, into empty space. I noticed he had a foam stress ball in his hand and he was squeezing the torn up thing hard with white knuckles.
"What is wrong?" I cut to the chase. Sven didn't care for frilly edges anyhow.
"Nothing, fuck." He punctuated the second word with an extra hard squeeze to the poor tattered stress ball.
"Yes, there is." I breathed. "You have to tell me."
"I don't have to do anything."
"Do you like feeling like shit?" I boldly ventured to ask what no man had asked before. And Sven didn't have a comeback. He opened and closed his mouth a few times as if he was going to swear or reply or something, and eventually settled on an answer.
"No."
Was that a breakthrough? "What are you mad at me about?" 
He sighed but I thought I'd convinced him to at least admit he had an emotion. "Whatever. You have all these friends and they like you and I don't even know what you do to make that happen. You don't fucking do anything." 
It was true. I didn't so anything to deserve all my friends. I wasn't a big dick but I wasn't a particularly nice preson either. I mostly sat around like a piece of furniture and didn't tell people how I felt about things. It was something that worried me a lot. 
"I'm sorry," was all I could manage to say. 
"Save it. And that Reggie kid was a dick."
"I know. I'm not into him anymore."
"Good."
"Okay." We looked into each other's eyes and I didn't like that I felt like I could see a real person in there. Maybe even the same person that I had been best friends with for two years. The person who was considerate and smart and generous. That eye contact wasn't Sven's classic glare that I'd gotten used to over the past four years. It was somebody that wasn't as strong as he looked. If I wasn't afraid of him I would have hugged him, but I was, so I didn't.
--
When I got home from school on Monday I found that my mother had gotten a call at home from the office of Dr. Parker. It had actually been Dr. Parker himself, calling to tell my mother that he was worried about me. I'd apparently shown signs of severe anxiety during our short meeting and had terminated after under ten minutes by simply leaving. I didn't deny this to my mom; I told her that I was stressed out and didn't want to be there, that therapy is supposed to make me feel better and that after just a few sentences back and forth with Dr. Parker I only felt worse. 
She told me she was worried about me and urged me to try again. I told her I wasn't interested. She reiterated that she was so very worried. I knew she was. I also knew I was in for it now that a doctor was worried about me, too. Wait until my dad found out, then two doctors would be worried about me. I told my mom that I was fine and went to my room to hyperventilate in peace.
Without a lot to do other than sing along to Grizzly Bear and detachedly click internet links, I soon found myself adjusting the settings on my desktop, changing the icons on my programs to pictures of shoes for the heck of it. Then I was adjusting my phone. First I adjusted the background image, I changed it from one of a bunch of empty plates and cups and cutlery that Aubrey and I had stacked and called "modern art" at a restaurant to one I'd taken of Ham making his Mayor face, the one with the winking and the pointing. I looked through my contacts and deleted a few that I didn't recognize (who was Belissa? I didn't know anyone with that name). Pulling the touch screen down with my finger, I paused on Cole's name. Should I call him again? Of course not, that was silly. Of course I should just give him the space he needed and let him come to me. I didn't even have time or energy to deal with him. But I cared and I missed him. 
The phone rang twice and Cole answered. 
"Hi Sam." His tone was surprisingly kind and sincere. 
"Hi. Did you get my message?" 
"Yeah, it was really nice. Thank you."
"Why didn't you call me back?" 
"You seemed busy. I wanted to give you space to get to know your new friends before I tried to dominate your time again. You seem happy." This conversation was turning out to be a big surprise; I had been under the impression that Cole hated my guts. 
"I am happy, thank you."
"I'm glad. Well, yeah. As soon as you're ready to be friends again, I'll be here."
"How about Celia?"
"She's still mad. She thinks you ditched us to go hang out with the physical manifestation of evil. I keep telling her we don't really know what's going on." There was a pause in which Cole didn't speak and I had to fire a few synapses before I realized the instrument of pure evil he was talking about was Sven and it was metaphorical, not the actual facts of the situation. I hoped. "What's going on?" he finished. 
I sighed and thought for a second. What could I even say? Every second that ticked away made it harder to start talking, so the silence started getting pretty long. Cole probably expected that. 
"I don't know," was what I settled on.
"Okay," said Cole, sounding a little disappointed. "That's okay."
"Thank you. Um. I'll see you at school." 
"Sure. Bye, Sam." 
"Bye."
--
On Monday at lunch I knew the best thing to do was to hang out with Cole and Celia. I was anxious, but I didn't have to like it, I just had to do it. 
First I found Mel and Carl and Sven under the big tree with the thinning leaves. I didn't want to just not show up. Sven gave me a look that was almost like he was glad to see me, and the othr two didn't hide it. I smiled.
"I am gonna sit with my old friends," I said. "They miss me!" 
"Sounds good," said Melody with that smile she had that made you feel like you were in on something. 
I went across the grassy field to the cafeteria, feeling alright. The trees were shedding, and even as fast as the leaves on the ground were getting raked by the powers that be they replenished themselves. It was getting cold. I loved it. 
I walked through the propped open cafeteria door and had to sort of shimmy around kids in the lunchline. I didn't like that, the seating wasn't really accessible unless you had gone through the entire line. It was a bane of my existence whose grace I'd mastered, but this time, after a few weeks break, I got clumsily tangled in the roping that defined the line. Oh well. I found myself on the proper side of the shenanigan, dusted myself off, and went to where Cole and Celia were sitting, waiting, watching me. 
"Hi guys," I said, standing with my hands on the edge of their table, not daring to feel welcome enough to sit. 
"Hi Sam," said Cole charmingly, but he looked at Celia while he did this as if to tell me she was the one I needed to pander to. I looked at her and smiled as best as I could while in the spotlight like that. 
"Sam, do you care about us?" asked Celia with that sort of punitive motherly expression she got when she was pissed off.
"I do." I nodded.
"Then make a decision. Do you want to tell us what's going on or do you want to keep us confused?"
"It's complicated." I tried hard to be intelligible but I was inadvertenty mumbling, looking down, and slouching into myself. Celia had a way of putting me into really stressful situations.
"Why are you here, then? Explain youself or leave." She sounded like she wasn't my friend anymore. I guessed that was okay. I gave Cole a pitying look and turned to stumble under the roped off line again and go hang with the people who didn't talk to me like I was a rotten toddler.
--
The rest of the week passed by distressingly slowly. It had to have been because I was so excited for Halloween, which was exciting in itself because Halloween was so often a source of stress for me rather than fun. I had to admit, I was excited about going back to Mel's house to get ready, I was excited about my costume, and I was excited about the big party on Friday. It was two hours out of Broken Arrow and thirty miles off pavement so it had to be fancy. We were planning on camping out overnight, so we were supposed to bring tents and sleeping bags and food and water and warm clothes and things that lit up. I was prepared; I used to go camping with my dad a few times a year before I picked the internet over going outside. There was a two person tent (which I offered to share with Melody), two sleeping bags, a few headlamps, some folding lawn chairs, and some camping cutlery all located in a giant storage bin in the garage. I decided to bring the whole thing with me. Carl would be driving himself, Melody, Ham, Sven and I, and I knew there'd be enough space in his dilapidated old van to hold the five of us and plenty of belongings. 
It turned out that Dennis also had a van, as he was a musician (a thing I didn't know until Melody told me), and would be bringing himself, Finnigan, Buddy, and Goody Corey. We were as prepared as heck. 
I spent all week gathering things I'd need and planning my costume. My parents seemed torn between pride that I was motivated to do something and worry about my obsessiveness. Just the fact that I was going to an overnight party tore them, half of them wanted me to stay at home and be their safe little baby and the other half was excited to see me applying myself. I didn't have time for the politics and just did the thing that made me happiest, and that was preparing and repreparing and planning and replanning. 
Then it came. Friday. My eighteenth birthday. Halloween. The big night. I didn't feel any different and that worried me.
At school I didn't dress up as anything special at all; I didn't care what other kids thought I was going as. I just wore my standard issue jeans, shirt and sweater combination. Carl went all out as a Zombie, painting his face grotesque green and wearing ratty clothes, walking around moaning at people. Melody went as a caricature of the "sexy costume" trend, putting a bikini top made of banana and orange peels over a trash bag, tangling plastic wrappers in her ratty hair and donning forest green lipstick to complete her look as a "sexy dumpster." Even as she stumbled around in apt impersonation with her hair all tangled and huge and smears of brown on her face and arms, she looked stunning, as fucking always. Sven, as he had promised, did not go as anything but crummy old Sven. There were a few memorable costumes at the school, one kid went as a very well-executed dinosaur, one as Skrillex complete with real beets to drop, but nothing was as important as the real live overnight party we were to head to that night. 
I went home with Mel after school to get my costume all ready. We had glitter glued buttons and vertical stripes onto Melody's old blue t-shirt, we'd cut the yellow felt skirt to go to my knees. I'd tried on some heels but they'd been pinchy and I hadn't been able to walk in them. I'd decided that this was the kind of occasion during which busting out my favorite red boots would be smart and I'd borrowed white tights from Melody. After I'd positioned all the clothes well enough, it was Melody's time to shine in the hair and makeup department. She set a curling iron to heat up and set to work making my cheeks pink and putting cold gloop around my eyes (it was very hard not to blink as she did this). There was also some red gloop on my lips, which felt weird. But this was why people said they "suffered for fashion." This and heels.
After the face portion of the show was over, Melody set to work making my hair curly. I don't know how she did it, but it ended up sort of wavy and then curly at the bottom. This was something I realized when I went to the bathroom, "to take a breather," I had told her, since Vampires don't actually need restrooms (apparently). What I really did was look at myself in the bathoom mirror. Mel had shrouded her other mirrors due to the fact that she was unsettled by the fact that Vampires didn't have reflections. She apparently had been friends with a Vampire as a kid and it had given her the creeps every time. 
When I could safely view my reflection, I saw that I looked awesome. I looked pretty, I liked it. I'd never really worn makeup before; I liked the way it looked more than I expected to. It wasn't just that, though. As half assed and thrift store chic as I was, my costume was as recognizable as could be. I was definitely Snow White. 
"Such a princess!" beamed Melody when I returned, looking pleased with her handiwork and my general prettiness. I noticed this, too, when she led me from the ancient shrouded vanity in her huge bedroom to the stairs in the hall. It would do, I supposed. 
We called Carl and told him that we were ready, and in half an hour he had made the four block journey in his van to come get us. 
While we waited, we hung out with Glaucus. I liked the guy, he was a lot of fun. I wished I'd brought something to swim in or that the weather was appropriate for it, or that I wasn't already all coiffed and perfect. 
I tapped the water and the merman came jetting towards me. The grey head popped out of the water and the toothy smile he'd given me before hadn't left. "Sammy! Back again, are you?" 
I felt some pride well up in my gut when he remembered my name. That guy, that merman knew who I was and seemed excited to see me. I giggled. "Hey Glaucus!"
"Sammy, do you have a fish stick? I'm so hungry for a fish stick." I did not have a fish stick so I shook my head. "What a shame," said old Glaucus. I knew it was a shame. "At least you look fantastic."
Finally, after about half an hour, Carl had made the four block trip to Mel's and was ready to take us to the party, which was two hours out of the city when the driver wasn't Carl. I climbed in and saw Melody, still dressed as a sexy dumpster, Carl, still as a Zombie, Sven, looking sullen, and Ham as...a Vampire? I asked him if he was one. He hollered his reply, "I Hampire! Isn't cultural appropriation, right? Not think it fair to say it okay just because have one Vampire friend. But also not gonna promote negative idea about Vampires, so figure is okay. If it bother you I just go as Mayor." I smiled and nodded my okay. It was fine. 
As Carl inched ridiculously slowly along the street, I wondered how or if we'd ever get there. 
I learned the answer to this when Melody softly but assertively whispered to Carl, "Stop the van." 
"Why?" Carl whine-moaned.
"Because I'm driving." 
Ham went, "Ooooooh."
Carl went, "Fine." He stopped the car and got out, letting Mel in the front. From then on, the drive was relatively uneventful and unstressful. We caravanned behind Dennis and the rest and didn't lose them for the entire hour and a half. Ham started some sing alongs that only Melody joined in on, as Carl couldn't keep up, Sven was a big jerk, and I didn't really have the guts. This quickly dissolved into merry conversation. I felt really good. 
That is, until the directions urged us to leave the paved road and turn onto a thin dirt road. We followed Dennis' white van and the conversation died. 
The path was eerie, but the van in front of us was moving with what appeared to be confidence and we followed suit. I was immediately overtaken with a sense of dread though. I looked around, Melody was gripping the wheel hard, but it could have just been that she was offroading without a license. Ham had his massive unibrow furrowed. Carl's mouth hung slightly open and he did not look pleased. Even Sven's steady upset gaze had an obvious layer of fear beneath the surface. Okay. I wasn't the only one. But I wasn't going to be the one to say something.
Neither, it turned out, was anyone else. Not as we passed a shrub that looked exactly like a shrouded woman with carved out eyes, nor as we passed knobbly tree after knobbly tree shaped much more like sarcophagi, holding demons within who looked to have been trapped mid struggle and immortalized there forever. I didn't make a sound when the headlights illuminated something greyish with four unnaturally long legs and a vaguely human-shaped torso in my peripheral vision, running spookily into the dark of the trees. No, I didn't make a sound, but everyone's eyes followed it, and everyone looked like they didn't quite believe it was a trick of the light or a function of the mind. We kept driving, no one feeding the feral creature that was lurking in the car, the almost tangible fear that was slowly eating away at all of us. As soon as anyone mentioned that we were in haunted woods, what would happen? Then we'd still be five miles off pavement, thirty miles out of civilization, in the dark. It wouldn't help. We all stayed quiet.
Finally, at long, horrible last, after much pointless ado, we arrived at the party and so much the fear was immediately gone. Wow, that was a relief. I had started believing there was no party. Of course, though, of course. This was a friend of ours and they deserved to live in the middle of nowhere, because they deserved to be able to be themselves. The woods hadn't been haunted, they'd just been dark and unknown and I was classically afraid of the unknown. All was well, there was a big house here not terribly unlike Melody's, in a clearing, with plenty of lights and many cars and vans parked in front and all around. I could feel that my road buddies were also feeling better. Melody parked, apologizing for her crookedness, reminding us that she was good at the "going" part of driving but the rest was gonna take practice. 
Carl sluggishly opened the heavy sliding door on the van and he and I climbed out, while Ham got out of the front seat. I straightened my skirt, then I pulled the pink lipstick Melody had lent me from a secret pocket in the lining of the yellow thing and I added another layer for good measure. "Am I still beautiful?" I asked, spinning in a circle for Melody's approval. 
"Oh yes!" laughed Melody, with an ease that may or may not have been to make her feel more confident in the face of adversity. I knew well the feeling of acting big to feel big, I'd done it plenty. This could have been that or it could have just been a part of Melody, who was eons more confident and proud than I was. 
"Ham think you the prettiest at this party!" he laughed as Goody Corey, dressed as a ladybug, emerged from Dennis' van, toddled towards him, and hollered in her screechy croon.
"I'm the prettiest at this party, you are excused!" She then posed with a kissy face and her hands under her chin in a truly endearing fashion. I liked her costume, she was wearing a painted trash can lid over her tiny, hunched shoulders, fastened on her arms with shoelaces. In lieu of her dilapidated patchy pointy hat, she was wearing a stained cloth headband with pipe cleaners attached and and pom poms at the tips. It was precious and very, very Goody Corey. 
Ham looked at me, I nodded that it was okay for him to please Goody Corey, and thus he did. "You right Goody. You look like best prettiest ladybug in whole world. Beautiful pretty Goody." I was surprised at the enthusiasm with which he placated the tiny woman, and not at all surprised at the oohs and aahs he garnered from the little witch. 
Dennis stepped out of the van. He was dressed as David Bowie, and it was quite nice. the bell bottomed shiny purple and blue quilted jumpsuit he had on was just perfect. His faun legs (which I'd never actually seen) were well concealed, and it was fabulous. He had hairsprayed his shaggy hair into a vaguely mullety shape and painted that iconic lightning bolt over an eye. It wasn't historically accurate (I would know, I thought with a considerable amount of snootiness) but he rocked it hard and I was very impressed. "Hey, sweet costume," I told him.
"You too, Princess," he laughed hard, but he wasn't making fun of me, he just seemed glad. "How about that drive in?" he asked, rhetorically I hoped. "Eek!" 
Laughing, I nodded my head.
"Oy, and being in the car with Goody C?" He leaned in close and whispered in my ear. "She's a marvelous lady, I love her to bits, but is she odorous." We both laughed and it was nice. I liked Dennis. 
From around the side of the van came Finnigan. He was dressed as a lobster. "Great costume!" Melody told him, but he waved her off. 
"It's a dog costume." I laughed so hard I snorted.
"Why not just get toddler costume, Finny?" asked Ham, also laughing.
"Costumes for babies all look like they're for babies. Dog costumes are much more dignified." Finnigan shrugged. I was still cackling. Dog costumes are much more dignified.
Then something emerged. It was a big something, tall and hairy, and not as terrifying as I would have imagined. But probably because I had imagined it, over and over and over, through sleepless nights and exhausting days. It was what was keeping me from yoga, and it was exactly what I expected. Was I not surprised because I knew what was coming? Or was it because I was finally jaded to this sort of nonsense? Either way, after a few brief seconds of fear, the relief I'd craved for weeks finally came to me. It was Buddy, and he was a Werewolf, and he was still holding that dumb bulldog Captain under his arm. 
I didn't even cringe or back away in fear or even hold back a yelp. I just took a breath and said, "Hi, Buddy."
"Hello Sammy." His voice was deeper than usual but it was still him. Even his elongated snout, with its elongated, pointy teeth, his little beady eyes, his furry body were those of Buddy. It almost seemed natural now that I was looking at it. I was relieved and pleased to finally know what he was, lucky not to be surprised, and comforted by the fact that it was less gruesome than my worst nightmares had led me to believe.
I did have one question though. "Why now?"
"It's Halloween. I can't help it." Made sense, I guessed. I high fived him to show that I didn't have a problem or think he was weird. We all went inside.
The inside of the place was pretty awesome. There were platters with drinks on them and comfortable yellowish lighting, and very appropriate Halloween decorations. The party was helf between two huge rooms, a patio and a heated pool. I hadn't brought any swim stuff, and I regretted that for the second time today. It looked like a nice place to take a break for a minute.
The place was pretty swinging at ten in the evening, which was a surprise for a place as far out of the way as this was. Nobody really looked like they were monsters like us but we didn't really look like monsters. I shouldn't get so comfortable thinking of myself as a monster like them. 
I looked around at all the unfamiliar faces and I remembered: did we even know who had invited us yet? That felt irresponsible. I asked Ham, and he hollered in my ear over the sound of appropriately volumed electro music. "We think it probably our friend Max from Enid. He werewolf like Buddy. He have lot of rich friend because he invent better vegan cheese. Anyway, we find out!" Wow, I thought I liked adventure but this was pushing it. I felt a twang of anxiety at the "who is hosting this party" variable.
Approached a man shaped form in a latex mask of the president. He was pushing a wheelchair with a blonde woman dressed in long sleeves and a mermaid suit. As soon as he had gotten our attention, he spoke.
"Hello, Ham! Hello, friends. Welcome to my party." I thought this must be the werewolf friend Max, though there was something very familiar about him. I couldn't pin it down, but I didn't woder for long. He pulled the mask off and I knew. It was not Max, it was Mayor Schmoverlord. What was he doing here? What?
Now I recognized that voice. The Mayor had a transatlantic accent. It matched the slick black, perfectly stiffened hair with the harsh part that he had, the ever black suit, the tall, distressingly thin stature, the cigarette that seemed to pay rent between his fingers. He looked like he was in black and white except those green eyes that seemed to glow. His voice crackled like a vinyl record. Of course I'd never met him in person, I'd just thought those things were television or radio or newspaper tricks. But now, after just a few moments in his presence, I knew that was not the case. 
"I'm Mayor Schmoverlord and this is Particia." He gestured to the mermaid in the wheelchair, who remained silent. "It's nice to meet you all. Snow White," he nodded his head towards me, "Lobster," towards Finnigan, "Bowie, Vampire, Ladybug, I'm sorry, I'm not sure who you are," he nodded his head towards Melody. 
"Sexy dumpster," she said matter of factly. 
"Ah, I do see. And we have a Zombie here, and a Jock." He stared Sven in the eyes, unblinking, like he knew he was just being a douchebag. Sven looked like he was trying not to growl. 
"I'm not anything, actually." 
"I do apologize, my friend." Schmoverlord smiled slyly, leaned into a puff from his cigarette, and sauntered away.
Ham bared his fake vampire fangs hyperbolically. "Me beat that guy next month."
Goody Corey and Dennis giggled and smiled towards Ham. I was excited for him to win, too. I was not happy with Mayor Schmoverlord's policies or his unnerving presence. I didn't know how I felt about being at his party. 
Even with the creepy mayor around, we all managed to have some fun. We danced and ran around and participated in a costume contest (which Carl won by a landslide for his uncanny Zombie likeness). As soon as I started getting visibly stressed out and overwhelmed by all the people and lights and noise, Melody had the great idea to climb a tree together. I got some smudge on my skirt on the way up but it was worth it; the view and the distance was awesome and welcome. We got about fifty feet up in this giant pine and just sat there and watched what was going on for a few minutes.
"I like it up here," I said.
"It's so nice," Melody agreed. Then, after a few seconds of silence, she said, "You're weird, Sam. But I like you."
I wasn't sure what to do with that. She was weird but I liked her. "Thank you. I like you."
We were sitting next to each other on a sturdy high branch, surrounded by that evergreen smell and completely hidden from view of anybody down on the ground. I felt really nice. Sitting there with lovely Melody, who was all the assertiveness I could never muster and all the charm I could never learn. I looked at her in the relative darkness. Her face was illuminated with diluted stroby lights. She turned to me and we smiled at each other. Then we were kissing.
This was definitely the best kiss I'd ever had. Of course, with so little to compare it to, and with Reggie's awful tonguey dog kiss still fresh in my mind, it would have had to be been pretty bad not to be a relief. But even so it was entirely lovely. She had no shame and no reluctance, but there was also nothing...gross about it. It was a mutual thing, what we both wanted at that exact moment in our lives was to be making out with each other. Her lips and mine fit together so well. She smelled really, really good, even though she was wearing trash. What started off as something both of us had probably been thinking about but neither of us had the guts to execute ended up being a precarious makeout session at the top of a tree. It definitely limited in its comfort, I thought after a couple minutes. It would be nice to be laying down or at least something other than craning our necks to the side. Ah, well, it was very nice. I had a hand on her back and another in her hair and she had one around my neck and the other at the base of my spine. Regardless of the fact that if we fell down we'd surely die with each other's lipsticks smeared all over, it was great. As soon as we stopped I missed it. I could get used to that.
Instead of telling her any of that, though, in classic Sam style I just chuckled a little. She joined in. After all, I was weird, but she liked me. That was cool. I didn't have to try to be more talkative or sociable or anything. I was alright just doing me. How nice was that? "You are awesome." I told her. She deserved at least that.
"Sam, you are so awesome." Her expression was glee with no reservations. I was glad I'd helped her feel like that. 
"I'm cold," I said. It was true, I was just wearing a short sleeved shirt and wanted to grab my jacet from the van, and we'd had to have been up there for fifteen minutes at this point. I didn't wanna worry anybody by dissapearing into the cold, dark night. 
"Yeah, okay," she said. She giggled a little. "Your face is so green. We're not gonna be able to hide this." 
"That's okay," I said. If people thought Melody and I had been making out, those people would be right, and that was fine and awesome. I had no shame in having kissed the loveliest girl I knew. I hoped she felt that way too. 
Melody's smile was as big as her whole face. "Awesome. Good. Let's go." 
We climbed down. I snagged some of the glitter glue on my shirt on a branch and a whole sparkly button fell off, leaving a weird discolored distressed peak where it had been tugged, but I had already lost the costume contest to cool Carl, and I was sure people would be paying more attention to the cheap green lipstick that had probably dyed whole swatches of my face, so I didn't really mind. 
I was a little frazzled when we got down to the bottom due to all the stimuli being suddenly back, being a little worried about what would happen when people saw my green lipsticked face and Mel's haphazardly smeared away pink. That was another problem with wearing lipstick, aside from the fact that it was weird and sticky. It was like an inconvenient marking of territory. Bleh. Also, on the way down from the tree, I'd been scared shitless by what looked like a pair of big yellow eyes glaring at me. I'd made eye contact and they'd blinked away as a dark form slithered out of view. It was either a spooky cat, a malevolent monster, or a trick of the light. I mean, of course it wasn't a big deal. If it had wanted to get me, it would have. I was vulnerable. 
Anyhow, I'd lived through it. Once Melody and I got close enough to the bottom of the tree to really be able to see each other's faces, we did our best to wipe off the smudges we'd caused and straighten each other's hair, and then we went back to the party. 
"Where you two been! I looking all over!" said Ham, taking a swig of something from a red cup and holding his vampire fangs in the other hand. 
"Up a tree," smiled Melody, dimples showing. 
Ham's eyes widened as he looked at the two of us. "Ooooh," he crowed. "No tell Svenny ok?" 
I wasn't sure why he wanted that, but I trusted the guy, so I smiled and nodded. 
Approached Schmoverlord, still pushing the wheelchair with the docile mermaid, his latex presedential mask over one of the handles as he advanced. 
He stepped to the side of Patricia's chair and took a drag of his cigarette, his green eyes glinting and his pomaded hair reflecting light. "Hello again, my friends. How is your experience as of late?" He was like a creepy Cary Grant.
"It good! We have fun!" Ham made the metal sign with the hand that had returned the vampire fangs to their rightful place. 
Schmoverlord sneered. "Good," he drew the word out. He looked at Melody and I and raised an eyebrow, giving us a knowing look. "Young love," he lamented. "I hope you ladies enjoy it while it lasts." He looked up in the sky as if he were remembering the old days. His sharp nose cut through the dark edge of the forest like a sepia mountain. 
"Ladies?" Melody asked. 
"Isn't this your lady friend? I see you are wearing each other's lipstick." He looked amused. 
I shook my head. "I'm a guy," I said, and my voice was certainly masculine enough to give that away.
"Oh, my. My sincerest apologies. I thought you were just ugly." 
Melody inhaled sharply and Ham's face turned foul. "Sammy make very pretty girl! You very nasty mayor."
Old Schmoverlord laughed and it sounded like a chorus of very poorly tuned violas. Goody Corey, Carl, and Dennis approached together from one side. I assumed they'd heard Ham yelling and wanted to cheack out the hubbub.
"Well, good luck with the election next week." Schmoverlord snarled out taut lips without parting his teeth. His eyes glinted and his brows were twisted with wicked humor. Patricia moved for the first time I'd seen; she lifted a pale, thin hand and snapped her fingers in a Z formation. The snaps were ridiculously crisp and accented Schmoverlord's ironic fighting words with a spooky sort of comedy. 
Ham, with his fuzzy hair slicked back, his Vampire fangs, the fake blood dripping from the sides of his mouth, and the thick black cape with the high collar around his neck, dropped his drink, bared his teeth, and let out a wordless holler with his arms open to the sides. The hard ground shook with the deep tone of his scream. He was letting out some real anger here. "Schmoverlord you so mean! You have worst policy! You try so hard make the poor suffer, make the rich get richer! Donate to Wal Mart! Why you think Wal Mart need money? Wal Mart why Ham favorite market closed, now no more store sell favorite natural shampoo! Why you hate everything good? I beat you so bad in election next week! I beat crap out of you! Want to feed you garbage and that on the record. Create job for fireman when you house mysteriously burn down. You worst mayor Ham ever even heard of!" He screamed again and swung his arm to punch the nearest tree, causing it to shake violently. "Ham hate your policies!" He screamed again into the night. 
I'd never seen Ham this angry. It wasn't like Buddy, who was now in Werewolf form with his gnarly jowl just a few feet from my head, a very convincing and expensive looking "costume," his calculated calmness that he turned to yoga to keep in check. Ham was just a genuinely calm, sweet guy. I'd read a little about Sasquatches and had deduced that generally they weren't violent, and the creepy stuff they tended to do in forests was mostly to scare people off their property. That was quite in line with how Ham acted. He minded his business and others minded theirs. But it seemed like Schmoverlord's business was Ham's business, it had become everyone's business as soon as he'd come into office before I was even born and started implementing only the worst possible laws, ordinances, policies, and ideas. He was the purveyor of everything ill-advised, mean, punitive, and ignorant. And he kept getting re-elected. Nobody knew why, but local, national, and even once an international researcher had double checked the legitimacy of the polls, and yes, he was drawing enough votes every time. The widespread theory was that he was so publicly unpopular that nobody would admit that they liked him except when voting. Either way, I hated him, and being newly eligible to vote, I was not going to change that opinion when I got to the polls on the 6th. 
Schmoverlord was still giving off that terrible grimace and Patricia's positioning in her wheelchair looked quite sassy. "We'll see, Ham. We shall certainly see." His cigarette had run out and he had dropped it, I thought, but I didn't see a butt on the ground when I looked for it. A new one was lit between his fingers, almost like it had just grown there. I didn't think that had really happened, of course, he had probably just fished one out of a pocket while he calmly allowed Ham to rampage. He took a drag, turned stiffly with his nose in the air, and wheeled Patricia away. 
"Ham want go home."
"I do, too," said Dennis bravely. 
"I haven't even had the opportunity to pee in a bush yet?" moaned Goody Corey questioningly. 
"Pee in a bush and we're leaving," said Buddy with that growlier voice he'd grown and a little more agression than I'd ever seen in him. 
Brian had appeared, as he tended to do, and Finnigan and Sven had joined the cluster of mayhem in the corner of the party yard. Was it Schmoverlord's yard? I didn't think it was, it wouldn't make sense for him to live hours out of the city. This must have just been one of his friends' houses. Did he have friends? Could he? I half wanted to find him and ask him. I might have if I didn't know it would make Ham, who was already feeling fragile, more upset.  
After Goody Corey had waddled back to us from her bush peeing adventure, all of us piled back into our respective vans (Brian with us as there was more space in Carl's van than in Dennis') and began our drive back. I sat behind Mel, it was the closest as I could get to her since Ham needed a front seat to himself.
The drive on the way out of the dense woods started out promisingly. I was comfortable and fuzzy after having kissed Mel, and generally having met Schmoverlord and having been around Ham's big rage was more important than the fact that some generally terrifying things had happened on the way in. 
We'd gotten Ham to calm down by promising him bottles of the shampoo he could no longer find, which was called Nature's Cleanse and he liked it in Lavender, and we were beginning to have a pretty jolly time. We got about three miles out of the party and into the dark lonesome forest before things got creepy again.
First it was the yellow eyes I'd thought I'd seen in the tree. They glinted from the left side several times, as if whatever had them was running beside us. I could see the shape of the animal that had them as well, it was small, about the size of a housecat. I figured if there was a housecat in the woods running beside us I shouldn't be so terrified, but it didn't seem right. It seemed cold and dark and bad out behind where the light hit. 
Then came the grey thing again, and this time I inhaled sharply with fear. The conversation had died again and the fear had returned. Again, I obviously wasn't the only one to see the horrible silvery monster. It had long legs, like a dog on stilts, except instead of fur it had horrible thin stretched grey skin, and instead of having the head of a dog it had a cockeyed bald human-shaped head. I couldn't see the front of the face and that was comforting. This time I saw it, the second time,, I knew it wasn't a trick of the light. It was almost like it wanted us to see it before darting back into the dark depths, like it was trying to scare us and then dart away like it was trying to convince us it was hiding. We kept going, leading Dennis, just trying to get out of there as fast as we could. I reached around Melody's seat and rubbed her arm, which was covered in goosebumps. Ham had a disgusted look on his face, Carl looked dumbstruck, Sven was glaring out the window, and Brian, lovely, unaware Brian, spoke for all of us. 
"What was that?" It didn't help that even when he wasn't scared he spoke slowly, drawing out his vowels and sounding generally confused and heartbroken. 
"Don't know," said Carl, being the one with the bravery to speak like the steadfast warrior he was. 
"Why are we here? It's haunted," Brian said. Gosh, that wasn't very comforting. Brian the unwitting ghost probably knew haunted when he saw it. I figured it was probably part of being a ghost, getting attuned to that sort of stuff. It wasn't nice.
"We're almost, back to, the highway," said Carl, cool calculation covering the undead moan that was his voice. 
"I don't like it here, I really don't like it," said Brian. 
As everyone's fear escalated with the knowledge that they were not the only ones who were terrified, the holy mother of all horrifying things went down. Into the tiny dirt road from a gap in the trees emerged a huge spider. Not huge like as big as a baseball, or a basketball, or a watermelon. Huge like as big as a car. As big as Carl's van. That was just its body. Its legs made it twice as tall and hugely wide. It hardly fit in the road. Melody slammed on the breaks as she covered her mouth to stifle the scream. Ham and Carl and even Sven yelped. I let out an involuntary moan and my voice shook. I pulled it back in and tried to keep it there.  
The spider was black and grey and it was looking at us with a hundred glowing green eyes. Its pincers smoked slightly as it lifted its horrible head to the sky and made an earth shattering noise, like fingernails on metal. 
I sat paralyzed, sure that I was about to die. The giant spider teetered closer to us on its many legs and leaned its head in close, smoking from the fanged mouth between those enormous pincers that were so terrifyingly close to the front of the car now. Wow. If I had known how to pray I would have done it, but as it was I didn't so I just sat there, my mind racing, my parents would never know what became of me, I was so sorry for being aloof and weird. My mouth dried up and I supressed the urge to vomit at the same time as I fought to stay conscious. The horrible spider's glowing green eyes were only brighter in the direct stream of the headlights. Melody started crying. Ham was panting loudly. The spider picked up the front end of the van with its massive gnarly jaw and shook it around, hitting my head against the seat and sending my vision into scattered sparks for a second as I gripped the bottom of the seat as hard as I could. The scene went eerily slowly and quietly, no one screamed, everyone seemed resigned that they would die here. Except probably Carl.
Carl, by the way, wasn't freeaking out. I turned my head as much as my body would let it right then and saw Carl' head darting around (as much as his languid movement could be called that) with a stern expression, like he was trying to find something. 
Finally, his gaze settled onthe back of Ham's chair and he gazed resolutely, forming something in his head, as the spider focused on shaking Dennis' van for a few seconds. 
"We have, to fight him." Him? I would definitely just call this beast an "it," and why was Sven getting called to action here? He was probably friends with this asshole spider.
Sven's terrified backwards gaze at the wreckage turned to an icy stare at Carl.
"Sven, you have, to glitterbomb him."
Even as the horrific spider reapproached our van (that now felt as safe as tin foil on popsicle sticks), and I sat there unable to move and with no means to protect myself, I knew this was funny. Sven, the homophobe, getting called to action to save a van of huddled terrified folks, via glitter. His weapon was glitter. I couldn't laugh but I would have.
"Fine," Sven said as the spider got closer. 
"In, the eyes." Sven nodded, the Spider stepped on the roof of the van, piercing it through and letting in not only the sounds of ripping metal but also spooky ambient night forest sounds and a rush of chilly night air. Melody screamed again as Carl yelled, "Go Sven! Mel, get him!"
His enthusiasm did little to comfort me as the fangs ripped the entire roof of of Carl's car. Then Sven, with very little Svenlike hesitation, climbed out and shot heaps of glitter into the many eyes of the monster. It let out that horrific scream again, this time with no buffer to dilute it. I couldn't help it anymore, I threw up on the floor in front of the seat, getting a little on my skirt and some on my red Doc Marten's. What did it matter if we were going to die anyway? 
When I looked up again, Melody was climbing up to what was left of the frame of the roof and Sven was still shooting piles and piles of glitter into the monster's many eyes. It was sticking and the thing was thrashing wildly around, blinking and screeching, but it wouldn't help. Sven didn't run out of that stuff.
Melody had arrived at the top of the van and was slowly walking towards the spider, Gazing intently and without fear. It was screaming and faliling and I didn't know if it could see her. No matter though, it turned out that her power was something I'd never seen before, not the sex goddess charm or the just generally being a wonderful person. She started singing. 
There were no words to this song, it was just a melody. It echoed from all the trees and vibrated in my chest. It was sad and beautiful and heart churning. It reminded me of all the things I'd missed out on or ruined in my life, all the times I'd been hurt, but it promised me that I could be okay with her. I was falling in love just by proxy, is what it was. The spider kept thrashing, faliling, and jabbing for a few moments, but eventually an eerie calm came over the area. It even affected Sven, whose glitter streams slowed and then stopped, and Goody Corey, who had exited Dennis' van and had begun to ferociously incantate at the thing while jabbing at it with a wand. All that was left was Melody's voice, and she was charming the fearsome beast like a snake.
The Spider's giant wretched form began to warp, the horrid green (now glittery) eyes running into each other, the limbs fusing together, the smoking pincers retracting into the fangy mouth. It was more greusome than ever before for a second and I tried not to barf on my shoes again, but eventually, all that remained there was a very glittery Mayor Schmoverlord, cigarette in hand, laying on the dirt path sort of humming along to Melody's song. Her voice never wavered, even as Sven audibly muttered "What the fuck?" and Goody Corey let out an "oooh" of dismayed surprise, and several gasps happened, including mine. 
Schmoverlord laid there, panting. Ham let out an even louder scream than he had before, and threw open the now dented door to go give a piece of his mind to the man who had just turned from a giant spider back into the mayor of Broken Arrow, Oklahoma. He ran over to the man and stood with giant balled up fists by his side, leaning over the mayor. "You almost kill us! What you think you doing! Worst mayor ever! I punch you but I not stoop to level!" I didn't know how ham had gotten over the whole "giant spider" thing so fast; I was still in shock for so many reasons (having just gotten attacked by a giant spider, the giant spider being the awful mayor of my city, the fact that I was even alive to be processing this information). Ham seemed to have gotten over the mayor being a spider pretty fast, but I guessed that was just because he was used to people being monsters. I wasn't. Yet. 
Schmoverlord didn't really have an answer to that, he looked tuckered out. Probably due to a mixture of just having fallen in love and whatever sort of apt spell Goody Corey had tried to cast on him. I didn't think the glitter was much more than a distraction. Oh, Sven. I had calmed down enough to realize that Schmoverlord was a sort of innefective giant spider. We'd taken him down (who was we? I had sat there useless and incapable of moving the whole time) pretty easily. I guessed his real terror rested in his awful political policies. 
Ham held out a hand to help the horrible mayor up. "I run you over but then winning election get biased. I beat you fair and square next week." He helped Schmoverlord up and led him to the edge of the forest, where Patricia was waiting in her wheelchair. 
--
The next day, I finally figured out what old Melia's deal was, why she never showed up anywhere or stayed for longer than a few minutes. She was a dryad, who lived in a little house by a big tree, or maybe it was a big tree by a little house, and wasn't able to leave for long because of some magic pull or something. I didn't really get it, but I was glad that I could visit her there now. Melody and Ham and Carl and Goody Corey and I went to tell her about the big "party" that she'd missed. We'd invited Sven but he seemed more morose than pissed off that day, so we let him stay away. We arrived in Carl's broken van (he apparently had told his mom that a tree disfigured the van, and she had apparently believed it. The roof was now a tarp duct taped down, and it didn't look much worse than it had before Schmoverlord's spider form had beaten it up) in the early, chilly afternoon, and knocked on Melia's door.
She sort of gracefully slithered from a low branch of the tree (which was still summer green with blooming pink flowers all throughout) and ended up behind us, not startlingly, but pleasantly surprisingly saying "Hello, friends!" She had a laptop under her arm. 
"Hi!" said Ham. I waved.
"Well come in," she said enthusiastically. "I was just working." I wondered what she did for a living. 
I thought we were to enter the tiny looking little white house, but instead Melia gestured for us to climb the tree. That was fun! I loved climbing trees. The last time I'd done that it had ended quite in my favor. 
Once I was up, I saw that it was much bigger on the inside. The branches were positively steps and the canopy spread out much farther on the inside than the outside. There was natural light in between the rafterlike branches but there were also lovely lanterns hanging from many of them. Past the little hole through which we entered the tree, there were actual floorboards. There were some bookshelves lining the leafy walls and a comfy looking hammock in a corner. A table was in the center of the room and a sort of kitchenette with a spice rack, some pots and pans hanging from the ceiling, and some open cabinets with foodlike items inside was off to one side. It was a tree house, but not like a house in a tree. The tree was the house. I loved it in there. 
Mel, Ham, and Carl all sat on a little wooden bench across the large room from the bookshelves, and Goody Corey and I sat on the ground. 
"I'm sorry about the lack of seating!" called Melia, coming in last after us. "I don't have unlimited space, you know." We knew and it was fine.
Ham started telling Melia what she had missed, starting from the creepy drive in, jumping to Melody and I coming down from the tree after sharing lipstick, and then cutting to the part where the current mayor of Broken Arrow was a huge spider who tried to kill us. While this was going on and Melia was listening with worried, wide eyed horror, Goody Corey had begun to mix ingredients in a pan on the table (with Melia's gracious permission, of course.) 
As soon as it became appropriate, I excused myself and went to see what the tiny hunched witch was concocting. 
"Milkshake!" she oozed gleefully. It did look like a milkshake. I wondered where she had gotten the ice, but let it go. Goody Corey worked in mysterious ways. 
"Can I have some when you're done?" I asked, not entirely serious. 
Her weathered little face snapped towards me and her beady little eyes glinted as she made a fairly horrified expression. Truly, how dare I. 
"It is not for drinking!" she squeaked as if I should have known that already. It was loud enough to turn heads but Ham went right back into his story, as Goody Corey was prone to saying things that were best left unquestioned.
"What is it for?" I asked, a smile growing on my face. The woman was strange as can be, but the more I got used to her peculiar odor, the more I liked her.
"I must capture a boy," she put simply. How would a milkshake capture a boy, I wondered, until she started pouring copious amounts of terragon and dill into the chocolaty concoction and muttering something that I couldn't quite understand. Okay, it was a potion milkshake. With all those incompatible flavors I hoped to goodness no one would drink it. 
"Why do you need a boy?" I asked. 
"Samothy, I am almost three hundred and fourty one, approaching middle age, and I won't be around forever. I must take on a pet apprentice before it's too late! It's time to capture a boy. A handsome boy, of course. A naked boy. With very nice...abdominals. And pectorals. And not to forget the collarbone." She displayed witchy spirit fingers as she cackled in thoughts of this handsome boy. I cackled as well, I'd never seen such passion in the tiny woman. 
She completed her milkshake and invited me to watch her perform the ritual. Ham and Melia and the rest were still discussing Schmoverlord, and I was sort of ready to let my mind break from the whole thing, so I agreed. Goody Corey and I took the milkshake, now in a modest glass, and travelled down to the yard. 
"Now step back, my dear Sam! The power of the milkshake is unpredictable! I feel that this is quite strong!" I stepped back to the trunk of the tree and Goody Corey began her powerful incantation.
"Mine milkshake shall beckon all lads to the yard
Thus speak I, it shalt best thine
Thou art correct, it shalt best thine!
I may intruct thee, yet I require dime!"
I felt a strange pull to the milkshake that Goody Corey was now sternly pouring over the grass.
"So mote it be," she finished. All at once, several men turned around corners onto Melia's street. They dazedly walked toward the little house. Goody Corey began to laugh. "It's working!" she called as more men rounded corners, confusedly walking towards Melia's yard. One even stepped out of a house across the street, wearing nothing but a pair of boxer shorts and one sock. 
The stream of men increased as Goody Corey cackled and twiddled her gnarled fingers. 
The influx of boys coming to the yard was not stopping, however, and eventually Goody Corey stopped laughing and yelled over the mumbling of confused, half naked men, "It's too strong!"
The streets filled with boys, droningly climbing upon each other in hopes of reaching Melia's yard. The lucky few who had arrived were rubbing their faces on the grass and sighing with delight. Melia and the others had come down from the tree to see what was going on, and looked more confused than anything.
"What's happening here?" called Melia over the din of murmuring boys. 
"Her milkshake brought all the boys to the yard," I told her, as Goody Corey was too busy scanning the masses for, I thought, one who fit her criteria. 
The men just kept coming, gathering and filling all empty space, as densely packed as I had ever seen people, except maybe at that Radiohead concert I'd gone to last year. Goody Corey had definitely forgotten about the fact that her milkshake had been "too strong," in favor of being excited about the hundreds of boys she had to choose from to be her pet apprentice. 
Goody Corey began walking from her little space on the yard, down through the thick crowd, which parted for her, gazing in awe. She didn't get far before she found one she liked. I could vaguely hear her saying, "Ahh, very nice abdominals, sir. Very nice pectorals. Very lovely collarbone. What are you called?" I couldn't hear the reply, but I could hear her squeaky voice over the din. "Jared, lovely! Come with me." 
She led the very tall, very ripped, very tan man through to the milkshake by the hand. Once they arrived, Goody Corey stomped her foot and hollered with force, "The rest of you are dismissed!" 
The many hundreds of boys who weren't chosen erupted in a long, dismayed boo, but thankfully left without rioting, more quickly than I thought they should be able to. A few stragglers who looked to have been trampled limped behind the rest, and we were left with a street covered in small bits of litter and clothing items, as tended to happen when crowds dissipated. 
Melia looked upset at Goody Corey and the fellow Jared who looked like an underwear model. "Why did you have to do that in my yard?" Even the very stern look Melia was offering was overwhelmingly gentle. 
"Well, I rent a shed, I have no yard." She gave a glare to Melia that said, "you should have known that." Melia opened and closed her mouth as if she were going to muster the energy to fight Goody Corey's logic, but sighed instead. "The incantation states 'the yard,' not 'my yard.' If you want to argue semantics, Melia, I am a highly decorated lawyer." I don't think anyone knew what that quite entailed, but no one said a thing. We just set to work cleaning up the rubble in the streets as finches pecked at the remains of the magic milkshake. 
--
I got home that afternoon and Misty darted out to lick the bushes. I caught her and kissed her on the head, mimicking her "mrrp?" noises and telling her she was a silly girl.
I held her up in front of me by the armpits once I got inside and I looked in her eyes scornfully. They were big and round and yellow. 
I suddenly got a strange pang of fear as I remembered the big yellow eyes on the small form that I had seen in the forest the previous night. They were the exact same eyes that Misty had.
As soon as I realized this, she started growling. I didn't think those things were related but I was scared anyway. Misty hardly ever growled, I wondered what I had done. I put her down and she stood there with her back arched, staring at me with her big yellow eyes. Was my pretty grey cat, the practical love of my life, actually the devil? She growled again as soon as I thought that.
I couldn't deal. I knew this was stupid, but I had to do it. "Misty, are you evil?" I looked her in the eyes with a stern expression and tried not to betray my stupid fear.
She stood still for a few seconds, glaring at me and growling, and then turned and walked away.
Cool. Great. 
I went up to my room and closed the door so Misty couldn't get in, though she very quickly started scratching and mewing at the door. I ignored her, I was busy online. 
Aubrey was talking at me about Brian. She was getting tired of him being difficult to contact, swimming in and out of her life. Whenever he was there he promised he'd be around and told her he loved her, but he'd disappear for weeks at a time. I knew that about him, but I also knew he was a ghost. I couldn't tell her that so I just let her know I was there to listen. 
Reggie had messaged me a bunch as well. I hadn't really been on my computer a lot in the past week (could it be that my social life was migrating...IRL?) and hadn't seen the actual number of messages I'd gotten from Reggie. 
"you kiss me and then ignore me...that's just great," said one from two days ago.
"the silence is deafening. where are the crickets?" That was from this afternoon. 
I had thought the breakup had been fairly mutual, if you could call it a breakup. I'd classify it more as "we finally met and it turned out terribly." No matter what it really was, though, it apparently wasn't mutual. I decided to put him out of his misery. 
"I don't wanna date anybody right now." There. I put the blame on myself so he shouldn't even feel bad. I hoped it would cause minimal drama.
I was wrong, though. There was plenty of drama to be had. Reggie had been marked as offline but his reply came immediately. "That's not what you've always said."
Way to put me on the spot, I thought. I shook my head to myself ad I typed my next message. I hovered over the send button for a second, deciding whether or not I really should say what I wanted to say. Fuck it. "let it go, reggie."
Reggie was typing for quite some time, and with good reason, as the next thing he sent was a paragraph.
"Wow. We've been flirting for two years and the day after we meet you stop talking to me? and now you want me to just let it go. what's that about? what did i even do to deserve that? youre so weird. i kissed you, i cant just forget that. i don't know why i ever thought i understood you. god. i hung out with your friendas and went to your dance and didn't say anything abotu it. that chick was obnoxious, the kid with afro was stupid, and the big guy was just gross. and it just breaks my heart that you're hanging out with sven again. he's still violent. he was so jealous of me that he beat up that guy's house, jesus. don't get stuck with people like sven forever. i guess thats all i have to say to you."
My expression hardened at this fully ridiculous message. Reggie was fraught with attachment issues, it seemed, and I was finding myself on the wrong side of them. I didn't even reply; I was over it.
Instead I went to watch kitten videos to cleanse my pallet. First I clicked a lovely one of a little orange kitty jumping in and out of a box. Then I watched one of two kittens licking each other and purring, and one of a big fat cat singing, and a different big fat cat burping, and so on. Unfortunately, in a record of ten minutes I ended up in that part of the internet that happens when you click too many links, watching videos of cows with human heads and monkeys with one eye and that one fetish where ladies in high heels step on snails. It was like my life. Weird and wrong. My life was that deep dusty crevice of internet videos of radically disfigured children. My cat was the devil, my best friends were a Sasquatch, a Zombie and a Salem Witch Trial survivor, I may or may not have been dating a literal sea monster, and together we had recently beaten up an enormous spider, who was actually the mayor of my city. I was the baby with the enormous head. It was me. 
I put on Nick Drake and took a nap. 
--
"Okay street team!" came the earth shaking voice at the Ham hole on Monday. "Here plan! Melly, Carl, you job call people tell them please vote Ham Friday!" He pointed at the two with both of his bulky index fingers, who nodded. I wanted to be paired with old Mel but I figured it made sense, as we might not get much work done if left alone somewhere together.
"Me and Svenny go to mall hand out fliers!" Sven nodded his head and stood up. The look of hatred on his face seemed to ebb sometimes lately.  
"Goody, Sammy, you walk around town hand out fliers too. Make sure everybody vote in this election. Maybe just mayoral, maybe not seem that important, but tell them, they can change Broken Arrow! Every vote matter." I didn't know why he was pairing me with Goody, when she had a perfectly good partner herself (old Jared had followed her in wearing only a pair of teal briefs), but if (I liked to think when) Ham won this election, I'd probably have to get used to assuming he knew how things should go. Then again, he wasn't a generally bossy person unless it was critical. I liked that about him. He was very assertive when he needed to be (like the time he kidnapped me; looking back, there was no way I would have eve come with him unless he had stolen me, though I still maintained that he could have been a heck of a lot gentler) but when things were going smoothly he stepped back and did nothing more than offer boisterous commentary. What a good mayor he would make! I was excited to canvass for him. I believed so strongly in the cause.
Jared and Goody Corey and I walked up and down the main street of town for a while, piles of black and white fliers featuring Ham's signature winky face in each of our arms. Goody had three docile finches sitting on her shoulders today, and even as she hopped up and down hollering praises to our favorite candidate, they remained hooked to her shoulders. I thought they were statues at first, but then I saw them rubbing up on her face like cats and lightly pecking her chin with their little beaks. When I asked her about them, all she said was, "They ate the milkshake."
Jared was sort of unenthusiastic. He didn't seem charmed the way he had when he'd been brought to Melia's yard, but he did seem like something was keeping him by Goody Corey's side. He didn't seem too happy about it, however. In the nippy afternoon and in only a pair of underpants he was holding himself around the midsection with goosebumps all up and down his arms. He had looked me dead in the eyes at one point with tear filled eyes and mouthed "help me." I didn't want to get on the hunchy little witch's bad side but I did want to help Jared. I supposed she'd clothe him at some point and I knew her intentions were nothing more sinister than companionship, a successor in her craft, and maybe some eye candy. She was trotting around on her tiny little booted feet with such pride. 
I just handed out fliers and explained to people about Ham's platform (leaving out the parts about fire in favor of playing up his plan to create many job for people of Broken Arrow.) The reaction was overwhelmingly positive, even more than I had originally expected. I knew everybody hated Schmoverlord, as well they should, but I didn't know everybody loved Ham. There was another candidate that I had sort of assumed had favor, named Dr. Martin. Maybe I just thought he had favor because when I thought about him I thought about my favorite shoes. I didn't even know what he looked like. I thought he might have been libertarian? He couldn't be republican, right, because there can only be one republican candidate and that was Schmoverlord. I thought Schmoverlord was probably actually a libertarian, as he was in favor of stepping on every possible disadvantaged group and loved to reduce regulations on local businesses. Once, he had gotten the letter rating system for restaurants removed (I thought that was a federal regulation, but Schmoverlord was secretly a giant spider so what did I even really know) and twenty people had gone to the hospital from a rare disease they caught at restaurant where a Typhoid Mary character had been sneezing into the frijoles. This had been just a couple years ago, and I remembered that the person who had been responsible was actually named Mary. I wondered if it was the same one. Could have been, I supposed, before realizing that I was really and truly completely desensetized to the idea that literally anything could happen. If Typhoid Mary, who was documented as being dead, had limped up to me with rotten body parts right then and there, I would not have batted an eyelash. I would have told her to go away. 
So anyhow, Dr. Martin was a libertarian or something, even though Schmoverlord was probably a libertarian marketing himself as a regular old republican for purposes of getting re-elected, though I was sure he just coerced people into voting for him on pain of death by giant spider. How did he win elections? 
That was what a pretty girl in a grey button down shirt asked me when I handed her a Ham 2012 flier. "How does Shmoverlord keep winning? This is the first time I'm old enough to vote and it's Ham for suresies. I think we've got the power to really turn things around this time!" She waved energetically to me and Goody Corey, confusedly to sad, sad, naked old Jared, and walked away. 
I was out of fliers now, and my feet were tired. I felt accomplished, though. I really felt like Ham could win. Ham needed to win, not just so that old Schmoverlord would be out of power, thereby removing a bit of the direct peril to my lovely town, but so that Ham's awesome policies could be heard. And so that I could say (at least to myself) that my friend (the Sasquatch) was the mayor. It was definitely more because of the latter than it should have been. 
We walked to the mall to find Ham and Svenny. We didn't have to look hard, they were in the first place we check in the small shopping center. They were in the food court, eating hot dogs. The image was a weird kind of cute, the Sasquatch in the navy suit with the gelled hair and the striking, geometric Elf in the athletic shirt and gym shorts, hunched together over the crummy cobbled table in the flourescent mall food court, eating sad, oozy looking hot dogs. I liked my friends, even Sven, right now. 
We went over there, Jared looking noticably more comfortable in the well-heated mall, and sat for a bit. 
"How it go?" asked Ham, chewed up hot dog still in his mouth. 
"Quite well!" said Goody Corey, smiling like a proud granddad at Jared, who shook his head showly with wide eyes. Somebody should help that guy, I thought. "Everyone seems to be quite vocal indeed regarding their preference for you, Hamothy." 
Ham smiled and, after taking and not fully finishing another bite of hot dog (the smell of which was starting to give me a headache), spoke again. "We see that too! Even Sven get three different high fives. Lot of people recognize me, say 'I can't wait for Ham mayor 2012!' I say 'Ham can't wait either! You not alone!'" We all laughed; even Sven let out a little chuckle. 
"Who is feeling pechish? I certainly am, and I believe young Jared is as well. He had a scoop of cat food this morning but seemed unsatisfied. I do apologize, Samothy," she said, turning a pitying gaze to me, though much of the poignancy was lost as there was a finch rubbing a contented little face against her cheek, "but I don't believe they have anything suitable to your dietary needs." It was true. Whether it was blood or greasy, overprocessed hot dogs, I could not eat what was available at the mall food court. "I shall get Jared and I some foul. B-r-b, as the children say." She stood up, shorter out of the little red metal chair than in it, and waddled over to the Pleasant Pheasant, a fast food chain that hadn't thrived well countrywide, but for some reason was quite popular (for joking purposes as well as dinner purposes) here in Oklahoma. "Come, Jared." She patted her tiny thigh and Jared, with upset expression, rose and followed her.
"It's so weird that she has that pet model now," said Sven, also though his hot dog mouth. When would the gross nonsense end? Sven laughed a little. 
"No judge Goody!" said Ham. "Jared have good home, loving caretaker, rewarding trade ahead. If not learn to love it himself, Stockholm Syndrome kick in soon. This just how it go, even Goody get picked this way. It just life when you witch. Win some, lose some." That made sense, I guessed. I knew Jared would be okay, he just looked so very sad. "It hard to be like us, Sammy, you know. Everybody got to not judge. Let live life, offer support. It help a lot."
I knew that, and I felt that from each and every member of the group, from the way they had welcomed me with open arms to the way that they treated me (and each other) forst and foremost like a person, and like a monster second. I tried to let go of any squicky feelings I had about the mostly naked pet Goody Corey had adopted. 
"No man, it's definitely fucking weird," said Sven. "If that were me I'd kick a hole in her face or something. It's a shitty thing to do to somebody. Just like, fucking pick them up out of their normal life and tell them who they're gonna be forever? I don't like it. It's not cool." 
I felt that hustle too. I didn't know what I thought other than that Goody Corey had chosen Jared and getting her to let him go would probably involve a fair bit of prying him from her cold dead fingers. And, I decided, she smelled quite bad enough even fully composed, not to mention the fact that I liked her and her particular brand of unwitting quirkiness. 
Goody Corey retuned with Jared at her heels and a tray with some bird parts on it. Jared looked quite pleased, but like any well trained pet, didn't dig in until Goody Corey snapped her fingers and said, "Good peasant. Go ahead."
Sven laughed. "Wait up, Goody," he said.
"Yes, Svendleton?" she cooed. 
"You're giving pheasant to your peasant?"
"Yes, of course! He deserves a break from stale bread and cat food every once in a while."
"You're giving your peasant a present, and it's Pleasant Pheasant?" everyone laughed very hard at that. Even Jared let out a little bit of a nervous whinny between massive bites of bird flesh.
"I suppose so, Svendelton. I do suppose." She giggled. 
--
We met back at the Ham hole to compare experiences and such. That meeting was short, everyone had the same thing to report (except Carl, who had gone home to try to beg his parents to repair his van, which had been getting leaves in it through the poorly secured tarp and had lost gas mileage due to the constant wind resistance coming through the roof and the gash in the passenger side door). The truth was, most folks were obviously quite excited to vote for Ham. It seemed like the only ones who didn't explicitly pledge alliegance either couldn't bring themselves to care about the state of their fine town, or didn't speak enough English to communicate with us. We were ready. When it was over, Ham exclaimed, "I excited to burn all my aprons!"
Melody and I sat next to each other on the couch, kind of thigh rubbin', kind of hand holdin', kind of eyein' each other. I was thinking what she was thinking. As soon as Ham and the rest of us finished our conversation about the election and decided to meet back the next afternoon to do the same thing, the kissing happened again. This time it was in front of everyone, which was nice for me. I'd never really had that before. All my kisses had been kind of shameful and secretive in some way or another. Just the fact that this wasn't shameful or secretive made me embarrassed and I stopped it sooner than I'd liked to have. I just didn't know hiw I felt about openly kissing in front of Ham and Sven and Goody Corey and Jared. 
Goody was trying to kiss Jared, who was having none of it. He was shaking his head and glaring at her, leaning back away from her, but she remained completely unaware and kept on making kissy noises at him. Sven and Ham looked at each other. It was interesting how we ended up looking like three couples. Fucked up couples, for sure, but couples nonetheless. I wondered what Sven would have thought if he knew that I had just mentally called he and Ham a couple. 
Just as I thought that, Ham pat Sven on the back in a pretty brotherly way. Maybe more than brotherly. Oh man, it was not okay to be thinking what I was thinking. Before I could stop it, the word popped into my head. Slashsquatch. I snorted and covered my face. 
"What are you laughing at?" asked Sven.
"Nothing. Nothing." 
"Why the fuck are you laughing?" he pushed, his face looking more like a violent dragon's than a teenager's.
"I'm not," I said while laughing.
"Fuck, fine." 
--
The next day we passed out more fliers to try and rally support for Ham. It was vaguely useless due to the fact that nearly everyone already had plans to vote for Ham, but that didn't stop us, it just made it fun. This time all seven of us plus Finny and Dennis were together near the mall, spaced pretty evenly, taking frequent breaks and just hanging out talking to people. Even I had the confidence to approach folks; I knew most of them would dig what I was laying down. 
After about an hour of going strong I started to get weary so Carl and I sat down together. He seemed sort of off, fidgeting more than usual and looking around with much, much more alertness than he tended to have. 
"Is anything wrong?" I asked Carl.
"No," he said, but I didn't believe him.
Schmoverlord appeared. I didn't see him walk up but suddenly he was there, pushing Patricia in her wheelchair, though this time she wasn't dressed as a mermaid but in a quite fashionable business casual getup: a navy pencil skirt and a muted pink silky top. Her hair was very blonde and oddly shiny, and her face was sort of flat looking. There was sonething slightly off about that woman. 
I saw the two of them and I instinctively jumped back and hollered. I wasn't into them at all. I hadn't had time to get over the thing that had happened just a few days prior, the thing that involved Scmoverlord turning into a giant spider and trying to kill my friends and I. thank goodness for Sven's glitter hands, I thought.
My mind cleared from the initial body reaction of seeing the man who had turned into a spider and ripped the roof off my friend's car and I noticed that Schmoverlord and Patricia were flanked by police officers. Oh boy.
"Here is the culprit," spoke grey old Schmoverlord to the police officers in his tight transatlantic drawl, gesturing to me. "I shall take care of this myself, however, with a stern talking to the way my father taught me. Would you mind giving the child a ride to the town hall?" He smiled at them with the sickest, most twisted intention I'd ever recognized. He had a pencil thin mustache and was wearing a black and white verticlly striped tailored suit. I sat with my mouth agape, not sure at what I was the "culprit" or what Schmoverlord was planning on doing to me once we got to town hall, but I hoped that Ham would tell my parents I loved them and maybe use my story in a motivational speech once he was elected. I had no choice, I knew. Schmoverlord was potentially all powerful, I didn't know what he could do. I'd never done a brave thing in my life and wasn't sure I had the cojones to start. I got up, looking around apologetically.
"What did he do?" asked Sven nonchalantly. I'd been rethinking whether Sven was even really a crapface recently, with him stepping in and being brave so much.
"He's been lighting trash cans on fire around his school campus for almost two years." He looked Sven penetratingly in the eyes as he said this. I definitely hadn't been lighting the trash cans on fire, in fact I was pretty sure Sven was the one who had been doing it. The smarmy laughter in Schmoverlord's voice as he blamed me almost betrayed that he knew who was the real culprit. Blaming me for something that Sven himself did. Testing how brave he really was. What a mean old mind reading mayor. He went on. "Usually we don't do forensics tests on such things, but an exception was made in order to keep our lovely schoolchildren safe." He didn't break eye contact with Sven, nor did his expression change from that punitive self righteousness he had pasted on. Sven's crude glare broke, though. His lip twitched and his eyebrows went sympathetic for a split second. He looked away. Schmoverlord turned his gaze to me. "Come, darling. You shall be fine." Every comforting word he spoke he somehow contorted to sound hateful and threatening. 
"Okay." There were police there, what else could I do?
I let them cuff me and lead me to a squad car, and when we were inside withthe doors closed I let them tell me I was lucky not to get put in jail. I was a real arsomist and I was old enough to be charged as one, now. I was just about as lucky as they came to be under the wing of good old Schmoverlord. I was just in awe that somebody supported Schmoverlord, let alone two people. Maybe he'd made some sort of secret deal with the police where he extorted money from the poor or something. Maybe he had them under a spell. That was more believable. It hit me again that I was at that point in my life where two police officers being under a spell was more believable than a political bribe to keep them happy. That was the way my life was. 
We arrived at the town hall and Schmoverlord was waiting outside, still holding the handles to the damn wheelchair. Patricia was uncannily unresponsive, I didn't understand what she was doing there. Was she Schmoverlord's girlfriend? I briefly entertained thoughts of Schmoverlord having once been a wonderful force of good in the world who loved Patricia, but whose magic went awry one day and rendered her incapable of walking and maybe speaking as well. This would have turned him sour and vengeful towards the world. If he can't have nice things, no one should be able to! Then I thought, there was no way Schmoverlord wasn't just plain born evil. He had certainly at least had gone mad with power the second he realized he had some. I pictured him being like me, a runty little kid who didn't like the same stuff as the other little kids. Probably got smacked around a lot, maybe into lockers, maybe into cave walls (I didn't know how old the fucker was). The second he found out he could turn into a horrible gazillion-eyed spider and spear people through the heart with his terrible spindly legs, he probably thought it was the best thing ever. Finally he could show the world that he was big shit! 
I vetoed that storyline as well, however. I refused to believe there was anything tragic about the soulless monster. There was nothing about him that could be redeemed. There was no hint or trace of pain in his eyes when he hurt, only pure unadulterated joy in being the cause of pain and suffering to others. He'd looked Sven right in the eyes and said, in different words, that it was his fault that I was being taken away and would probably be killed. It wasn't Sven's fault, though, it was just Schmoverlord's excuse, and he'd employed truly heartless technique in maxmizing the pain that it caused. There was no heart in a man like that. I was sure if you ripped him open the way I sort of wished I had the skills to do, there'd be nothing in that chest cavity of his. Maybe he hid stolen money in it, or maybe there was a tiny heart inside, charcoal black, struggling, and hyperbolically too small for the cavity it was meant to fill. I would have spit on his shoes if I wasn't sure he'd have turned me into a newt and sold me to Goody Corey to aid her in her human corpse cleanup. 
Schmoverlord leaned in so close that I could smell him clearly and strongly. It called back to my olfactory memory and reminded me of despair, of the times in my life when I knew there wasn't a chance for me to ever feel better, that the best thing for me to do would be to get in bed and never leave. It wasn't a rank smell, it was just a memory. I'd read about how humans give off slight hormonal scents when they feel certain ways, so subtle that most people can't discern them except subconsciously. But this was like the entirety of Schmoverlord was stepped in a concentration of exactly what it smelled like to be on the very edge of the will to survive. It was also like morning breath. And a little bit like air freshener.
"Come along, Miss," he whispered into my ear so close that it tickled. Personal space issues. 
"Come along, Patricia!" he sort of valiantly screeched as he brought her wheelchair along a sharp turn, during which I saw a break in the skin of her face, no ear, and sumply dry bone underneath for at least an inch, though I couldn't see through her shiny blonde mane. I tried not to look nauseous. What had he done to her? Before I could contemplate the psychopathy any deeper, she spoke for the first time I'd ever heard her do so. 
"Why, of course, Schmovybear!" Her voice was odd. A bit of a caricature of what I'd expect from Patricia, it was too high, too screechy, with too much of a dip in tone. Almost like what you'd hear from a man imitating his wife in order to make fun of her. Oh well, Patricia had problems, it was clear, if only for the fact that she was calling the evilest being I knew "Schmovybear."
I followed Schmoverlord and Patricia in through the town hall, trying to be good so as not to have my ears removed. Poor Patricia. 
As we walked, she told me about what each room or painting represented, pointing flatly in each direction as we walked. Schmoverlord's office was way at the end of the hall, I assumed, so he'd pass everyone and pass judgement on them on his way to perform his mayoral duties of fucking everything up beyond repair.
"Here's a painting of the first mayor of Broken Arrow, Jim Potterman. He was a good example but he thought the poor deserved help. In Schmovy's opinion, the poor need to help themselves. Don't you agree, Samantha?" She turned her head to the side, where I was walking in stride with her. Her expression never changed. Her eyes were empty. She had no ears. Her voice was grating as could be. I didn't like Patricia now that she had energy. I also didn't care much for the fact that both Schmoverlord and Patricia acted under the impression that I was a woman. It wasn't that I cared, really, it was that they were obviously doing it to get a rise out of me. Like that was the way to get a rise out of someone, compare them to a woman. I personally was quite fond of women, so it wasn't the comparison that bothered me, it was the fact that the comparison was supposed to bother me. I couldn't very well explain that to Schmovybear and Particia, though. They were mean and gross and didn't care. 
I also totally didn't agree that the poor needed to help themselves, especially under the limiting regulations that Schmoverlord had enacted. He very clearly thought people with lower income were completely disposable. It was such a ridiculously punitive sort of opinion that Schmoverlord tended to have, it almost had to be a joke. The hundred year prank, maybe? I wished there was something other than pure hatred in Schmoverlord's ideas. 
We kept walking and eventually we reached Schmoverlord's mayoral office. It was large and full of polished wood and things you'd expect from an elected goernment official's office. American flags, a picture of the president, a comfy looking spinny chair, off-white carpet. It, too, smelled like concentrated sadness and long unopened drawers. And air freshener. It was like he was trying to cover the smell but instead he was just amplifying it. Not just death now, not just choking on tears, but that and "new car." It made me sick.
Schmoverlord left poor disfigured Patricia at the door and watched her close the door behind us, lock it, and sheel herself over with distressingly thin and pale fingers. 
"So, Vampire," spoke Schmoverlord with sich glee as his lips curled around the identity I rejected.
"I object," I muttered. I hated him so much. 
"Oh, I'm sure you do. I know your secret, child. I know you're mortal." I shrugged my shoulders in defiance. Schmoverlord should go ahead and try to convince my friends of that. I wasn't sure it was possible.
I was wondering, though, how he knew that I was just a human. Did he know other Vampires and see that I was different?
"No," he snapped at me. "I know everything."
I didn't hide the disgust on my face. What was the point?
"No point. No point in anything." He had gone from teasingly evil to sincerely threatening.
"Oh, stop the flattery. I am truly evil in all that I do. You know this."
Suddenly I was overcome with the thought of all the people I loved dying. It was brutal, it was real, it was happening. I knew it was. Ham, Melody, Carl, Goody, Sven, Finny, Dennis, my parents, even Reggie and Cole. Why was he doing this? The image left.
"I control your mind, child. I am your mind." He looked disgusted with me. I was terrified. I tried not to think.
"You're smart, child. Isn't he, Patricia?" He turned to Patricia with unveiled madness in his eyes.
"Perfect for information," spoke Patricia in that grating voice, though it wasn't Patricia speaking. Her mouth didn't move, she didn't move at all. Schmoverlord was literally speaking for her out of the corner of his mouth. And I realized that Patricia was no longer with us. Patricia was a skeleton in a cheap mask, a wig, and high end clothing. Schmoverlord laughed so hard and so painfully punitively that I could not even find this funny for one second. Patricia danced then, what would otherwise have been a whimsical representation of modern style, and I knew it was Schmoverlord moving her limbs. Patricia was not a woman, she was simply a horrible bone puppet. 
I swallowed vomit and Schmoverlord kept cackling.
"You are pitiful!" he screamed at me. 
"How?" I thought toward the mayor, mustering some internal bravery in the face of imminent death.
"You are scared, you are small, you are mortal, you are poweless." He spoke the last word in an intense whisper with his green eyes widening and his nostrils flaring. "You know nothing, yet you think you have control over anything. I, my dear girl, will kill you. I will slice you. I will be the reason you die and I will bear no shame. Your suffering will bring to me such deep joy, deep like a chasm. A deep, deep, chasm. With some blood running through it." He laughed at the blood chasm part as if he were proud of his poetic prowess. He was probably listening to my thoughts and feeling the way that my brain and body were reacting to the images he was placing in my head, not just with his words but somehow else as well. I was watching myself die and watching people suffer over me, feeling the pain of not only my slow, pitiful demise but also of those who would grieve. I was still sitting down, of course, I was paralyzed with fear, but he wasn't. He was up walking around and circling me, accentuating his points with violent hand motions. 
It seemed like he loved explaining things. I thought this quickly and then squashed this thought with one wondering why or how he could read minds. 
"I can read minds because I am omnipotent!" the last word was staccato and sharp as well as demeaning. "I know everything!" His voice was getting higher as he got more upset, sort of screechy and not as threatening as I think he thought it was.
"How?" I thought again, egging him on.
"I was born a human, as you are," he began, eager to share. "I was an orphaned peasant and I mattered not. I died regrettably young, from a spider's bite. A nasty filthy huge furry beast, I still remember it clearly. It was terrifically painful, my dear. More painful than even your death will be. I was killed on purpose, though I didn't know it until my final moments, by a wizard with plans to experiment upon me." This sounded ridiculous. "It's all true, girl! Silence! You would do well to learn some manners!" I translated this into rhythmic "blah blah blahs" in my head to spite him. Then he spoke eerily for Patricia, a vehicle for echoing his sentiment. "Yes, silence, naughty girl!" Schmoverlord went on. "The wizard reanimated me and I was brought back with not only the magnified powers of a dangerous arachnid but with the powers of the wizard as well. He had not performed the incantation correctly and had transferred much of his knowledge into me at the same time that he transferred the spider's venom through my veins." He took a deep breath and the warm, political light in the ceiling fan flickered. "As I died, I learned everything. Everything, Samantha." He quieted then, accentuating his seriousness in the form of a near-whisper. His face was enraged and his cheeks looked flushed, though they were still colorless. "Knowing everything is a burden on the soul. It's enough to trample a perfectly healthy, productive, hopeful person to death. Like the wizard, for instance," he got louder and his face twisted up to a demented grin, "whose insides I turned into soup and drank through his belly button!" He laughed and I tried not to think about how gross that was. So, so gross.
"Gross, yes! Very gross! I make my living on gross, my dear! There is no point in doing otherwise! I know what goes on in the heads of every human with whom I make eye contact and let me tell you just what it's like: it's rubbish." He tapped his finger on the table to accentuate this. "There is no point in faith and no point in sensible order. The best idea is to bewitch and to destroy. I am putting steps in motion to put Broken Arrow out of its misery!" 
Spoken like a true psycho, I thought. I gave him props for that. But why Broken Arrow? A suburban bum town in Oklahoma? Weren't there bigger fish to fry? "In time, in time." His eyes were wide and wild. "There is a method. I must start with a believable following of hiveminded republicans." That was a pretty rude way to describe my townspeople, and an inaccurate one as well. There were monsters in this town who lived their lives uniquely and beautifully, so I knew of very little hivemind (other than the time all those boys had come for Goody Corey's milkshake), and as for republicans, I'd only met three people who planned to vote for Schmoverlord in this year's election; Schmoverlord himself and the two cops he'd charmed.
He didn't even have a clever comeback to that one right away. How's that for omnipotence? I had gotten much less scared as he had gotten into his dumb sob story. It wasn't very menacing for one, and for another, I thought he was playing up his own intelligence just a smidge. You can know everything but that doesn't always mean you can put it to good use, I decided. 
Instead of trying to verbally attack my thoughts, he got terrifying again. I assumed this ws because he wasn't smart enough to tell me how smart he was. "You are pitiful! Pitiful!" he screamed into my face, leaning close and screeching so loud that my ear started throbbing. I rubbed my temple, furrowing my brow at him in attempted sassiness, and when he backed off a smidge I wiped the sticky spit gobs from inside his rotty mouth out off my face.
"I hate you, child! I will kill you!" Well, I guess I wasn't unscared.
I wasn't too scared to keep on, though. I think it was because I was so used to jumping at every little thing that I'd just gotten used to feeling threatened. The harmless, arguably almost cute daddy longlegs that had been in my bathroom the other morning really wasn't much less of a fright than when Schmoverlord had turned into a giant tarantula and ripped the roof off Carl's car the other day. When everything scared me half to death, I reacted to Schmoverlord the same way I'd react to anything. By powering through it the best I could. I sort of wished that wasn't the case right now, though, for as I sat in the chair unable to move, my ability and even urge to keep thinking mean things about old Schmovy was making him very upset. With indifference, I hoped he wouldn't kill me.
"I will kill you!" he screamed, nearly frothing at the mouth now. "How many times must I tell you! I will literally murder you! I will do it!" Well, I guessed that was cleared up.
"Stop it! Just cower! Cower, peasant!" 
So, Schmoverlord was upset that I was maintaining brain function. I couldn't decide if that was a good thing, my only possible chance of surviving this, or if it was my sure and promised demise.
"Demise! Demise!" He screamed, getting very upset. He was still putting horrible images in my head, but they had holes and I could see the fabrication now. He was trying so hard, it was cute. 
"I am not cute!" he screeched, literally balling up his fists and stomping on the ground. The stomp shook the building and made the lights flicker again, but it was definitely not uncute. 
His angry head snapped to Patricia and she moved her limp, bony hands to her hips in a gesture that would have otherwise been sort of sweet. He spoke unconvincingly out the corner of his mouth, in basically the exact same voice he had been using for the past few minutes. "Schmovy! You are very cute!" Shmoverlord laughed.
After a few minutes of this, with me just sitting there in wide eyed dismay at how totally gross their relationship was (or was it better to say that Schmoverlord's relationship with himself, with his own mental state was the gross thing?), Schmoverlord stopped laughing very, very suddenly and glared sternly at Patricia.
"Patricia!" he screamed, his head shaking so much that his plastered shiny light-reflective hair came unglued from his forehead and made him look even crazier, if that was possible. "Yes!" he screeched from his own mouth as Patricia's answer. "File my papers! I haven't got all day to sit here and get nothing! Done!" His transatlantic screech was accompanied by wild green eyes, a gaping mouth, and some banging of a fist on the desk. It was feral. "I am so sorry Schmovy!" "Yes, as well you should be! I killed you once!" "I don't doubt that you would kill me again my love, my light, my fire." "I would do it again! I would do it!" 
By the end of this psychopathic little argument, his and Patricia's arms were in perfect synchronicity, straight up in the air waving around to accentuate each other's conversation. "I am through with this madness!" He screeched at me, at Patricia, at himself, at everything and nothing. As if to remind me that the madness was nowhere near over, he jumped onto his desk and landed on all fours as Patricia's skeleton hands fell limp to her lap in the wheelchair. Schmoverlord landed in a houndlike squat on the desk, and to complete the action he literally howled at the ceiling. His hair was wild and his expression was that of a pathetic animal. He had grown stubby slimy spider legs to replace his own and a few exra eyes, which was unsettling, but by no means a complete transformation to his more terrifying form. This looked more glitchy than anything, like he'd lost control over his human form and had begun to slip without deciding to do so. Schmoverlord spread his arms wide, laughing maniacally, moving again with Patricia, who was simply a skeleton, her head hanging off to one side a little bit and no life in her arms except that which Schmoverlord assigned every time he twitched an arachnal leg. I sat, my mouth open a little, my eyebrows furrowed a little in a coma of confusion, despair, and pity for the power-mad mayor, who was clearly failing to cope. 
His gaze then snapped to me, who I'm sure he noticed judging his pathetic antics. "You!" he screeched, pointing a fingerless stick in unison with Patricia's bone cluster. "You have no right!" 
I did, though. My thoughts were supposed to be mine and I was allowed them. I couldn't quite stop them from happening, anyhow. I was used to communication through internal monologue since I could rarely muster the courage to broadcast my thoughts. They all lived in my conscious mind. It was the only part of yoga I couldn't do well, the silencing the mind part. I could stand in warrior 2 for ten minutes but not a split second of that was without racing thoughts and conclusions drawn.
Schmoverlord did a perfect spidery warrior 2 on top of his desk. Patricia remained seated but pushed her shoulders down and back and mimicked Schmoverlord's spread arms in perfect time. He remained unresponsive to the rest of my thoughts and just stared vacantly ahead in his yoga pose, remaining half spider and entirely gross. He was unmoving for a good thirty seconds before I got over it.
He was obviously not responsive, but for good measure I tested this by specifically articulating the words in my head, "Schmoverlord is a big dumb baby." He didn't even acknowledge me, he just sunk deeper into his warrior, many green eyes blinking in lopsided time. I heard a seam tear in the crotch of his pinstriped slacks. Were his thoughts short circuiting or something? I decided to get out of crazytown. 
I simply got up then, and I left with no interference from Schmovy. On the way out I notified the front desk that the mayor was acting really messed up. 
I texted Melody telling her I beat up the monster, and she replied with a very thankful invitation to the Ham hole, where they were having an emergency meeting about how to break into town hall and save my life. No need, I thought bravely as I strutted towards the little house on Patterson street. I got that mayor nonsense all kinds of figured. 
--
"How did you do it?" asked Sven after I'd gotten a lot of hugs and relieved sighs from people who saw me being alive, unscathed, and even sort of confident. 
"I think he's crazy," I said, proud and comfortable among my people. "He can read minds, though."
"Oh no!" called Ham, already having recovered from the fear that his friend was about to die, probably due to the fact that I was the weakest, smallest, least brave person I knew and I had singlehandedly sent Schmoverlord into hysterics. "That a bad thing!"
"He can also sort of put images into your head. Make you think certain things." I didn't mention the part about how I'd watched all of them die.
"You think that's how he gets the vote?" asked Sven. That made sense. 
Carl nodded. "Yes. He, charms, the polls. We've been, over this." How did Carl know that?
I was comfortable speaking so I voiced that question to Carl. 
"I just, do. It's okay." Way to cut a kid down! I was still confused but I didn't push it.
"How you escape? What happen?" Ham was very interested in the details, as well he should be. The wasknesses of your competition are never a bad thing to know.
"Well, I think a lot," I started. There were some furrowed brows and nods of stern agreement. Everyone else seemed not to be following. They thought a lot, too, I'm sure. Why would that mean anything?
"I mean, lots of times I just say...a lot to myself. I'm not very good at getting it out." It pretty much always felt uncomfortable to explain myself in front of people, and now was no exception. "So, I think that when Schmoverlord was reading my mind, he was hearing all the things I was thinking about him. Maybe when he threatens people they usually stop thinking anything except that they're scared. I can't do that. I thought a lot of really mean things about him and he um, well, he freaked out. He stood on the table and started doing yoga. Also Patricia is dead." 
"You're, very smart, and very brave. You seem, quiet and finnicky, but you are, truly resilient." Okay, Carl. Alright. I didn't feel that way. "You sweat, the small stuff, so much, that the big stuff, doesn't phase you. Schmoverlord, heard you being sassy, despite his threats, to kill you. That, never happens. He, couldn't handle that." Okay. Why was Carl suddenly psychic? This was very strange coming from the Zombie who was ofentimes just scenery. 
"How do you know this?" I asked Carl.
"I'm undead." he said simply. 
"So?" I said.
"I know, everything." 
How was that related? Schmovy was undead too and he knew everything. I hoped Carl couldn't read minds, otherwise he knew I wasn't a Vampire. Then again, one of the many facts that made up the database that waas "everything" was the fact that I was not a Vampire. Had he known all along? Why had he let everyone prove that I was a Vampire, if he'd been sitting there knowing that my denials were true? What was his motivation? Did anyone else know? I'd have to ask him later when we were alone. For now, I just wanted to know why Carl's undeadness and his omniscience were correlated.
"Why do those go together?" I asked.
"Aww, he doesn't know?" chirped Melody.
"Oh. I thought, you were just, being stupid." Carl laughed to himself. He was truly the king of saying things only he found funny. "So, as a person dies, they learn, all the facts. Everything. It's just, a part, of death. In your, final moment, as you go, you are endowed. Most people, don't get, to come back, and use it."
Wow. Okay. That was a big thing to learn. So every undead being knew everything. That was an interesting thing to learn about zombies, especially, since they were supposed to be sort of stupid and hiveminded. Maybe they just knew something we didn't. That was a scary concept.
It hit me that Carl could probably read my mind. My thougths were part of everything, too, weren't they? I looked at him and thought loudly, "If you can read my mind, give me a sign." It was strange that this wasn't the first time I'd done this. Never to carl, never to anyone who would practically have been able to read my mind. But every once in a while I'd be in a crowded room and I'd be thinking about somrthing wholly inappropriate, and I'd start broadcasting this frequency of "give me a sign if you can read my mind." This was all assuming that I'd have been humored by the ones with the power anyhow, as if they would be interested in outing themselves just because a finnicky teen thought it would be a nice thing to do. I never really felt safe inside myself and that was just an extention of the fear. However, now that Carl was actually probably reading my mind, and probably actually had been since I'd met him, I was terrified. 
"Carl," I began, my throat closing around the sound and stunting it. "Can you read my mind?"
He chortled like I was asking something completely silly. "Of course, not. That's not part, of everything. It's all, facts. Your thoughts, aren't facts. They're impermanent, and hardly consitute, knowledge, anyhow."
Haha. Touche, Carl. At this point I was just wondering how somebody so slow could know everything. Maybe he was slow because he knew everything, though. Maybe his mind was burdened with so much knowledge that it slowed him down to have to sift through it all. Knowing everything should offer him some sort of insight on how to work with that, though, shouldn't it? I really didn't get the whole concept, but I liked Carl and I had trusted him before, and I supposed I trusted him still. I owed that to him. 
Now that the stressful part of this endeavor was over, I shut up and let the conversation go where it was gonna go. It started off with Ham taking charge (like any good future mayor would) and thinking up a plan of action for the next few days before the election on Friday. We'd keep canvassing, and on Thurdsay at about noon we'd visit Schmoverlord at his office and try to trip him up. Mel brought up her untarnished attendance record, and Ham reminded her that volunteer work for local politics was an excused absence and that it would look fabulous on her college resume. She was trying to go into buiness, so even though the true motivation for the absence would be "fucking up the mayor," her excuse would just have to say, "working for democratic party to prepare for election," and her resume would say, "Volunteered for Democratic Party (2012)." It sounded nice in those terms, leaving out the fact that the nature of her volunteer work was to break into town hall and try to make the mayor act stupid.
Usually, the night before the election, Schmoverlord would go on the TV and the radio and make a speech encouraging everyone to vote and subliminally reminding everyone to vote for him. Our plan was to go in there under ruse of well wishing and hand shaking and try and make his brain into soup before he addressed the fine citizens of Broken Arrow. We figured we'd all be able to get in if we said we were Ham's street team and he was treating us like equals, as he planned to do for every resident in the coming term. Maybe the libertarian brainwashed front desk attendant would find it problematic that Ham wanted to treat everyone like they belonged, but that's a fairly sacreligious thing to openly admit, so we'd certainly be allowed to pass as long as our smiles were big and seemed genuine. It would be a good plan as long as we did it right. I'd definitely have to drink coffee beforehand for purposes of being energetic enough to handle the stress of Schmovy's graphic depictions of loved ones dying. Also, of course, having my mind race enough to send Schmovy over the edge would be helped quite a bit by a shot or two of espresso. 
Ham stressed strongly the fact that Schmoverlord wasn't really a threat as long as we didn't percieve him as one. The name of the game was keeping our thoughts flowing, the more insulting, the better. As long as, when he started threatening us, most of us were cheerily thinking that he was a total idiot, it would work. Carl speculated that as soon as he got violent, he was at his most vulnerable; as soon as he was allowing his natural (insane) instincts take over, he was tapping into the part of himself that was not too premeditated and controlled to spiral out of control. So, truly, all we had to do was give him too much to process. And it wouldn't hurt to shame him a little.
I was scared because I knew that before Schmoverlord went downhill, he'd be at his strongest. He'd be working hard to place greusome images in my head and my friends' heads. He'd be reading our thoughts and answering them uncannily. He'd be threatening us and it would seem all too real as it was happening, probably aided by the fact that he would be placing depicions and feelings in our heads that made the pain and guilt and horror seem immediate. His office would smell like death. Patricia would be there. If nothing else was terrifying, old Patricia, the bones of a murdered woman, would be there, moving hollowly, wearing a thin, yellowing mask and a cheap wig, dressed in something fashionable, with Schmoverlord standing next to her screeching words out of the corner of her mouth. How would Patricia feel about that if she were still alive? I felt bad for her now, but I knew when I saw her on Thursday I'd just have to try not to run away from her greusome existence. Or nonexistense.
Yes, Before Schmoverlord degenerated into ridiculousness and frothing at the mouth, he would hurt us all in ways that might affect us for a long time. He was shameless and evil. I wasn't looking forwrd to this project so much anymore. 
--
As hard as I worked to slow time down, to grab the minute and the hour hand on the clock with tiny hands of my own as I sat in study hall, and later in my glistening Christmasy bedroom, and keep them from ticking forward, they did, and Thursday came. 
I'd gotten the day off school with a slip that was "from the desk of John Ham," (was that Ham's first name? Did he have one? Did he make that up so that he'd seem more like a human when he ran for office?) and signed with a sloppy, uneven mark from the Saquatch himself. I'd slept in a little, until past nine, and then I'd put on nice clothes (looking in my closet, I'd looked at my lucky red boots and thought, "Fuck it. I deserve to look hot today"), said goodbye to my mom, and walked to the Ham hole. 
There I met the rest of the folks, everyone who I'd met at the Ham hole was there except for Melia, who was at home calling people up to remind them to vote tomorrow. We walked to City Hall together. 
"Hello! You must be John Ham, it's a pleasure to meet you. And who are these lovelies?" greeted a chipper yet somehow incomplete woman behind the front desk.
The rest of us, tiny forms around Ham's huge central one, smiled cutely. "These my canvassers. Think they deserve also wish Mayor Schmoverlord well. They work hard." Ham's impression of someone who wanted to wish schmoverlord well was spot on.
The woman behind the desk smiled and held up her finger, telling us to wait a minute, as she lifted a phone receiver to her ear and dialed some buttons. She danced around a little with her head as she waited for an answer. "Hello, Schmoverlord? John Ham is here to see you." 
There was a faint grumbling at the other end of the line and the woman rolled her eyes. "Okay. Yes. Sure Schmoverlord. Okay. I'll send them." She hung up the phone and looked at us. "He wants you to know he's very excited to see you."
Well, that was inadvertently terrifying. Actually, maybe totally advertently. 
The glob of us walked down the long hall, led by the woman from the front desk, as she chatted to us about the election. Were we excited? Had we had a nice time preparing? It was all very well-meaning but it wasn't a comfortable situation, to be asked questions about our campaign by an employee of the opposition. Oh well, she seemed like she had a spell on her, or something, to be pleasant. I could almost see some despair in her eyes. Maybe I was just looking for something gruesome. 
We got to the office, where Schmoverlord was sitting creepily at his desk next to a limp Patricia. Today she was wearing a blue polka dot dress. I wondered if he picked out her clothes, if he dressed her. Gross. "Hello, friends," he smiled, wide green eyes against monotone body looking feral and violent. 
"Hello, Schmoverlord!" boomed Ham, sounding very sincere and happy to see him. I almost started wondering whether or not he meant it.
"Alright Linda," crooned Schmoverlord, looking her dead in the eyes and squinting just a tiny amount, "You may leave us."
Linda nodded and closed the door behind her. As soon as the latch clicked, Schmoverlord screamed and pointed. "Why are you here!" His voice got high when he was upset, almost like Patricia's, but more pathetic. I wanted to feel sorry for him but he was way too much of a dickbag. He looked me in the eyes and his face flared into ridiculous anger. 
I couldn't help but smile a little and wonder sarcastically if he had heard that. I gave him the subtlest sasy look I could manage. This was going very well. 
"You, girl, may leave!" He screamed at me, pointing. I saw Patricia begin to move with him but he controlled her and she went limp again.
Okay, whatever. I almost started laughing at him. I hoped everyone else was feeling as unthreatened as I was. 
I went to leave, but before I did, I made sure to think about how wrinkly Schmoverlord must be under his clothes and how gross and twisted it was that he was in love with a dead skeleton. He hit me with very graphic image of my parents getting their bodies cut open. Okay. That wasn't real. That wasn't real. It felt real and it was terrifying and it hurt but it was not real. I knew this would happen. The image repeated itself, my mom crying and calling my name, like it was my fault. It wasn't real. She was fine. Schmoverlord was working really hard on this one. I looked for the seam, found the place where it looped, felt it coming from Schmoverlord's brain and not some horrifying database of factual things that were really happening. In a few painful seconds I'd gotten the picture to look to one dimensional that it was no longer a threat, it was just awful. Schmoverlord screamed then, noticing my feelings of "I can do anything (bitch)" style victory. 
"Get! Out!" He and Patricia pointed. I had never felt sassier in all my days and I decided to show off a little bit as I walked out. I got to the door and blew a kiss at Schmoverlord, who uttered a wordless screech to the ceiling. I laughed for real. 
As I looked around, though, closing the door behind me, I saw that no one else seemed as excited about beating up Schmoverlord as I did. The group was full of terrified, drained, pallid faces. It was too late to do anything, now. I knew that in the very least, he probably wouldn't murder them in City Hall. Ugh.
I closed the door and thought about saving my friends.

